,title,time,description,link,text,sentiment
0,SMU student found guilty of molesting woman at overnight study ...,1 week ago,Follow us on Instagram and join our Telegram channel for the latest updates.,https://www.todayonline.com/singapore/smu-student-found-guilty-molesting-woman-overnight-study-session-judge-rejects-consent,,"{'neg': 0.0, 'neu': 0.0, 'pos': 0.0, 'compound': 0.0}"
1,"'She was completely fine with all my advances', says student on trial ...",5 months ago,"SINGAPORE: A 24-year-old man on trial for molesting a woman during an ... Lee Yan Ru, who remains a fourth-year student in SMU's school of...",https://www.channelnewsasia.com/singapore/smu-student-lee-yan-ru-on-trial-for-molesting-woman-196486,"SINGAPORE: A 24-year-old man on trial for molesting a woman during an overnight study session at the Singapore Management University (SMU) testified on Monday (Apr 5) that he thought she was ""completely fine"" with all his advances.

Lee Yan Ru, who remains a fourth-year student in SMU's school of business, described how he was ""very happy"" as the woman, now 22, was getting ""more and more comfortable"" with him during the night.

He said he wanted to get closer to the woman and be ""more intimate with her"", adding that he thought she was also attracted to him.

He repeatedly said she ""was fine with it"" when asked how she reacted to his advances, which included touches, kisses and hugs. The woman's identity is protected by gag order.

Lee is contesting one charge of using criminal force on the woman by rubbing his privates on her chest in a study room at SMU on Jan 8, 2019, intending to outrage her modesty.

Answering questions by defence lawyer Josephine Chee of Rajah & Tann, with his family in the courtroom, Lee said he was in a dance club, a dragon boat team and part of a student coaching service team.

He currently works in a start-up providing digital marketing solutions and helps out in volunteer work, he said.

At the outset, he said he did not commit the alleged act intending to outrage the modesty of the woman, who is not an SMU student.

He said he came across her profile in early January 2019 in the Explorer page on Instagram, which recommends accounts to users. He began chatting with her on Instagram and shifted to Telegram, where he said they replied to each other immediately if they could.

THEIR FIRST MEETING AT A CAFE

According to Lee, their first meeting was at a cafe near SMU.



After asking if she was afraid of tickles and she said she was not, Lee began ""poking her tummy"".

""I was trying to be playful with her and see if she was okay with this interaction with me,"" he said, adding that the woman was ""okay with it"".

""I also asked her along the lines of whether she had abs. Then she said it was hidden, so I decided to poke her tummy a few times to see whether that statement was true,"" said Lee.

He said she was ""fine with it"" and it was ""very friendly between us"", with the woman smiling along the way and not showing any signs of rejecting his actions.

""I felt it was quite pleasant that even though we met for the first time we can have such playful interactions between us,"" said Lee.

After their meeting, he continued to chat with the woman on Telegram and asked if she wanted to meet up to study that week.

They agreed to meet later that night and Lee suggested studying at SMU as it was open 24/7.

""She asked if she can sleep at SMU and I said yes and I will bring my inflatable air sofa,"" said Lee.

He arrived first at SMU close to midnight on Jan 8, 2019, and took the lift up to a group study room. She arrived at around 1am.



Defence lawyer Ms Chee said the woman testified earlier in the trial that she was shocked to see a group study room as she had assumed they were going to a library.

""Do you recall her expressing any shock?"" asked Ms Chee.

""No, she did not, she did not share anything about the place,"" said Lee.



HE PLACED HIS FEET ON HER THIGHS

As they studied, he placed both his feet on her thighs as he felt they were ""getting more comfortable with each other so I wanted to be playful a bit"".

Asked what he wanted to achieve with this action, Lee said: ""Firstly, I wanted to get closer to her and I also wanted to know if she's fine with these playful interactions with me.""

He said he believed she was ""completely fine with it"" as she placed his feet back on her thighs when they slipped off. She also told him he had long legs, said Lee.

The woman had testified in court that when Lee placed his feet on her thighs, she grabbed his foot and moved it away three to five times.

""That wasn't the case,"" said Lee. ""My feet were on her thighs and when they slid off ... she placed them back on her thighs and soon after I then pulled down my feet when I didn't want to carry on the interaction with her.""

After this, the woman said she felt warm and wanted to change into a singlet. According to Lee, he wanted to take her to the toilet to change, but she said she would do so in a small walkway in the L-shaped room.

""I was very happy that she was comfortable changing in the same place as where I was at, and I believe she's happy that she's spending time with me,"" said Lee.

While the woman changed, Lee asked her ""what if I peek"". ""She responded by saying 'I trust you',"" said Lee.

Later, the woman took out her laptop and lay on the floor to watch a movie. After completing his work at about 2am, Lee lay down next to her ""very close"" with their shoulders touching.

Lee said he suggested moving under the table as he felt the light was ""glaring"", and the woman was ""okay with it"".



""I FELT SHE WAS GETTING MORE AND MORE COMFORTABLE WITH ME""

Ms Chee asked Lee how he felt the night was going at the time.



""From my perspective, I felt that she was getting more and more comfortable with me, she was happy spending time with me, like she had completed her assignment or maybe part of her assignment and she decided to stay in that room with me and watch the movie with me so I felt that she was glad to spend time with me,"" he said.

""I was very happy because I myself wanted to get closer to her, to be more comfortable with her and more intimate with her.""

After this, he placed his arm on her back and moved his hand towards her shoulder. According to Lee, when he asked her what would happen if he tickled her, she replied that she would hit or punch him, but he said she was saying it in a joking and playful manner.



He began tickling her underarm, and she would react by flicking his forehead gently each time he did so, Lee said.

When the movie ended, Lee moved his hand down the woman's spine and tickled her waist before moving his hand under her singlet to touch her breast.

""I could recall her giggling for a moment when I touched her right breast,"" he said.

Lee said he later touched her chest with both hands. This went on for a few seconds and he said she was ""fine with it"" before she ""gently removed my hands from her singlet"".

""I thought she was fine with it and all then when she pulled out my hands I decided to take things step by step and not carry on with it and I felt that she was actually okay with it but I decided to respect that and I stopped doing so,"" said Lee.

He said the woman began trying to move out from under the table, but he held her waist and pulled her ""gently"" towards him.

When she held onto one of the table legs, Lee got out from under the table and so did the woman. He hugged her and said he felt her loosen up, adding that he ""could feel her hands around my waist"".

They went downstairs for the woman to have a smoke break, and at this point, Lee said he believed that she was ""feeling comfortable"" towards him as well.

""We were progressing well throughout the night and to me, she was completely fine with all my advances,"" he said.

""I was glad that I was getting closer towards her and I feel it's the same for her as well, like I was attracted to her, and she was also attracted to me, and we are both willing to spend the rest of the night together.""

He held her hand in the lift, and she ""was fine with it"", he said.



""I WANTED TO GET MORE INTIMATE WITH HER"": LEE

After the smoke break, they returned to the room where Lee sat on the woman's lap and tried to hug and kiss her.



""I wanted to get more intimate with her, and for us to get more intimate with each other,"" he said. ""My hands were at her back and I felt her bra hook so I tried to unhook her bra. And in (my) attempt of doing so, she stood up again.""

Ms Chee said the woman testified in court that she had been wearing a sports bra and there were no hooks.

""I could clearly remember she was wearing a normal bra underneath her singlet because I could clearly feel the hooks at the back of her bra,"" said Lee.

He pointed to a photo that showed her bra straps.

""If you see the black bra strap, you can see the fastener. This shows she was wearing a normal bra because this wouldn't be there in a normal sports bra,"" he said.

In their interactions, Lee said he managed to kiss the woman on her cheek. She responded by saying ""ew"" and wiping her cheek, he said.

""After that, I pulled down my shorts and exposed my private part,"" said Lee.

Asked why he did that, he said: ""To me, and I believe to her as well, we were getting more and more intimate, so I took out my private part just wanting to be more intimate with her.""

""How did she react when you exposed your private part and it came into contact with her thigh?"" said Ms Chee.

""Uh ... she did not say anything, but we remained very close to each other, my arms were still around her, the mood was still very ... intimate between us,"" said Lee.

He stood like that for a few minutes before pulling up his pants.

The morning's hearing ended at this juncture and will continue in the afternoon with Lee on the stand.

If convicted of molesting the woman, he can be jailed for up to two years, fined, caned, or given any combination of these penalties.



SMU said in September last year that Lee remains a student pending the outcome of his trial and the university's disciplinary proceedings.","{'neg': 0.019, 'neu': 0.864, 'pos': 0.117, 'compound': 0.9996}"
2,SMU student grilled on the stand about consent as woman he ...,5 months ago,"Under cross-examination from Deputy Public Prosecutor Andre Chong, 24-year-old Lee Yan Ru repeatedly maintained that he thought the woman,...",https://www.channelnewsasia.com/singapore/smu-student-molest-cross-examination-consent-198331,"SINGAPORE: A Singapore Management University (SMU) student on trial for molesting a woman during an overnight study session was grilled by the prosecutor about consent on Tuesday (Apr 6), as the woman made a surprise showing to attend the hearing.

Under cross-examination from Deputy Public Prosecutor Andre Chong, 24-year-old Lee Yan Ru repeatedly maintained that he thought the woman, now 22, had consented to his acts throughout the whole night.

Mr Chong charged that Lee did not care if she consented, that he could not take no for an answer and that he did not stop when the woman asked him to stop because based on his police statement, he ""just (wanted) to release"".

Lee is contesting one charge of using criminal force on the woman by rubbing his privates on her chest in a study room at SMU on Jan 8, 2019, intending to outrage her modesty.

The woman in the case, who is not an SMU student, turned up for the hearing on Tuesday morning and was allowed to stay after a brief stand-down where parties discussed whether her presence might be an issue.

District Judge Sharmila Sripathy allowed her to stay after the prosecutor said he had no objections, and she stayed in the hearing for the entire time Lee was being cross-examined.

Lee had testified a day earlier under the direction of his defence lawyers from Rajah & Tann that he had met the woman on Instagram in early January 2019 and arranged to meet her at a cafe soon after. That same night, she accepted his invitation to meet him at SMU to study through the night, turning up at 1am on Jan 8, 2019.

Throughout the night, Lee testified, what happened between them was ""mutual"" and ""consensual"", and she ""was fine"" with him touching her breast, hugging her and trying to kiss her as they studied, watched a movie under a table and went for smoke breaks.

At about 6am on Jan 8, 2019, after they both lay down in separate areas of a study room in SMU for a nap, Lee woke up and knelt over the woman.

He then touched her breast to wake her up before exposing himself and rubbing himself against her chest. This forms the charge he is contesting. Lee admitted to the acts, but said he did not intend to outrage her modesty, and that the woman had consented to the acts.

THE CONCEPT OF CONSENT

Mr Chong opened his cross-examination by asking Lee about the concept of consent.

""If I want to do something to you, isn't the burden on me to ask you for consent?"" asked Mr Chong.

""It will be my job to ensure I say no,"" answered Lee, whose parents were in the public gallery.

""Even though I'm the one who wants to do something to you?"" asked Mr Chong.

""Based on your question - I need to say no if you want to do something to me and I do not want you to do something to me,"" replied Lee.

When Mr Chong said the only way to be certain if someone consents to an act is to ask them, Lee said ""well, it depends"". He added that it depends on the place he was asked and the environment he was in.



Under Mr Chong's questioning, Lee agreed that he had not asked the woman for permission before he performed any of the physical acts against her - including poking her at the cafe where they first met, kissing her, hugging her or touching her breast.

While they were studying in a room at the university, Lee said he placed his feet on the woman's thighs and ""flapped them"". One of the signs he took to be her consent was how she would take his feet and place them back on her lap when they slipped off.

However, the woman had testified that she had grabbed his feet and pushed them off each time he placed them on her legs.

""On the previous occasion, (the woman) pushed your hand away when you poked her,"" said Mr Chong. ""So she didn't want you to even poke her. But you are telling us now that when you put your feet on her thighs - which is a far more intrusive act, she wanted that to continue?""

""Yes,"" replied Lee.

""Your dirty unwashed feet, on her thighs?"" asked Mr Chong.

""Yes, sir.""

""Is that believable, Mr Lee?"" asked Mr Chong.

""That's exactly what happened,"" Lee maintained.

DETAILS NOT IN HIS POLICE STATEMENT

Mr Chong pointed out that this detail was not in the statement he gave to the police soon after the incident, when his memory was freshest in his mind. Lee said he had not thought about it at the time.

Lee had also testified that while the woman was changing her clothes in a corner of the room, he had asked her what if he were to peek. Lee said she replied, ""I trust you.""

This detail was also not in Lee's police statement. He again said he had recalled what he could at the time and was in a ""scared state"".

""You were 22. By the laws of the country, you would be an adult. You had served your National Service. You were in fact an officer. So how can it be that you were 'young and scared'?"" asked Mr Chong.

""Why can't that be the case?"" replied Lee. ""I'm young and scared. Even right now if I'm brought to the police station, I will still be young and scared.""

Mr Chong charged that Lee was changing his statement repeatedly, from what he said to the police to what he said under questioning by his defence lawyers and now under cross-examination, but Lee said he was not.

Mr Chong questioned Lee about his behaviour during a movie he watched with the woman at about 2am that day.

PROSECUTOR: ""I WILL HIT YOU"" MEANS SHE'S OK?

When Lee asked the woman what she would do if he tickled her, she said ""I will hit you or punch you"", according to Lee.

""You took the words ... to mean she was OK with you tickling her,"" said Mr Chong. ""When (she) testified, she didn't mention that you asked her what happens if you tickle her.""

""Even if I believe you - which for the record, I don't - which part of her response 'I will hit you and punch you' translates to 'I am OK with being tickled'?"" asked Mr Chong.

""To me, at that point in time, we were just comfortable with each other,"" said Lee. ""I will know if she will really punch me after her act. If I poke her and she punch me, then it means, yes, but she didn't. She only flicked me.""

""You will only find out after you did it, right?"" asked Mr Chong.

""No, sir,"" answered Lee.

Mr Chong accused Lee of changing his evidence again on the stand, and Lee replied: ""I know you don't get it because you weren't there at the scene. I was there, and we were there, and I could really feel-""

""Mr Lee, it doesn't matter if I was there. My job here today is to test your evidence. You weren't the only one at the scene, because (the woman) was also there. She has also given evidence,"" Mr Chong interjected.



THE MEANING OF THE WORD ""STOP""

When it came to the final act in the room in the early morning of Jan 8, 2019, Mr Chong pointed Lee to his police statement where he was asked why he rubbed himself against the woman's chest.

On Mr Chong's direction, Lee read out his answer in the statement, which said that Lee just wanted to ""release"" and that it was a ""moment of lust"".

Mr Chong charged that what was foremost on Lee's mind was ""your desire to ejaculate"", but Lee said he did also think of whether the woman was ""fine with it"" and thought she was.

Mr Chong said it was an ""absurd situation"" for the woman to find herself in, and said Lee was prepared to override her refusal - when he began rubbing himself on her and she said stop - to achieve his own gratification.

""You said - 'To me, her stop didn't mean stop. I felt like she wanted me to carry on and I took it that she was fine with my advances',"" said Mr Chong. ""Now Mr Lee, what's the ordinary meaning of the word stop?""

""It's to ... someone to pause what they are doing,"" answered Lee.

""Pause, cease, not continue, right? That's the ordinary meaning of the word 'stop', right?"" asked Mr Chong.

""It depends on the context still, sir, not necessarily someone says stop it means stop,"" answered Lee.

""If (she) wanted you to carry on, wouldn't she have said 'carry on', or words to that effect?"" asked Mr Chong.

""She could, but when she said the word 'stop', I saw it as 'carry on' also,"" said Lee.

Asked why he thought so, he reiterated that the whole night was ""a progressive thing"" and he could tell she was ""ok with my advances"".

""The way she used 'stop', it sounded very playful still, so it sound(ed) like the time when we went to the toilet and I splashed water on her and her saying 'don't disturb me' so to me her definition of stop didn't mean stop, and to me I took it to mean the phrase you used - just carry on,"" said Lee.

Pressed by the prosecutor to demonstrate how the woman had supposedly said ""stop"" in a playful tone, Lee said he could not show it to him in this current environment.

""If even the word 'stop' meant carry on to you, what could (she) have said to get you to stop?"" asked Mr Chong.

""Like I said it depends on the feeling I have. Like if she shouted 'stop', or shouted any other words. Her hands were free, right. If she hit me, pushed me hard, I would know it means stop. But the word 'stop' she gave doesn't mean a stop,"" said Lee.

""The truth is, Mr Lee, there was nothing (she) could've said to get you to stop,"" countered Mr Chong. Lee disagreed.

HE HAD ""SIMILAR"" EXPERIENCES WITH OTHER GIRLS

Mr Chong also pointed to Lee's police statement, where he said his ""past experiences with other girls were similar and they were OK with it"" and he did not expect this incident to end like that.

Asked to explain, Lee said: ""Before that, I did go out with other girls, we did have intimacy throughout the night, and after the night they were fine with it. We are still friends, and all those are similar experience I had with (the woman). I believe she was fine with it, so I really don't know why she tried to tell me the lawyer's letter thing and called the police on me.""

When Mr Chong asked if Lee had knelt on top of other sleeping girls and rubbed himself on them on other occasions, Lee's lawyers objected, but the judge allowed the question.

Lee denied doing this.

""Your belief that she consented to you doing these things to her is completely unsupported by any of the facts,"" said Mr Chong.

""It's the whole environment, that, that's the whole process, I keep repeating, these are the facts where we are constantly getting closer and closer and there's consent all the way,"" said Lee.

""What you are saying this entire time about what you felt, what you believed, about the mood - this is a fantasy that you've constructed, which had no basis in reality,"" Mr Chong said.

Lee's lawyers had no questions for him in re-examination. The judge called for both sides to file written submissions and reply submissions, and fixed a date to deliver her verdict in July.

If convicted of molesting the woman, Lee can be jailed for up to two years, fined, caned, or given any combination of these penalties.

SMU said in September last year that Lee remains a student pending the outcome of his trial and the university's disciplinary proceedings.","{'neg': 0.029, 'neu': 0.885, 'pos': 0.087, 'compound': 0.9987}"
3,Woman testifies in trial of SMU student accused of molesting her ...,12 months ago,"The accused, 24-year-old Lee Yan Ru, is contesting one charge of using criminal force on her by rubbing his privates on her chest in a study...",https://www.channelnewsasia.com/singapore/woman-testifies-trial-smu-student-accused-molesting-her-saying-she-felt-weird-and-awkward-591206,"SINGAPORE: A young woman who said she was molested by a Singapore Management University (SMU) student during a late-night study session on campus took the stand on Monday (Sep 7) and told the court how she felt ""weird"" and ""uncomfortable"" after his alleged advances on her.

The identity of the woman, who is now 22, is protected by gag order.

The accused, 24-year-old Lee Yan Ru, is contesting one charge of using criminal force on her by rubbing his privates on her chest in a study room at the university on Jan 8 last year.

Before this, he allegedly groped the woman under a table, followed her into a ladies' washroom and placed his arm around her in the school lift.

After the alleged offence, Lee wiped the woman's neck, face and hair with tissue paper before the woman spoke to a security guard and called the police.

Lee's semen was later found in swabs taken from the tissue paper, and the woman's neck and face.

THEY MET ON INSTAGRAM

The woman, who is a student at another university, said she got to know Lee on Instagram about a week or two before the incident. She had posted a photo of herself wearing a pair of sunglasses, and Lee offered to buy them from her, she said.

""I told him no, because I have a boyfriend,"" said the woman. Explaining her response, she said that men usually ""take the hint"" when told this and will back off.

Lee also offered to take her out for a meal but she declined. They continued chatting about their mutual friends and school, as she ""didn't want to be rude and brush him off"".

""I mean, there's no harm to just making friends and talking to someone,"" she said.

They continued to chat on the social media platform and later moved to the messenging service Telegram. Lee complimented her by calling her ""pretty"", the woman said, but she did not take this as an expression of interest.

A day before the alleged molestation offence, the woman told Lee that she was going to Kith Cafe in Millenia Walk to study.

Lee suggested going to the Kith Cafe at SMU instead so they could meet up, and she agreed.

During the study session, Lee sat beside her and poked her rib, she said.

""I felt awkward. I didn't really know how to act, because if it's someone I didn't know, I'd have moved away or left the place, but considering the nature of our acquaintanceship and how we had mutual friends, I didn't know how to respond,"" she said.

She also said it would have been easy to move away if a stranger had done that to her, but because they had about 20 mutual friends, she ""didn't want to be rude or leave a bad impression"".

Lee returned to school about half an hour later and they continued chatting on Telegram about their mutual friend, said the woman.

They met again later that night, after Lee asked what she was up to. The woman said she was finishing up a lab report and he asked to meet up to work together.

Explaining her reason for agreeing, the woman said she was feeling sleepy and thought that meeting someone else would prevent her from falling asleep at home, and that it would be ""a way to force myself to complete my assignment"".

The prosecutor asked the woman why she did not ask her boyfriend to accompany her instead.

The witness said her boyfriend turned in early as he would be busy the next morning.

She added that her boyfriend did not know that she was meeting Lee as he had fallen asleep before she could tell him.

She met Lee at the School of Economics and Social Science Building at SMU at about 12.30am to 1am on Jan 8, 2019.

She thought they were going to his usual study spot in the library, and was ""quite shocked"" when he took her to another room instead.

LEE'S ALLEGED ADVANCES ON HER

A short while later, Lee allegedly used his foot to reach the woman under the table, resting his heel on her thigh, an act he repeated.

Feeling ""weird and awkward"" and thinking it was ""quite unhygienic"", the woman pushed his foot off.

She said she was ""lost for words"" and added: ""It just felt really awkward and I'm not really verbal when I'm awkward"".

After she was done with her work, she moved to lie on her back on the floor and watched a show on her laptop.

Despite the woman telling him to continue with his work, Lee joined her on the floor. At about 2am, they moved under the table to continue watching the show as the lights hurt their eyes, and lay on their stomachs watching the film shoulder-to-shoulder, the court heard.



When the show ended at about 4am, the woman alleged that Lee tickled her again and reached from behind and molested her under her clothes.

She was ""quite shaken"" and did not know how to react, so she asked Lee to take her somewhere where she could smoke a cigarette, she said.

The court was shown closed-circuit television footage of the pair entering the study room and leaving it before returning.

Explaining her change of tops as seen in the footage, the woman said she had changed into a red top sometime before the movie in the walkway of the room, which was L-shaped, where Lee could not see her.

She is shown giving what she described as a ""playful kick"" at Lee as they headed for the smoke break. She said she did this to break the tension.

WHY SHE DID NOT LEAVE

Asked why she did not just leave, the woman said: ""It was the middle of the night and there was no mode of transport, and also I didn't want to leave a bad impression.

""I didn't want to make him feel bad. I didn't want to make things hostile.""

""Usually if it's someone I didn't know, I would have just gotten up and left. But this was different because we have gotten to know each other already, so I just didn't have it in me to say something or walk off. Considering we were alone in school ... the last thing I wanted was to turn him into an enemy,"" she said.

During one of their two cigarette breaks, Lee placed his arm around her waist, testified the woman. She said it ""felt wrong because I am attached"" and moved away, but did not say anything as she was embarrassed and also did not want to embarrass him.

Another CCTV clip of the pair in the lift showed them hand-in-hand, with fingers interlaced before the woman pulled her hand away.

She explained that Lee had held her hand and she had let go, trying to ""brush it off"" as she felt he was ""trying his luck"".

After this, Lee allegedly followed the woman into the ladies' washroom as he said the men's toilet was too far away, and also tried to kiss her when they returned to the classroom, said the woman.

She said he tried to push her down to lay on the table, but she resisted. The woman also alleged that Lee tried to kiss her about three more times but failed, before hugging her ""really tightly"".

She said she suspected that Lee later exposed himself and placed his private parts on her thigh as something felt ""warm"" but she did not look down as she did not want to see it.

She asked to leave, first saying it was very hot then changing to say she wanted to smoke again, but Lee allegedly told her to kiss him first.

The hearing ended on Monday evening before going into the details of the actual offence making up the charge, and is set to continue on Tuesday and Wednesday.

Lee is represented by lawyers Thong Chee Kun, Ms Josephine Chee and Mr Jonathan Oon from Rajah & Tann.

If convicted of molesting the woman, he can be jailed for up to two years, fined, caned, or given any combination of these penalties.

CNA has contacted SMU for more information.

Editor's note: At the request of the Attorney-General’s Chambers, this story has been edited to remove details on the woman’s boyfriend. The AGC said that the details ""may lead to the identification of the victim"".

","{'neg': 0.084, 'neu': 0.854, 'pos': 0.061, 'compound': -0.9746}"
4,SMU molest trial: DPP grills accused on issue of consent,5 months ago,"... of Lee Yan Ru, 24, who is on trial for outraging the modesty of a female student during an overnight study session at SMU in 2019.",https://www.tnp.sg/news/singapore/smu-molest-trial-dpp-grills-accused-issue-consent,"Singapore Management University student Lee Yan Ru is accused of outraging the modesty of a student during an overnight study session at SMU in 2019.

The alleged molest victim of a Singapore Management University (SMU) student sat through the accused's testimony yesterday, during which he repeatedly maintained that she had consented to his advances on her.

The issue of consent took centre stage during Deputy Public Prosecutor Andre Chong's cross-examination of Lee Yan Ru, 24, who is on trial for outraging the modesty of a female student during an overnight study session at SMU in 2019.

While admitting he had not asked for her consent before making his advances, Lee repeatedly said he believed she had consented based on her actions, The Straits Times reported.

DPP Chong argued that Lee had not obtained her consent, and that the woman had moved away from him and taken his hands off her when he touched her breasts, sat on her lap and tried to kiss her.

Lee, who is alleged to have rubbed his private parts on her chest in an SMU study room, said: ""Throughout the whole time, I thought it was mutual (and) there was consent between both parties.""

He repeatedly attributed this to the ""mood and environment"" between them during the early hours of Jan 8, 2019.

""You weren't there. Only both of us were there. Only both of us know how we were getting more and more intimate,"" he told DPP Chong.

The woman, now 22, made a surprise appearance at the hearing yesterday morning, prompting a discussion between the parties as to whether her presence would be an issue.

After DPP Chong said he had no objections, District Judge Sharmila Sripathy-Shanaz allowed her to sit in the public gallery, and she stayed for the DPP's entire cross-examination of Lee.

The woman, who attends another university, cannot be named due to a gag order.

The DPP began by asking Lee what consent meant to him. ""If I wanted to do something to you, but I didn't get your consent, does it mean that it's your job to say no?""

Lee replied: ""Yes, it would be my job to say no.""

Asked if he thought the only way to be certain that someone consents is to ask the person, Lee said it depended on the place, environment and setting.

On Monday, when questioned by his lawyers from Rajah & Tann, Lee testified he had arranged to meet the woman at a cafe after getting to know her on Instagram in early January 2019.

She accepted his invitation to meet him at SMU to study through the night, turning up at 1am on Jan 8, 2019.

He added that what happened between them was ""mutual"" and ""consensual"", including him touching her breast, hugging her and trying to kiss her.

Yesterday, DPP Chong argued that several statements made by Lee on Monday were fabricated, since they were not put to the alleged victim when she was being cross-examined or were missing from his original police statement.

The statements include the woman saying she trusted Lee while she was changing in the room, that she had placed his feet on her thighs, and that he had asked her what would happen if he tickled her.

Lee denied that the statements were fabricated.

The court also heard on Monday that the woman had said ""stop"" to Lee as he knelt over her, but he did not think she meant it because of her ""jest(ing) tone"".

DPP Chong argued that she had just woken up and would have been disoriented and unable to consent. ""When she finally came to her senses, she said 'stop',"" he added.

DPP Chong asked Lee to mimic the way she had said ""stop"", but Lee said: ""There is no way I can replicate that tone because... I am not her and I am not in that environment now.""

When asked what she could have said to get him to stop, Lee said: ""If she shouted 'stop', or (since) her hands were free (and) she pushed me hard... It's just at that point in time, her 'stop' didn't mean 'stop'.""

DPP Chong said: ""The truth is, Mr Lee, there is nothing (she) could have said to get you to stop.""

Lee disagreed.

Judge Sripathy-Shanaz is expected to give her verdict on July 27. If convicted of outraging the woman's modesty, Lee can be jailed for up to two years, fined and/or caned.","{'neg': 0.066, 'neu': 0.872, 'pos': 0.062, 'compound': -0.5994}"
5,Woman says she felt angry to be 'disrespected and degraded' by ...,12 months ago,"The 24-year-old man was allegedly kneeling over her and ... hair and neck, which was later identified as the accused Lee Yan Ru's by a DNA...",https://www.channelnewsasia.com/singapore/smu-student-accused-molesting-woman-classroom-693931,"SINGAPORE: A woman who was allegedly molested by a Singapore Management University (SMU) student said she was asleep in a classroom when she woke up to see him over her.

The 24-year-old man was allegedly kneeling over her and ejaculated on her, said the 22-year-old woman on the stand on Tuesday (Sep 8).

There was semen on her face, hair and neck, which was later identified as the accused Lee Yan Ru's by a DNA profiling laboratory.

""I was embarrassed,"" said the woman, who was continuing her testimony on the second day of the trial. ""My face was hot. Nothing like this has happened (to me before). I just remember my face feeling very hot. I felt embarrassed and kind of angry.""

She said she was angry ""to be disrespected and degraded in that manner"".

""I mean frankly, pardon my language, I kind of felt like a slut and a whore,"" she said.

She said she did not consent to Lee's act, and had not invited him to kneel over her.

Lee is contesting a charge of using criminal force on her by rubbing his privates on her chest in a classroom at SMU in the early hours of Jan 8 last year.

He had met the woman on Instagram and began chatting with her online before meeting her in person for a study session, according to her previous testimony.

The alleged offence took place in their second study session at a classroom in SMU from 12.30am to about 6.30am, during which they did schoolwork and watched a movie.

At about 6.10am, they lay down to sleep in the classroom, with the woman lying on her back with her jacket covering her face and Lee lying across a few chairs.

She said she woke up to a weight on her and saw Lee over her. She told him to get off, but he purportedly told her to wait and then ejaculated over her.

After this, Lee took tissue paper from his bag and wiped her with it, she said.

SHE TOLD HIM HE WOULD HEAR FROM HER LAWYERS

She said she was ""in shock"" and did not know what to do, and ""couldn't bring myself to say anything"" to Lee.

As she packed to leave, she saw Lee's full name and address in a file and recited them out loud before telling him that ""he will hear from my lawyers"".

Asked why she did this, the woman said: ""To let him know that he messed with the wrong person, and to let him know that I will do something about it.""

Lee apologised and asked to let him make it up to her, and also invited her to punch him as he knew she did martial arts, testified the woman.

""I guess he said that as a way for me to get back at him to get even, as if that would suffice,"" she added.

She said she went downstairs while Lee pleaded with her not to tell anyone, and went to a security guard who was ""very shocked"" to see her.

""He asked me - girl what are you doing here. Are you an SMU student? That's when I realised I wasn't supposed to be there,"" she said.

She told the guard what happened and asked where the nearest police station was. The guard told Lee to stand outside the school while the woman stood inside.

""The whole time we were separated by the gantry, he kept shouting into the school, saying 'please don't call the police', but I just went ahead and called the police,"" said the woman.

THE EFFECTS OF THE ALLEGED INCIDENT

Asked by the prosecutor about what effect the incident had on her, the woman said it had affected her relationship with her boyfriend.



She talked about a time when her boyfriend ""pulled my hand, tried to get me closer to him ... I quickly pulled my hand away and pushed him away like a reflex"".

She said she did not realise until her boyfriend looked at her with a shocked face that she was ""projecting what had happened into our relationship"".

She also said she could not sleep for a few days, had trouble focusing in school and takes Xanax for anxiety.

She said a psychologist diagnosed her with acute stress disorder, which she said is ""shorter than post-traumatic stress disorder"". Socially, she said she feels ""a bit more cynical of people's intentions"".

The defence objected and asked if the prosecutor was intending to call the psychologist and other people the woman mentioned as witnesses, or else it would rely only on her word.

The prosecutor responded that this was ""a premature request"".

The trial is set to continue in the afternoon, with the defence beginning its cross-examination of the woman. Lee is represented by lawyers Mr Thong Chee Kun, Ms Josephine Chee and Mr Jonathan Oon from Rajah & Tann.

If convicted of molesting the woman, he could be jailed for up to two years, fined, caned, or given any combination of these penalties.

CNA has contacted SMU for more information.","{'neg': 0.103, 'neu': 0.872, 'pos': 0.025, 'compound': -0.9969}"
6,Man on trial for molest: I don't think she meant it when she said 'stop',5 months ago,"The Singapore Management University (SMU) student accused of molesting a ... Appearing before a district court yesterday, Lee Yan Ru, 24,...",https://www.tnp.sg/news/singapore/man-trial-molest-i-dont-think-she-meant-it-when-she-said-stop,"Lee Yan Ru is accused of rubbing his exposed private parts against the woman's chest during a study session at SMU.

The Singapore Management University (SMU) student accused of molesting a woman during an overnight study session on campus testified that he did not think she meant it when she said ""stop"".

Appearing before a district court yesterday, Lee Yan Ru, 24, gave his account of what happened in the early hours of Jan 8, 2019, and said he did not intend to outrage the woman's modesty.

He has been accused of using criminal force on the victim, 22, by rubbing his exposed private parts against her chest, intending to outrage her modesty in a study room at SMU.

Lee, who was being examined by his lawyer Josephine Chee from Rajah & Tann, said: ""When she said 'stop' to me, it was in a very jest(ful) manner... I believe she wanted me to carry on because throughout the night, she was getting more comfortable with me, there was this coy behaviour from her.""

He added: ""To me, her 'stop' did not actually mean a stop.""

The woman, who is studying at another university, cannot be named because of a gag order.

Lee, who is working at a digital marketing start-up, said he did not think the woman had meant for him to stop as she could have pushed him away or shouted for help.

""But she did not, she let me carry on with what I was doing,"" said Lee, who is still a student at SMU.

Leading up to the incident, which occurred around 6.30am, Lee told the court that he had rested his feet on the woman's thighs, tickled her, tried to kiss her repeatedly, touched her breasts over her bra and exposed himself to her, but repeatedly said he thought she was fine with his advances.

Lee said the two of them then took a nap, adding that he was glad to see she had not left after he woke up. He touched her left breast with both his hands to wake her up.

He then rubbed his exposed private parts against her chest. The woman said ""stop"", but Lee said ""a while more"", and the woman did not respond. She later got up from the floor and packed her things.

He said she told him to wait for her lawyer's letter. Lee said he was shocked because he believed the acts were consensual. The woman made a police report that morning. The trial continues today.

This article first appeared in The Straits Times.","{'neg': 0.052, 'neu': 0.907, 'pos': 0.041, 'compound': 0.3288}"
7,SMU molestation trial: Accused says victim was coy and didn't really mean 'stop' when she told him to,5 months ago,"The Singapore Management University (SMU) student accused of ... with his parents and younger brother in the public gallery, Lee Yan Ru, 24,...",https://stomp.straitstimes.com/singapore-seen/smu-molestation-trial-accused-says-victim-was-coy-and-didnt-really-mean-stop-when-she,"Jean Iau

The Straits Times

April 6, 2021

The Singapore Management University (SMU) student accused of molesting a woman during an overnight study session on campus testified that he did not think she meant it when she said ""stop"".

Appearing before a district court on Monday (April 5) with his parents and younger brother in the public gallery, Lee Yan Ru, 24, gave his account of what happened in the early hours of Jan 8, 2019, and testified that he did not intend to outrage the woman's modesty.

He has been accused of using criminal force on the victim, 22, by rubbing his exposed private parts against her chest, intending to outrage her modesty in a study room at SMU.

Lee, who was being examined by his lawyer Josephine Chee from Rajah & Tann, said: ""When she said 'stop', to me, it was in a very jest(ful) manner... I believe she wanted me to carry on because throughout the night, she was getting more comfortable with me, there was this coy behaviour from her.""

He added: ""To me, her 'stop' did not actually mean a stop.""

The woman, who is studying at another university, cannot be named due to a gag order.

Lee, who is working at a digital marketing start-up, said that he also did not think she had meant stop since her legs were free as he positioned himself over her. So if she really meant stop or did not want him to proceed, she could have pushed him away or shouted for help, he said.

""But she did not, she let me carry on with what I was doing,"" said Lee, who is still a student at SMU.

Leading up to the incident, which occurred at around 6.30am on Jan 8, 2019, Lee told the court that he rested his feet on the woman's thighs, tickled her, tried to kiss her repeatedly, touched her breasts over her bra and even exposed himself to her during their overnight study session, but repeatedly said he thought she was fine with his advances.

Lee said: ""I thought as the night progress(ed), (the woman) and I were becoming more comfortable with each other and she was completely fine with my advances.

""To me, and I believe her as well, we were getting more intimate.""

In one incident, he tried to unhook her bra but she stood up and did not react in any other way so he stopped, he said.

In another incident, he stood facing her while she sat on the table and kissed her cheek to which she responded ""ew"", which he took as being in jest because of her tone.

He then pulled down his shorts and exposed his genitals to her, making contact with her thigh.

Lee said the pair took a nap, adding that he was glad to see that she had not left after he woke up.

He touched her left breast with both his hands to wake her up, he said.

He then rubbed his exposed private parts against her chest.

The woman said “stop”, but Lee said “a while more”, and the woman did not respond.

“So I carried on rubbing my exposed private parts across her chest,” he said, adding that the entire incident took place in under 10 seconds.

The woman later got up from the floor and packed her things.

He said she then turned to him and told him to wait for her lawyer's letter and said: ""Imagine how disappointed your parents will be when they receive it... Your future is gone.""

Lee said he was shocked to hear this because he believed the acts were consensual.

He followed her as she left the study room and kept apologising because he did not want to ""get into trouble"".

The woman made a police report that morning.

The trial continues on Tuesday with the prosecution cross-examining Lee.

If convicted of molesting the woman, Lee can be jailed for up to two years, fined, caned, or given any combination of these penalties.","{'neg': 0.067, 'neu': 0.884, 'pos': 0.049, 'compound': -0.789}"
8,"SMU molest trial: Alleged victim participated in 'physical banter' with accused, defence claims",11 months ago,"Agree or disagree?” asked lawyer Thong Chee Kun, who is representing the 24-year-old accused Lee Yan Ru in the case.",https://sg.news.yahoo.com/smu-molest-trial-alleged-victim-participated-in-physical-banter-with-accused-defence-claims-064822512.html,"(Yahoo News Singapore file photo)

SINGAPORE — The woman accusing a Singapore Management University (SMU) undergraduate of molesting her while she slept had participated in “physical banter” with the man throughout the night before the incident, the man’s lawyer claimed on Wednesday (9 September).

“You actually consented (to the activities). I put to you that throughout the night you were a participant in physical banter with Yan Ru.... Agree or disagree?” asked lawyer Thong Chee Kun, who is representing the 24-year-old accused Lee Yan Ru in the case.

In reply, the 22-year-old woman pointed out that she had repeatedly rejected Lee’s advances by pushing him away, telling him to go away and to stop his actions.

Lee has claimed trial to one count of molesting the woman, whom he met through the Instagram photo-sharing app around one to two weeks before the incident on 8 January last year.

He is accused of rubbing his genitals on the woman’s chest at 6.30am while in a study room at SMU. Due to a gag order, the woman, who is from a private university, cannot be named.

Second day on the stand

According to the woman, she had met Lee at around 1am at SMU to do work and Lee led her to the study room. While in the room, Lee allegedly made multiple unwanted advances towards the woman, including hugging her, groping her breasts and attempting to kiss her while placing his penis on her thigh.

While the woman said she rebuffed his advances, she maintained that she did not take further action for fear of offending or embarrassing Lee. She repeatedly claimed that she did not verbalise her objections to his advances as she thought her actions were enough to put him off.

Defence counsel Thong latched onto this point on Wednesday – the second day into the woman’s cross examination – to build on his argument that the woman had not outrightly stopped Lee from escalating his actions that night.

Referring to the moment when Lee allegedly stood between her legs as she was seated on a table and placed his penis on her thigh, Thong asked the woman whether she thought that Lee’s intention was to engage in sexual activity with her.

Story continues

Initially, the woman maintained that the thought had not crossed her mind. While she did not actually see Lee’s exposed genitals, she had felt something “warm” on her thigh.

“I just thought that he was trying to be funny or trying his luck. It didn’t cross my mind that he wanted to have (sexual activity),” she said.

“Taking into account I had little sleep that night, it just didn’t occur to me maybe he was just trying to elicit a response. It just didn’t cross my mind,” she added.

When pressed by Thong what she thought Lee was trying to do, the woman replied, “I really have no clue. Trying to arouse me maybe.”

She eventually agreed that she thought Lee intentions might have been sexual.

After each incident of harassment, the woman maintained that she did not think of stopping the man from making further advances on her as she “did not think that he would try again”. Thong then pointed out that the harassment kept taking place despite her cues.

“He did it again and again, so you would have been proven wrong by the second time. So by the second time, did you think that you wanted to stop him from engaging in any physical activity with you at the time?”

The woman replied, “The second time I did not think there would be third time so I didn’t stop him the second time.”

“Maybe I’m just someone who gives many chances, I was just being too nice about it,” she added.

When asked by Thong whether she thought that Lee was obviously not getting the message, the woman replied that she didn’t know.

“I was tired. I don’t know why I didn’t think of that,” the woman said.

This led Thong to retort, “I’ll tell you why... you actually consented to all these activities. I put to you that throughout the night you were a participant (in) this physical banter with Yan Ru. That must be the reality.”

The woman disagreed and claimed, “If I had consented, why would I have pushed him away ask him to go away... If I consented wouldn’t we have had a good time rather than him ejaculating on my face when I was asleep?”

She added that she had not taken Lee’s advances seriously and saw him as merely trying his luck.

Thong then said, “At the material time you felt you did not object to him trying his luck unless he went too far, would you agree with me?”

The woman answered, “I objected to him trying his luck by pushing him away and everything that I stated before.”

The defence counsel also asked why the woman had not left when she felt uncomfortable. “Why did you need to wait for public transport when you took a Grab to SMU?” He asked.

“Being a student I want to save money as I (took a Grab ride) there and I didn’t want to (do so) again. I spent $11-$12,” the woman answered.

“But according to you, you were uncomfortable with him he made physical contact with you, yet you wanted to wait for public transport instead of taking Grab,” Thong responded.

“It is my evidence that I had a plan and I stuck to it,” said the woman.

The trial continues on Wednesday afternoon.

Stay in the know on-the-go: Join Yahoo Singapore's Telegram channel at http://t.me/YahooSingapore

Related stories:

SMU molest trial: Undergrad kept making unwanted advances on woman

Undergrad claims trial to rubbing bare genitals on sleeping woman in SMU study room

SMU molest trial: Victim says masturbation was final straw in string of harassment incidents","{'neg': 0.08, 'neu': 0.868, 'pos': 0.052, 'compound': -0.9823}"
9,NUS student allegedly assaulted woman in campus housing unit,11 months ago,"One of them, Singapore Management University (SMU) student Lee Yan Ru, allegedly outraged a woman's modesty on campus on Jan 8 last year.",https://www.straitstimes.com/singapore/courts-crime/nus-student-allegedly-assaulted-woman-at-residences-on-campus,"SINGAPORE - A National University of Singapore (NUS) student allegedly assaulted a woman in a student housing unit on campus on March 21 last year.

Korean Kim Dohyung, 22, whose case was last heard in a district court last Wednesday (Sept 16), is accused of one count of causing bodily pain to her.

He is said to have hit the woman on her right outer arm, right forearm and left thigh, causing bruises.

The incident is said to have happened at Prince George's Park Residences.

When contacted by The Straits Times, NUS would not comment if Kim is still a student of the university, saying the case is now before the courts.

Kim is one of several students from local tertiary institutions who have appeared in court in recent months over various offences.

One of them, Singapore Management University (SMU) student Lee Yan Ru, allegedly outraged a woman's modesty on campus on Jan 8 last year.

The woman, who is studying at another university, cannot be named because of a gag order.

Lee, now 24, has claimed trial and his case is still pending.

Related Story SMU molestation trial: Alleged victim said she had stress disorder and was prescribed Xanax after ordeal

Related Story NTU student expelled after allegedly recording video of woman showering on campus

He remains an SMU student, pending the outcome of the court trial and the university's disciplinary proceedings, the university said.

In January, former Nanyang Technological University (NTU) student Han Shiyu, 18, was sentenced to a short detention order of two weeks after he trespassed into a female toilet at a residential hall to film a fellow student who was in the shower.

Those given a short detention order are put behind bars for a short time, but will not have a criminal record after their release.

The Chinese national committed the offence on Aug 12 last year and was expelled soon after by NTU.

Kim's case has been adjourned to Oct 7.

Offenders convicted of assault can be jailed for up to two years and fined up to $5,000.","{'neg': 0.228, 'neu': 0.756, 'pos': 0.016, 'compound': -0.9985}"
10,SMU molestation trial: Alleged victim says she had stress disorder ...,11 months ago,"The woman was testifying on the second day of Lee Yan Ru's molestation trial. Lee, now 24, is accused of molesting the woman, then 21,...",https://www.tnp.sg/news/singapore/alleged-victim-said-she-had-stress-disorder-after-molestation,"Lee Yan Ru allegedly stimulated himself while kneeling over the woman, who was asleep.

A woman who accused a Singapore Management University (SMU) student of molesting her on campus told a district court yesterday that she consulted a psychologist after her ordeal and was told she had ""astute stress disorder"".

She also went to see a general practitioner who prescribed to her Xanax, which is used to treat anxiety disorders.

The woman was testifying on the second day of Lee Yan Ru's molestation trial.

Lee, now 24, is accused of molesting the woman, then 21, at SMU's School of Economics and Social Sciences at around 6.30am on Jan 8 last year.

The woman, who is studying at another university, cannot be named because of a gag order.

She got to know Lee on social media platform Instagram around December 2018 and they had mutual friends.

On Jan 8 last year, she met Lee outside the university's School of Economics and Social Sciences at around 1am for a study session and they went to a classroom.

The woman had earlier testified that while they were in the room, Lee committed acts such as placing his foot on her thigh several times.

She had also told the court that Lee groped her at around 4am and she prised his fingers off.

When Deputy Public Prosecutor Andre Chong asked her on Monday why she did not leave, she replied: ""I did not want to leave a bad impression or make him feel bad. I didn't want to make things hostile.""

STIMULATED HIMSELF

Lee allegedly stimulated himself about two hours later while he was kneeling over the woman, who was asleep. She alerted the police at 6.37am.

Yesterday, the woman told District Judge Sharmila Sripathy that after committing the offence, Lee took out some tissue paper to wipe her.

DPP Chong had earlier said that the Health Sciences Authority's DNA Profiling Laboratory found that the tissue paper contained Lee's body fluids.

Swabs taken from the woman's neck and face also gave similar results.

The woman testified yesterday that after the incident, she would push her boyfriend away whenever he came near as it was ""like a reflex thing"".

She said they broke up last week.

She also could not sleep for a few days after the alleged offences and had difficulty focusing in school.

Responding to queries from DPP Chong, she added that she later failed one module.

She also said she consumed Xanax ""a few days back"". The trial continues today.","{'neg': 0.1, 'neu': 0.849, 'pos': 0.05, 'compound': -0.972}"
11,SMU student accused of molesting woman in study room on campus,20 months ago,"Lee Yan Ru, 23, faces a single charge of outraging the woman's modesty and is out on bail of $5,000. He is accused of rubbing his exposed...",https://www.tnp.sg/news/singapore/smu-student-accused-molesting-woman-study-room-campus,"A Singapore Management University (SMU) student was taken to court last Friday after he allegedly molested a 21-year-old woman in a study room on campus early this year.

Lee Yan Ru, 23, faces a single charge of outraging the woman's modesty and is out on bail of $5,000.

He is accused of rubbing his exposed genitals against her chest in a third-level study room at SMU's School of Economics and Social Sciences at around 6.30am on Jan 8.

The case was first reported by The New Paper and Lee was identified as a business student.

He was arrested on campus after the police were alerted to the case at 6.35am.

The alleged victim, who posted about the alleged incident on social media, was a psychological science undergraduate but was not an SMU student, The Straits Times reported.

She cannot be named to protect her identity.

In an earlier statement, SMU said the case was being taken seriously and it had embarked on its own internal inquiry.

Lee's case has been adjourned to Jan 20 next year. If convicted, he can be jailed for up to two years and fined or caned.

In a separate case, a Japanese teacher at an education centre was yesterday jailed for 24 days and fined $15,000 for taking an upskirt video of a 25-year-old woman and possessing 30 obscene films.

Shohei Yamamoto, 33, will spend 20 more days in prison as he could not pay the fine.

The victim, who cannot be named to protect her identity, had boarded a North-East Line train at Boon Keng MRT station on June 29 at about 9.30am.

When he boarded the same train at Potong Pasir MRT station, Yamamoto noticed her and formed the intention to insult her modesty by taking an upskirt video of her.

He then moved close to the woman, placed his phone on top of his briefcase with the camera facing upwards, and moved the briefcase beneath her skirt.

But the woman felt a brush on her left calf, looked down, and saw the phone.

She confronted Yamamoto after they alighted at Dhoby Ghaut MRT station and demanded to check his phone.

He refused and fled.

The woman gave chase but could not catch up so she reported it to the station master, who called the police.

Yamamoto was later traced and arrested. By that time, he had deleted the upskirt video and it could not be recovered.

But a digital forensic examination of Yamamoto's laptop and a second mobile phone recovered 30 obscene video files.

For insulting a woman's modesty, he could have been jailed for up to a year, fined, or both.

For possessing an obscene film, he could have been fined up to $20,000, jailed for up to six months, or both.","{'neg': 0.341, 'neu': 0.643, 'pos': 0.016, 'compound': -0.9998}"
12,Who is Making Asian American Pacific Islander History in 2021,3 months ago,"Xiao Zhen Xie is a 75-year-old Asian American woman who fought off an ... I nominate our board: Rebecca Lee, Jill Yu, Belinda Lei, Ru Bhatt,...",https://abcnews.go.com/GMA/News/making-asian-american-pacific-islander-history-2021-gma/story%3Fid%3D76523380,,"{'neg': 0.0, 'neu': 0.0, 'pos': 0.0, 'compound': 0.0}"
13,The Asia-Pacific Arbitration Review 2022,2 months ago,"Between 1991 and 1996, Uzbekistan signed 24 bilateral investment ... with the claimant being from Russia and the respondent being from...",https://globalarbitrationreview.com/review/the-asia-pacific-arbitration-review/2022/article/tashkent-international-arbitration-centre-uzbekistans-new-arbitral-institution,"In summary

Uzbekistan is fast developing to become a prominent international arbitration forum in the Commonwealth of Independent States (CIS) region and globally. Tashkent International Arbitration Centre (TIAC) launched in April 2019 and is front and centre of this development. Having gained a significant caseload in its early operations, TIAC is expanding to reach arbitration users from all parts of the world. This is reflected in various initiatives, such as the development of technology disputes rules, the establishment of the Uzbek Arbitration Week and the initiation of educational programmes to share knowledge about arbitration and promote cooperation between TIAC, other arbitration institutions and national courts.

Discussion points

Arbitration in Uzbekistan

Introduction to TIAC and its launch

TIAC’s statistics, collaboration efforts and initiatives to date

Enforcement of arbitral awards in Uzbekistan

Referenced in this article

2018 Uzbek Presidential Decree on the Establishment of TIAC

2006 Uzbek Law on Domestic Arbitration Courts

2012 Resolution of the Supreme Commercial Court of Uzbekistan

2018 Uzbek Code of Economic Procedure

2018 Uzbek Code of Civil Procedure

UNCITRAL Model Law on International Commercial Arbitration

2021 Uzbek Law on International Commercial Arbitration

In 2018, the Tashkent International Arbitration Centre (TIAC) was founded by a Decree of the President of the Republic of Uzbekistan (the Decree). Pursuant to the Decree, TIAC was granted Uzbekistan’s national mandate to set up and implement state-of-the-art dispute resolution services for the business community in Uzbekistan, the CIS region and further abroad. In TIAC’s foundation, specific emphasis is placed on international commercial and investor-state arbitrations, including disputes at the frontiers of law and technology addressing matters such as artificial intelligence, blockchain and other disruptive technologies. Over the past three years, much work has gone into getting TIAC up and running. Led by the director, Ms Diana Bayzakova, one of Uzbekistan’s four nominated arbitrators on the ICSID Panel of Arbitrators, TIAC officially launched in April 2019. During the time from launch up to the present, TIAC has received 22 requests for arbitration and handled two applications for emergency arbitration.

In this article, the authors seek to share with the wider international arbitration community a brief introduction of arbitration in Uzbekistan, the development of TIAC and its present initiatives, as well as an analysis of Uzbekistan as an arbitration-friendly forum. The most recent and significant development in the field of arbitration in Uzbekistan came about on 16 February 2021, when the President of Uzbekistan, Shavkat Mirziyoyev, signed Uzbekistan’s new Law on International Commercial Arbitration (the New ICA Law), which will enter into force on 16 August 2021. Through the New ICA Law, Uzbekistan’s laws on arbitration will align with the UNCITRAL Model Law on International Commercial Arbitration (the UNCITRAL Model Law).

Introduction to arbitration in Uzbekistan

Alternative dispute resolution in Uzbekistan has a long history. Historically, the people of Uzbekistan have regularly sought to refer their disputes for resolution by an elder person of their community known as an aqsaqal (literally translated as ‘white beard’). Aqsaqal (basically, an informal arbitrator or conciliator) would hear disputants and give their views based on their wisdom, and parties would abide by these views. During the Soviet era, Uzbekistan was part of the USSR and reflected the system of courts and arbitration established in the Soviet Union. After Uzbekistan declared independence from the Soviet Union in 1991, the custom of dispute resolution through the use of aqsaqal rather than formal court systems continued and now they also act as conciliators as part of the mandatory dispute prevention procedures for family disputes.

Uzbekistan’s economy started to pick up as the country was undergoing the transition and the levels of internal and external trade began to grow. In 1995 Uzbekistan became a contracting state to the Washington Convention on the Settlement of Investment Disputes Between States and Nationals of Other States (the ICSID Convention). In February 1996, the New York Convention on the Recognition and Enforcement of Foreign Arbitral Awards (the New York Convention) entered into force in Uzbekistan. Between 1991 and 1996, Uzbekistan signed 24 bilateral investment treaties (BITs), with various countries around the world. This number has been steadily increasing. Today, Uzbekistan is party to over 50 BITs. In addition, Uzbekistan has also signed the international treaties on mutual legal assistance, many of which cover issues of enforcement of arbitral awards.

Uzbekistan is a civil law jurisdiction. Thus, its legal framework comprises the laws enacted by the parliament and by-laws enacted by the executive branch. The decisions made by Uzbek local courts do not have precedential value. However, since 1996, the Supreme Court of Uzbekistan has been issuing resolutions for explanatory and clarification purposes for judges, and these resolutions are binding in nature.

On 16 October 2006, Uzbekistan passed the Law on Domestic Arbitration Courts (the 2006 Law on Domestic Arbitration). This Law sought to comprehensively regulate domestic arbitrations in Uzbekistan. Over nine chapters and 59 articles, it addressed the issues of the scope of arbitrable disputes (Chapter 2), domestic arbitrators (Chapter 3), costs of arbitration (Chapter 4) and various other matters, such as procedures for arbitration, arbitral awards, and challenges and enforcement (Chapters 5 to 8). Pursuant to article 10 of the Law, domestic arbitration courts are allowed to resolve disputes between parties in accordance with Uzbek law. However, issues such as the participation of foreign arbitrators and the application of foreign law are expressly prohibited.

In 2012, the Supreme Commercial Court of Uzbekistan passed a resolution ‘on some issues of application of legislation in considering the cases related to domestic arbitration by economic courts’, which set out guidance for Uzbek courts in interpreting the Uzbek Code of Economic Procedure and the 2006 Law on Domestic Arbitration. This resolution addressed issues such as the annulment or rejection of domestic arbitral awards, procedures for parties’ entry into settlement agreements and the interpretation of domestic arbitration agreements.

In 2016, the changes in the government of Uzbekistan brought about significant political and economic reforms. Rising levels of economic growth and trade rendered it increasingly important for Uzbekistan to be recognised as an arbitration-friendly jurisdiction. The government considered adopting an Uzbek law on international arbitration based on the UNCITRAL Model Law.

In 2018, Uzbekistan adopted its Code of Economic Procedure (CEP) and updated its Code of Civil Procedure (CCP). Chapters 28 and 29 of the CEP set out rules in relation to the challenge and enforcement of domestic arbitral awards, and Chapter 33 addressed the recognition and enforcement of foreign arbitral awards and foreign judicial decisions. Chapter 42 of the CCP set out civil procedure rules concerning the recognition and enforcement of both domestic and foreign arbitral awards.

In parallel with the above, a draft of Uzbekistan’s New ICA Law was developed. On 11 September 2020, the Senate of Uzbekistan approved the second draft of the Law. As indicated above, the New ICA Law is recognised by UNCITRAL as being compliant with the Model Law, and it was signed by the President in February 2021. By adopting the New ICA Law, Uzbekistan seeks to demonstrate its potential to become known as an arbitration­-friendly jurisdiction on the global arbitration map.

As Uzbekistan is presently undergoing its transition from being a country with no formal legislation on international arbitration into an UNCITRAL Model Law jurisdiction, TIAC is now involved as a core institution in capacity-building efforts for local legal practitioners and judges, as well as in amendments of existing legislation via ancillary laws.

Introduction to TIAC

The Decree is the cornerstone of TIAC. The preamble to the Decree states:

In order to create the most favourable investment climate in the country, comprehensive measures are being implemented to liberalise the economy, create favourable legal conditions for the activities of investors, especially foreign ones, as well as strengthen international economic ties. Of particular importance is the introduction in Uzbekistan of a mechanism for resolving disputes in arbitration . . .

The Decree provided for the establishment of TIAC as an independent international arbitral institution. This was a major step for the development of international arbitration in Uzbekistan. Before 2018, there were many domestic arbitration institutions in Uzbekistan offering services based on the 2006 Law on Domestic Arbitration. These institutions handled thousands of cases each year, but their services were confined to purely Uzbek disputes. Between 2006 and 2018, an exponential growth in domestic arbitration created an impetus for the Uzbek government to set up an international arbitral institution.

The Decree did not just set up TIAC. It also contained many significant changes and incentives designed specifically to promote international arbitration under the TIAC Rules of Arbitration. For instance, according to the Decree:

parties to a dispute are now allowed to engage foreign arbitrators to resolve their disputes;

arbitrating parties can resolve their disputes in accordance with the substantive laws of other jurisdictions, and not only the laws of Uzbekistan;

local courts are to assist arbitrators in granting interim relief, in the collection of evidence and in the enforcement of arbitral awards;

no VAT charges are applicable for arbitration services rendered by TIAC;

foreign arbitrators’ fees are exempted from income tax for their services rendered under the TIAC Rules of Arbitration;

there will be no licensing requirements for foreign advocates or counsel willing to act in arbitral proceedings in accordance with the TIAC Rules of Arbitration and in court proceedings related to challenges of arbitral awards in Uzbek courts; and

smart arbitration, or the conduct of arbitration hearings and other procedural meetings online, is expressly allowed.

Some of these changes create a legal environment in Uzbekistan that is friendly to international arbitration at a level comparable to states that have a reputation as well-established arbitration forums. For instance, the changes to allow the involvement of foreign arbitrators, the use of foreign law, and judicial assistance in relation to interim measures and enforcement fall into this category. The other changes in the list, however, are more innovative in nature and seek to assist users to easily and seamlessly adopt the framework for dispute resolution under the TIAC Rules of Arbitration. For instance, the exemption of VAT charges for TIAC arbitration services, the exemption of income tax for foreign arbitrators’ fees and the waiver of the licensing requirements for foreign counsel to act not just in arbitral proceedings in Uzbekistan but also in arbitration-related court proceedings in Uzbek courts, all seek to make TIAC an attractive choice for arbitration users in Uzbekistan and in the wider CIS region.

Additionally, TIAC has implemented a zero-admin fee policy for its administration of arbitrations. This seeks to promote access to justice and to make the choice of TIAC arbitration a means for contracting parties to save on costs in their dispute resolution processes. Notably, despite the zero-admin fee policy, TIAC as an institution is independent and does not receive any financing from the Uzbek government. The institution maintains its operations through fees generated from other avenues, such as memberships, training programmes and events.

TIAC has also implemented strict ‘no conflict of interest’ rules. For instance, members of TIAC’s Court of Arbitration or Secretariat and the TIAC director and other TIAC employees are not permitted to serve as arbitrators in arbitrations under the TIAC Rules of Arbitration during their term of service. This measure exceeds the standards for assessing conflict of interest set out in the IBA Guidelines on Conflict of Interest, and it has been taken to allow TIAC to maintain the strictest standards of impartiality, independence and neutrality as its operations gather momentum.

TIAC’s caseload statistics

The 22 requests for arbitration and the two applications for emergency arbitrations that TIAC has received so far cover various types of disputes and industry sectors, including construction and real estate, sale of goods, agriculture, and oil and gas. All these cases are international in nature, with at least one party not being from Uzbekistan. Notably, in one of the more recent requests for arbitration that the TIAC registered, both parties were foreign, with the claimant being from Russia and the respondent being from Singapore. Thus far, parties in arbitrations commenced under the TIAC Rules of Arbitration have come from Uzbekistan, Kazakhstan, Russia, China (mainland China and Hong Kong), Turkey, Italy, the Netherlands, Singapore, the Philippines and Moldova.

The caseload of TIAC so far broadly matches Uzbekistan’s foreign trade profile. From 2020 statistics, the top five trading partners of Uzbekistan in terms of total trade volume (both import and export) are China, Russia, Kazakhstan, South Korea and Turkey. To take China and Russia as examples, from January to December 2020, total Uzbek–China trade volume was US$6.43 billion (comprising US$1.93 billion in exports and US$4.5 billion in imports), and total Uzbek–Russian trade volume was US$5.64 billion (comprising US$1.47 billion in exports and US$4.17 billion in imports). Other major trading partners are Kyrgyzstan, Germany, Afghanistan, the Czech Republic and Turkmenistan. Besides these countries, Uzbekistan’s BITs also cover trade with countries such as Saudi Arabia, Japan, Singapore, France and the United Kingdom.

To handle a wide variety of disputes concerning various parts of the globe, TIAC has assembled a diverse and international panel of arbitrators consisting of a main panel of arbitrators, which comprises senior and well-reputed arbitration practitioners, and a reserve panel of arbitrators, which comprises younger and rising members of the profession. Geographically, the arbitrators currently listed in TIAC’s main and reserve panels hail from the Middle East and North Africa (26 per cent), the CIS region (24 per cent), Europe (12 per cent) and the Asia-Pacific (8 per cent). Fourteen per cent are from the United States and 16 per cent from the United Kingdom. TIAC aims to maintain diversity in areas such as geography, cultural background, linguistic background, gender and ethnicity in the opportunities that it builds and supports. This is based on a firm belief that such efforts are critical for making international arbitration a truly international and inclusive form of dispute resolution, usable and accessible by parties and disputants regardless of location or background.

TIAC’s second year in operation, 2020, was marked by the covid-19 pandemic. The government of Uzbekistan, like many other governments worldwide, imposed strict quarantine measures and travel restrictions. TIAC’s operations, however, were not negatively impacted. As trade goes on, dispute resolution services go on as well. As a new and modern arbitral institution, TIAC primarily accepts and administers cases virtually. In fact, TIAC has successfully handled two emergency arbitration cases in the midst of the pandemic virtually. To assist in expediting arbitral proceedings and to promote cybersecurity, TIAC is presently implementing new hearing platform options into its day-to-day operations and case administrations.

TIAC’s cooperation with other international arbitration institutions

TIAC is keen on working closely with the international arbitration community worldwide to promote arbitration in Uzbekistan and the CIS region. Although TIAC is a young institution, it is ready to share information and learn from the experiences of foreign partners. Since TIAC’s launch in 2019, it has concluded various memorandums of understanding (MOUs) with arbitration and dispute resolution institutions globally. These institutions include the Hong Kong International Arbitration Centre, the Vienna International Arbitration Centre (VIAC), the Astana International Financial Centre, the Florence International Mediation Chamber, and the China International Economic and Trade Arbitration Commission.

Under these various MOUs, TIAC and the corresponding institutions have agreed to cooperate in promoting the use of arbitration and other alternative dispute resolution methods for the purposes of international commercial transactions, in the recommendation of arbitrators, in research and development programmes and training, and in the exchange of information of mutual interest as may be available in relation to arbitration, trade and investment. TIAC is hopeful that its cooperative efforts will help in facilitating cross-border integration of arbitration services and the promotion of joint activities for the development of arbitration worldwide.

Enforcement of international arbitral awards in Uzbekistan

Enforcement of international arbitral awards is conducted by the state economic courts of Uzbekistan. As Uzbekistan is a party to the New York Convention, the recognition and enforcement procedure is governed by article IV thereof and this procedure is reflected in article 251 of the CEP. To seek recognition and enforcement of an arbitral award, it would be necessary for an applicant to submit to the court a standard set of documents, including the originals or duly certified (ie, notarised and apostilled as necessary) copies of an arbitration agreement and an arbitral award. If enforcement of an arbitral award is granted, the court will issue a writ of execution. Awards that have been set aside at the seat of arbitration cannot be recognised or enforced in Uzbekistan.

In recent years, the courts of Uzbekistan have granted the majority of applications seeking to recognise and enforce international arbitral awards. An analysis of the relevant case law available for 2017–2020 shows that a refusal to recognise and enforce an international arbitral award is typically due to deficiencies in an award matching the grounds for refusal under the New York Convention.

A review of the most recent cases shows an arbitration-friendly and largely pro-enforcement attitude among the Uzbek courts. Over the past three years, Uzbek courts recognised and enforced awards rendered in proceedings administered by international arbitration centres such as the International Court of Arbitration of the International Chamber of Commerce, VIAC, the International Commercial Arbitration Court at the Chamber of Commerce and Industry of the Russian Federation (ICAC) and others. Without going into detail of each of the cases, a few notable observations are set out below.

For example, in Masterrind GmbH v LLC Grand Milk, concerning enforcement of a VIAC award, the court rejected the defendant’s arguments that it had not been duly notified of the arbitration and its attorney had not been properly authorised. The court also did not agree to put the proceedings on hold until resolution of the parallel Uzbek court proceedings concerning the same agreement that gave rise to the arbitration in VIAC.

In KEGOC v Uzbekenergo, the court rejected the defendant’s (which notably is a state-owned entity) allegations that an ICAC award had been unreasonable, in violation of procedural norms. The defendant’s case was that the tribunal lacked jurisdiction as the delay interest was awarded under the additional agreements to the underlying contract between the parties, which had by then expired. Without going into the merits of the award, the court rejected the defendant’s arguments and granted the application to recognise and enforce the award.

In Grundfos Kazakhstan v Muborak, the court refused to enforce a foreign arbitral award based on evidence of a failure of the applicant to provide proof that the defendant had been notified about the arbitration. The court found that the delivery record from the postal company did not contain the date, the reference number and the information on the recipient. The court’s ruling was then upheld on appeal.

To support arbitration in Uzbekistan, TIAC has been negotiating with the Supreme Court of Uzbekistan to sign a memorandum of collaboration (MOC) and these negotiations are now in the advanced stages. The MOC aims to establish an expedited and facilitated framework for recognition and enforcement of arbitral awards and orders issued in TIAC arbitrations. The MOC is expected to set all-encompassing goals, such as:

cooperation for the effective enforcement of arbitral awards in Uzbekistan;

promotion and development of international arbitration and other forms of alternative dispute resolution; and

assistance in the formation of a favourable investment climate and the business environment in Uzbekistan.

The MOC will also provide for a number of options for the courts to assist with arbitration. For example, in considering applications:

for interim measures in support of arbitrations;

for assistance in obtaining evidence; and

to recognise and enforce arbitral awards, etc.

According to the MOC, TIAC is going to co-organise educational seminars for the economic court judges in relation to legislation of Uzbekistan regulating international arbitration. There are also other forms of cooperation anticipated between TIAC and the Uzbek courts, including amicus curiae type advice to be provided to courts, holding joint events and joint research activities, and exchange of best practices.

Initiatives of TIAC

TIAC has introduced a number of initiatives that not only seek to promote international arbitration in Uzbekistan and inform the global arbitration community about Uzbekistan as an attractive seat, but also aim to more broadly benefit users of arbitration from all over the globe.

Draft rules for technology disputes

Disputes in the field of high-end technology require particular qualifications from the parties, the arbitrators and the arbitration institutions. A trend in the further technologisation of the economy is easily recognisable, and many arbitral institutions increasingly encounter technology disputes that warrant special attention.

For these reasons, TIAC, jointly with the Organising Committee members of the Nikonov Tech Moot, developed the draft TIAC Rules of Arbitration for Technology Disputes (the TIAC Tech Rules) for possible consideration by the TIAC Supervisory Board. The TIAC Tech Rules are planned to be tested in the first international Nikonov Tech Moot scheduled for September 2021.

The Nikonov Tech Moot will be a unique opportunity for students and arbitration practitioners to get involved in a variety of advanced technology matters, such as artificial intelligence, cybersecurity and other complex issues.

Uzbek Arbitration Week

TIAC and the Chamber of Commerce and Industry of Uzbekistan are co-organising the inaugural Uzbek Arbitration Week on 6–10 September 2021. The event will be conducted in a hybrid mode allowing both remote and in-person participation for speakers and attendees.

Among other things, the Uzbek Arbitration Week will feature the following events:

the fourth meeting of the TIAC Supervisory Board;

general and final rounds of the Nikonov Tech Moot; and

a flagship conference: ‘Ubekistan as a favourable seat for arbitral proceedings in the CIS region and beyond’.

The hybrid events will be organised with support from the government. Uzbek governmental and quasi-governmental organisations and entities are expected to take part in the various sessions. The Uzbek Arbitration Week will have a global reach.

TIAC45 Young Practitioners Group

TIAC45 was launched on 9 March 2021 under the auspices of TIAC and with the support of the TIAC Supervisory Board and the TIAC Court of Arbitration. The aim of TIAC45 is to nurture young arbitration practitioners in the CIS region and globally, and to encourage the use of TIAC services through TIAC45 and TIAC, and TIAC45 events and initiatives. TIAC45 is chaired by Kirsten Teo, with Olga Kim as the vice chair. Other members of the Steering Committee of TIAC45 are Charles Tay, Yan Kalish, Bryan J Brannon, Orlando Cabrera C and Diana Tsutieva.

Educational events for Uzbek judges

TIAC is actively involved in capacity building for Uzbek judges. In cooperation with various organisations and development partners, TIAC is organising a series of training sessions on best enforcement practices.

The team of experts will include internationally recognised professionals working on the frontiers of dispute resolution practices around the globe. Programmes will be delivered through concise closed-group lectures and practical seminars conducted in English. As a result of this initiative, Uzbek judges will not only gain insights into best dispute resolution practices, but also connect with colleagues from various parts of the world.

Draft mediation rules

Arbitration is not the only method of alternative dispute resolution. Mediation is also a popular choice among businesses as an efficient way to settle their differences. Mediation is also known to have good compatibility with arbitration in various forms (eg, arb–med, med–arb, arb–med–arb). That is why TIAC, in cooperation with the Florence International Mediation Chamber and the United States Agency for International Development, initiated the development of a set of mediation rules. TIAC aims to introduce state-of-the-art international mediation services in Uzbekistan and beyond, with a particular emphasis on investor-state mediation.

Given that international mediation has not been introduced into the Uzbek legislation, TIAC is serving as a driving force behind a number of initiatives seeking to introduce international mediation practices and invite foreign mediators to Uzbekistan.

Conclusion

Over the past several years, Uzbekistan has steadily demonstrated its commitment to supporting arbitration as a means of international dispute settlement. Through various incentives, the adoption of the UNCITRAL Model Law and a consistent judicial practice of respecting international arbitration awards, Uzbekistan has been building a friendly environment for international arbitration. TIAC has been set up in this context and is steadily gaining momentum as a choice institution for international dispute resolution services for parties in the country and beyond. As TIAC enters into its third year of operations, it seeks to further consolidate its efforts to establish itself as a truly innovative and inclusive platform for arbitration and other forms of alternative dispute resolution. To assist it in being able to better serve the needs of the global business and arbitration community, across geography, languages, nationalities and cultures, TIAC warmly welcomes the support of all.","{'neg': 0.039, 'neu': 0.836, 'pos': 0.125, 'compound': 0.9999}"
14,Daily roundup: SMU student arrested for aggravated outrage of ...,31 months ago,A student from Singapore Management University (SMU) was arrested on campus ... last month that he's dating 24-year-old actress Lee Sun Bin.,https://www.asiaone.com/world/daily-roundup-smu-student-arrested-aggravated-outrage-modesty-campus-and-other-top-stories,"Stay in the know with a recap of our top stories today.

1. SMU student arrested for aggravated outrage of modesty on campus

A student from Singapore Management University (SMU) was arrested on campus after he allegedly molested a sleeping woman. The business student is alleged to have used criminal force on the woman in the early hours of yesterday... » READ MORE

2. 'You dirty pig': Public not charmed by Chinatown's Chinese New Year decor

Photo: Shin Min Daily News

Some Singaporeans have not been charmed by the pig-shaped lanterns perched at a busy intersection in Chinatown. With bleary eyes and dusty skin folds, they're looking a little too realistic, leading people to call them 'dirty pigs'... » READ MORE

3. Former Tourism Malaysia top official arrested

Photo: The Star/Asia News Network

A former top official of Tourism Malaysia has been arrested by the Malaysian Anti-Corruption Commission (MACC) over funds from the agency involving millions of ringgit. A 32-year-old chief executive officer (CEO) of a Sdn Bhd company was also arrested to assist investigations... » READ MORE

4. Running Man teases epic new episode addressing Lee Kwangsoo-Lee Sunbin relationship

Photos: Instagram

Popular Korean variety show Running Man has gone back to filming since member Lee Kwang Soo confirmed last month that he's dating 24-year-old actress Lee Sun Bin. Producer Lee Hwan Jin shared a quick snap of the cast with fans on Instagram and wrote: ""This week's episode is going to be wild"".... » READ MORE","{'neg': 0.159, 'neu': 0.801, 'pos': 0.039, 'compound': -0.9864}"
15,GE2020: Sengkang residents give reasons they plumped for WP ...,13 months ago,"Only lawyer He Ting Ru, 37, had run in an election before, ... WP's proposal to reduce class sizes to between 20 and 25 students was another...",https://www.todayonline.com/singapore/ge2020-sengkang-residents-give-reasons-why-they-plumped-wp-including-better-connection-candidates,,"{'neg': 0.0, 'neu': 0.0, 'pos': 0.0, 'compound': 0.0}"
16,In Vitro Models for Studying Respiratory Host–Pathogen Interactions,4 months ago,"Human bronchial epithelial cell line from a 1-year old male lung/heart transplant patient. Bronchial epithelial cells. A549, Cell line, Human...",https://onlinelibrary.wiley.com/doi/full/10.1002/adbi.202000624,"In parallel to the growing ethical concerns surrounding animal use in research and their lack of their clinical translatability,[8-10] there has been a surge in the development of technology integrated 3D in vitro models which better reflect the human in vivo lung condition. For example, it is possible to integrate previously static 2D, 2.5D, and 3D models, for example, ALI co-culture, organoids, etc. (as discussed in Section 4) with technological advances such as perfusion chambers[73, 170] and lung-on-chips.[101, 171, 172] Technology integrated biological systems have advanced knowledge surrounding the effect of culturing conditions and model architecture on relevant parameters such as cellular differentiation, immune cell recruitment, and cytokine profile, such that lung models are becoming increasingly, and more accurately, representative of the human condition. Here, we discuss the progression from perfusion bioreactor chambers to microfluidics and sensor integrated lung-on-chips, and how these have advanced our understanding of lung cell culture.

4.1 Lung-on-Chip

With the development of fluidics and commercially available perfusion chambers, it is possible to accelerate the speed of growth, differentiation, and development of 2D lung epithelial ALI models. Indeed, with perfusion systems, ciliogenesis, mucus production, and barrier formation are observed up to 14 days earlier when compared to static culture.[73] Systems such as these enable the fast-track addition of immune co-culture and pathogen infection studies, significantly shortening experimental protocol times without sacrificing the complexity of a 3D ALI model. In parallel, the revolutionary development of microfluidic organ-on-chip technology during the last decade permits the coupling of microfluidics with microsensor technologies. Indeed, in addition to applying effective shear stress and flow, which enhances cellular differentiation,[173] sample preparation, and delivery of nutrients,[101] it is possible to integrate on-chip biosensors such as pH sensors, microscopes, and electrodes.[172, 174] In comparison to traditional culture systems, this enhances the speed of detection, breadth of readout data, device portability, and accelerates the point of care diagnostics.

Organ-on-chips are commonly microfabricated from transparent and biocompatible polymers such as poly(dimethylsiloxane (PDMS) and poly(methlymethacrylate) (PMMA), via soft lithography-based techniques, and consist of multiple layers of cell culture chambers integrated with microfluidic perfusion systems. A pivotal study carried out by Huh and colleagues in 2010 involved the development of a novel actuation system which mimicked breathing in the human lung.[171] This “breathing lung-on-chip” consisted of an upper and lower chamber, separated by a thin porous PDMS membrane. The upper compartment contained human alveolar epithelial cells cultured at air interface, while the lower compartment contained human microvascular endothelial cells co-cultured with human neutrophils under dynamic flow. Together, these compartments represented the alveolar capillary lung unit which, under the application of a vacuum in adjacent chambers, underwent cyclically stretching representative of physiological breathing (Figure 4A). Importantly, this study demonstrated the effect of breathing on enhancing inflammatory and immune signaling in primary co-culture. For example, when exposed to air pollutant extracts, an increase in pro-inflammatory adhesion molecules and reactive oxygen species was observed, when compared to static cell culture. Similar lung-on-chip models, which utilize an actuated micro diaphragm to induce mechanical breathing, also demonstrate a breathing-induced increase in barrier permeability, metabolic activity, and wound healing in lung epithelial cells.[175] These examples highlight the importance of representing in vivo like breathing forces when assessing the extent of inflammation and immune cell activation that an airborne particle, pathogen, or drug candidate could have. Additionally, improvements in design and fabrication methods permit passive, rather than active, perfusion of chips. This reduces the need for additional external equipment and tubing, while improving reproducibility.[176] Modern chip technology is also becoming increasingly compatible with standard characterization methods such as TEER, enzyme linked absorbency assays (ELISA), and permeability assays,[176] making their integration into mainstream laboratories more amenable.

Figure 4 Open in figure viewer PowerPoint [ 171 ] Copyright 2010, AAAS. B) Anatomically inspired microfluidic acini-on-chip featuring an asymmetrical bipurification model of distal airways (blue arrows) and air-ducts (red arrows). Reproduced with permission.[ 177 ] Copyright 2019, Wiley. C) A microbial culture insert is inoculated with A. fumigatus on the left and P. aeruginosa on the right, facilitating volatile factor contact between the microbial cultures and air-exposed center lumens lined with bronchiolar epithelial cells. Scale bar is 250 µm. Reproduced with permission.[ 168 ] Copyright 2017, Nature Publishing Group. D) Effect of E Cigarette Emissions on Tracheal cells monitored at ALI using an organic electrochemical transistor. Integration of an ALI airway epithelium model into a flexible gate-OECT platform for ALI resistance sensing, which conforms to the cell secreted mucus. Reproduced with permission.[ 178 ] Copyright 2019, Wiley. Examples of advanced technology integrated in vitro models of the lung showing A) mechanical actuation, B) complex microfluidic airway design, C) compartmentalization of lung components and infectious agents and D) advanced electronic monitoring of ALI culture. A) Compartmentalized PDMS microchannels form the alveolar-capillary barrier. The device recreates physiological breathing movements by applying vacuum to the side chambers and causing mechanical stretching of the PDMS membrane. Reproduced with permission.Copyright 2010, AAAS. B) Anatomically inspired microfluidic acini-on-chip featuring an asymmetrical bipurification model of distal airways (blue arrows) and air-ducts (red arrows). Reproduced with permission.Copyright 2019, Wiley. C) A microbial culture insert is inoculated withon the left andon the right, facilitating volatile factor contact between the microbial cultures and air-exposed center lumens lined with bronchiolar epithelial cells. Scale bar is 250 µm. Reproduced with permission.Copyright 2017, Nature Publishing Group. D) Effect of E Cigarette Emissions on Tracheal cells monitored at ALI using an organic electrochemical transistor. Integration of an ALI airway epithelium model into a flexible gate-OECT platform for ALI resistance sensing, which conforms to the cell secreted mucus. Reproduced with permission.Copyright 2019, Wiley.

In another study, focusing on the effect of smoking induced respiratory inflammation and disease progression, a novel multi-compartment robotic smoking machine was microengineered.[103] This replicated all major aspects of physiological breathing including mechanical inhalation of smoke, controlled respiration parameters (respiration cycle, puff time, and inter puff interval), and flow rate over an air interfaced lung-on-chip. Compared to traditional exposure protocols, which deposit cigarette smoke extracts on top of cell culture, this study applied whole cigarette smoke under physiologically flow. This novel protocol revealed novel disease specific molecular signatures, potentially useful for future biomarker and drug target studies. Additionally, this study gave a detailed insight into smoke-induced changes in ciliary beat frequency distribution, which may be linked to reduced mucociliary clearance observed in smokers. With advances in fabrication methods, it is also possible to create complex 3D microchannel networks, within lab-on-chip systems. Indeed, Schnirman and colleagues[177] fabricated an anatomically inspired microfluidic model, mimicking the bifurcation networks of human alveolar tree structures which matched functional residue capacity values of pediatric populations (Figure 4B). Although complex structural models such as these are technically challenging to implement, they are fundamental in replicating and simultaneously studying the full breadth of cell types present in all parts of the airway. Models such those described above more fully recapitulate the human condition compared to traditional cell models and, although difficult to implement, are essential in reducing animal research and drug attrition rates.

Biomimetic 3D lung-on-chip models have also been increasingly applied to the study of pathogen invasion, disease-associated inflammation, host–pathogen interaction, and therapeutic treatment of novel infectious agents. Unlike traditional in vitro models of pathogen invasion, which involve the direct measurement of pathogen-induced effects upon epithelial layers, chip systems are able to physically compartmentalize and connect different cell and microbial populations. Thus, it is possible to study more complex interactions between the host and pathogen under physiological flow. It is also possible study the communication that occurs between the lung ECM, immune system, and circulating volatile compounds at ALI. Indeed, Barkal and colleagues[168] microengineered an innovative bronchiole-on-chip device which contained a central airway lumen and adjacent endothelial lumens connected via a fibroblast-collagen matrix (Figure 4C). A separate ”clickable” module, seeded with compartmentalized infectious microbials, was attached to the main lung unit. This was used to study pathogen-derived volatiles on the respiratory epithelium. In this instance, co-infection with the fungal and bacterial agents A. fumigatus and P. aeruginosa, respectively, was shown with hyphae extensions and leukocyte migration clearly observed at the site of infection (Figure 4C(III)). Lung-on-chip devices have also been used to study lung epithelial permeability[172, 175] and single-strain pathogen infection.[171, 163] Pathogen-induced effects on lung epithelial permeability may be measured via TEER or passage of fluorescently labelled molecules through the epithelium.[172, 179] Additionally, cell effluent can be collected and assayed via ELISA or PCR for relative change in cytokine profile.[163] In the case of co-culture, immune cell migration to the site of infection may be observed via high resolution and real-time microscopy imaging.[171]

As well as modelling inflammation and immune recruitment in healthy lungs, lung-on-chip devices are also used to model pathogen induced exacerbations in lung disease.[63, 64] Diseased phenotypes may be modeled by directly culturing primary cells from diseased patients or alternatively, inflammation can be induced by stimulating cells with inflammatory proteins or cytokines implicated in disease pathology. For example, allergenic asthma-like lung inflammation can be induced with the cytokine IL-13, which is known to induce airway-hyperresponsiveness and goblet cell hyperplasia in vivo.[73, 158] These models can also be used as drug discovery platforms by applying novel therapeutics to microchannels and measuring effects on epithelial cell composition, function, and cytokine profile. Studies such as these, illustrate the importance of modelling complex aspects of the in vivo lung environment, such as physiological flow rate and breathing-induced mechanical strain. Organ-on-chip technology paves the way for portable, multi-parametric, and simultaneous assay platforms, which increasingly makes the study of respiratory pathogens in healthy and diseased human airways more efficient and accessible.","{'neg': 0.012, 'neu': 0.91, 'pos': 0.078, 'compound': 0.9983}"
17,Mechanism of Tetrandrine Against Endometrial Cancer - DDDT ...,2 months ago,"Department of Traditional Chinese Medicine, Zibo Maternal and Child ... In recent years, many studies have revealed that tetrandrine has...",https://www.dovepress.com/mechanism-of-tetrandrine-against-endometrial-cancer-based-on-network-p-peer-reviewed-fulltext-article-DDDT,"Introduction

Endometrial cancer (EC) is one of the most common gynaecological malignancies. According to statistics from the American Cancer Society in 2021, endometrial cancer is increasing in both incidence and mortality.1 Surgical treatment is the mainstay for initial management of endometrial cancer; chemotherapy and hormone therapy are the main treatments for women with advanced and recurrent disease.2 In clinical applications, compared with traditional chemotherapy drugs with obvious adverse effects, traditional Chinese medicine (TCM) offers the advantages of high efficacy and low toxicity.3 As an interesting research hotspot, TCM can possibly regulate oncogenes and tumour suppressor genes, epigenetic modifications, microenvironments, and cancer stem cells.4 In recent decades, increasing numbers of cancer patients have used TCM as an alternative therapy.

Tetrandrine (Tet) is a bisbenzylisoquinoline (BBI) alkaloid that is extracted from Stephania tetrandra S. Moor, a member of Menispermaceae.5 In addition, tetrandrine has a variety of pharmacological activities, including antitumour, anti-inflammatory, immunosuppressant, antiallergic, anticancer, and antioxidant activities.6 In recent years, many studies have revealed that tetrandrine has anticancer effects on various tumours, such as cervical cancer, nasopharyngeal cancer, breast cancer, colon cancer, oral cancer and prostate cancer.7–12 However, the effect and mechanism of tetrandrine on EC have not been reported thus far.

Network pharmacology approaches differ from conventional drug discovery by addressing the ability of drugs to target numerous proteins or networks that are involved in a disease.13 In drug discovery, network pharmacology approaches are increasingly being developed and applied.14 Moreover, this approach effectively bridges the gap between modern medicine and TCM.15

Hence, we identified the key gene targets and signalling pathways of tetrandrine against EC by using network pharmacology approaches. Afterwards, we validated the predictions by using a series of in vitro assays. All procedures used in this report are shown in Figure 1.

Figure 1 Workflow for the identification potential mechanism of tetrandrine in treating endometrial cancer.

Materials and Methods

Drug and Disease Targets Identification

The target proteins of tetrandrine were obtained from the TCMSP16, ( https://tcmspw.com/tcmsp.php ), DrugBank ( https://www.drugbank.ca/ ), and PharMapper17–19 ( http://www.lilab-ecust.cn/pharmmapper/ ). The molecular structures of tetrandrine were obtained from PubChem ( https://pubchem.ncbi.nlm.nih.gov/ ). The target proteins that we screened were standardized in UniProt ( http://www.uniprot.org/ ). The target genes associated with endometrial cancer were acquired from GeneCards ( https://www.genecards.org/ ) with relevance scores ≥ 10, and OMIM ( https://omim.org/ ) and DisGeNET ( http://www.disgenet.org/ ) with disease scores ≥ 0.8. The common targets of tetrandrine and EC were identified by using Venny 2.1 ( http://bioinfogp.cnb.csic.es/tools/venny/index.html ).

Protein–Protein Interaction (PPI) Network Construction

STRING is an online database for protein-protein interaction networks. The common targets were input into the STRING database ( https://string-db.org/ ) to generate a protein-protein interaction network, with the species limited to “Homo sapiens” and confidence ranges selected as high confidence (score value > 0.9). Afterwards, the PPI network data were input into Cytoscape3.7.2 to analyse and obtain the core genes. In addition, Cytoscape3.7.2 software was used to construct a “tetrandrine-EC-target” network and to screen hub genes.

Gene Function and Pathway Enrichment Analysis

Gene Ontology (GO) and Kyoto Encyclopedia of Genes and Genomes (KEGG) pathway analyses were performed to analyse the common targets by using WebGestalt ( http://www.webgestalt.org/option.php ). KEGG pathway enrichment analysis ( http://www.genome.jp/kegg/ ) was employed to obtain a pathway map of the core pathway.

Molecular Docking Analysis

The structure of tetrandrine was retrieved from PubChem ( https://pubchem.ncbi.nlm.nih.gov/ ). The Protein Data Bank database was used to retrieve the receptor protein, AKT1 (PDBID: 4EKL). The receptor proteins were dehydrated, and ligands were removed by using PyMOL2.3.4 software. AutoDock tools were used to modify the receptor protein, such as changing the hydrogenation and charge balance. AutoDock Vina 1.1.2 was used to dock the receptor protein with the small molecule ligand. The affinity scores were used to evaluate the binding potential between Akt1 and tetrandrine.

Reagents

Tetrandrine (purity ≥ 98%) was purchased from Aladdin Biochemical Technology Co. (Shanghai, China). Tetrandrine was dissolved in DMSO (Solarbio Science & Technology Co., Beijing, China) and was then added to the cell culture supernatant in appropriate proportions. FBS and tyrosine were obtained from Gibco (Carlsbad, CA, USA). Cell Counting Kit-8 (CCK-8), Hoechst 33258 and Annexin V-PI apoptosis reagents were purchased from Beyotime (Shanghai, China). The TRIzol reagent and qRT-PCR Kit were purchased from Invitrogen (Carlsbad, CA, USA). A cDNA Synthesis Kit was from Takara (Shiga, Japan). The antibodies against Bax, Bcl-2, Akt, p-Akt, and β-actin were purchased from Cell Signalling Technology, Inc. (Danvers, MA, USA). The HRP and FITC goat anti-rabbit antibodies were purchased from Wanleibio Co. (Shenyang, China). The relevant primers were synthesized by Rui Biotech Co. (Qingdao, China).

Cell Culture

The Ishikawa endometrial carcinoma cell line was provided by the Laboratory of Fudan University Affiliated Obstetrics and Gynaecology Hospital. The use of the Ishikawa cell lines was approved by our institutional research ethics committee. The HEC-1-B endometrial carcinoma cell line was obtained from the Shanghai Institute for Biological Sciences. Ishikawa cells were cultured in RPMI-1640 (HyClone, UT, USA), and HEC-1-B cells were cultured in MEM (HyClone, UT, USA), all of which were supplemented with 10% fetal bovine serum and 1% penicillin-streptomycin. Both cell lines were cultured under a humidified atmosphere at 37°C with 5% CO 2 .

Cell Viability Assay

Cell viabilities were determined by CCK-8 assays. The Ishikawa and HEC-1-B cells were seeded into 96-well plates. Then, both cell lines were treated with different tetrandrine concentrations (0, 5, 10, 20, 40, and 80 µM). After 24, 48, and 72 h, a CCK-8 solution was added to each well and then cultured in an incubator for 2 hours. Then, the optical densities were measured at 450 nm by using a microplate reader (Thermo Scientific, MA, USA).

Hoechst 33258 Staining

The Ishikawa and HEC-1B cells were added to 12-well plates and incubated with tetrandrine (0, 10, and 20 µM) for 24 h. The cultured cells were fixed with 4% paraformaldehyde for 30 min and were then washed three times with PBS. Subsequently, the cells were stained with 5 μg/mL Hoechst 33258 for 5 min in the dark and washed with PBS. All samples were observed and photographed with a fluorescence microscope (Olympus, Tokyo, Japan) at ×200.

Cell Apoptosis Assay

Both cell lines were seeded into 6-well plates and treated with 0, 10 µM and 20 µM tetrandrine for 24 h. The cells were washed with PBS, digested by trypsin, centrifuged and collected. Thereafter, the collected cells were resuspended in 100 µL of PBS and stained in the dark with 5 µL of Annexin V and 10 µL of PI for 15 min. The samples were detected by a FACSCalibur flow cytometer (BD Pharmingen, CA, USA) within 1 h after staining.

Quantitative Real-Time Polymerase Chain Reaction (qRT-PCR) Analysis

The Ishikawa and HEC-1B cells were added to 6-well plates and incubated with tetrandrine (0, 10, and 20 µM). After 24 h, total RNA was extracted using TRIzol reagent according to the manufacturer’s instructions. The total RNA concentrations were determined by using an ultra-micro spectrophotometer (DeNovix DS-11, DE, USA). After the quality and concentrations of RNA were determined, cDNA was synthesized with the PrimeScript RT Reagent Kit by following the protocol described by the manufacturer. The mRNA expression levels were quantified using a SYBR Green qPCR Kit on a QuantStudio 3 system (Applied Biosystems, USA). All primers were designed using Primer Premier 5.0 software (Premier Biosoft, www.premierbiosoft.com ). The primer sequences were designed as follows: Bcl-2: forward: 5′-GTGTGTGGAGAGCGTCAACC-3′, reverse: 5′-CAGAGACAGCCAGGGAAATCA-3′; Bax: forward: 5′-GACTGATGTCCCTGTCTCCAG-3′, reverse: 5′-CTCCCGCCACAAAGATGGTC-3′; and Akt: forward: 5′-CTCTTTCCAGACCCACGACC-3′, reverse: 5′- TAATGTGCCCGTCCTTGTCC-3′; β-actin: forward: 5′-ACCGCGAGAAGATGACCCAG-3′, reverse: 5′-GGATAGCACAGCCTGGATAGCAA-3′. The target gene expressions were normalized to the housekeeping gene, β-actin, and were calculated by the 2−ΔΔCt method.

Western Blot Assay

The cells were treated with tetrandrine (0, 10 µM and 20 µM) for 24 h. After washing with PBS, the cells were cleaved by adding 100 µL of RIPA and 1 µL of PMSF. The lysate was centrifuged by high-speed and low-temperature centrifugation. Then, the protein concentrations were measured by the BCA method. Equal amounts of proteins were separated by SDS-PAGE and were transferred onto PVDF membranes. The membranes were blocked in the solution with 5% skimmed milk powder for 2 h. After washing, the membranes were incubated with primary antibodies that were proportionally diluted overnight at 4°C. Then, the membranes were washed three times with TBST and incubated at room temperature with secondary antibodies for 2 h. Finally, the protein bands were observed with an enhanced ECL reagent and an imaging system (Clinx, Shanghai, China). ImageJ software was used to analyse the results.

Immunofluorescence

For immunofluorescence staining, the Ishikawa and HEC-1-B cells were cultured in 12-well plates with coverslips. After treatment with tetrandrine (0, 10, and 20 µM) for 24 h, the cells were fixed with 4% paraformaldehyde in PBS for 15 min. Next, the cells were permeabilized with 0.3% Triton X-100 in PBS for 10 min, and blocked with 10% goat serum in PBS for 1 h. The cells were incubated with p-AKT overnight at 4°C. After washing with PBS three times, the cells were incubated in the dark with the FITC secondary antibody for 2 h. The nuclei were stained with 5 μg/mL Hoechst 33258 for 5 min. The stained samples were washed with PBS three times. Then, the stained coverslips were visualized and photographed with a fluorescence microscope (Olympus, Tokyo, Japan) at ×400.

Statistical Analysis

SPSS 17.0 software was used to analyse the data. All data were expressed as the means±SD. Student’s t-test or one-way analysis of variance (ANOVA) was used to analyse the the differences among groups. Values of P<0.05 were considered to be statistically significant.

Results

Targets of Tetrandrine and EC

The chemical structure of tetrandrine is shown in Figure 2A. A total of 278 targets associated with tetrandrine were retrieved by removing duplicates. From the TCMSP and DrugBank databases, we obtained 17 and 1 direct target, respectively. Using PharmMapper, we predicted 263 potential targets of tetrandrine. To identify the human genes relevant to EC, the GeneCards, OMIM and DisGeNET databases were used. A total of 728 disease targets were obtained from the GeneCards database by setting the relevance score ≥ 10. From the OMIM database, 500 targets were related to EC. Moreover, a total of 1148 targets related to EC were retrieved from the DisGeNET database with a score ≥ 0.8. A total of 2376 targets were obtained from the three databases. However, there were 282 duplicates among the 2376 targets. After the duplicated studies were removed, 2094 targets remained. Subsequently, the targets of tetrandrine and EC were placed into Venny 2.1 to find 111 common targets. The common targets are shown Figure 2B.

Figure 2 (A) Chemical structure of tetrandrine. (B) Venn diagram of tetrandrine targets and endometrial cancer targets.

PPI Network Analysis

The 111 common target genes were input into the STRING database to explore their protein-protein interactions, and a confidence score > 0.9 was selected. As shown in Figure 3A, there were 111 nodes and 392 edges in the interaction network. The STRING data file was imported into Cytoscape for further analysis of the interaction relationships. According to degree ≥ 20, betweenness centrality ≥ 0.04 and closeness centrality ≥ 0.4886, 7 genes were identified that comprised the central genes, which included PIK3R1, AKT1, SCR, HRAS, TP53, MAPK8, and MAPK14 (Figure 3B). Afterwards, the “drug-target-disease” network was described in Figure 3C by Cytoscape3.7.2.

Figure 3 (A) PPI network with the common targets of tetrandrine and endometrial cancer. (B) The 7 core targets in endometrial cancer. (C) “tetrandrine-target-EC” network. Red indicates tetrandrine; Blue indicates drug-disease intersection proteins; Yellow indicates EC.

GO and Pathway Analysis

To further investigate the potential mechanisms of tetrandrine acting on endometrial cancer, GO function and KEGG enrichment analysis were performed with WebGestalt. GO enrichment analysis revealed that the predicted therapeutic targets were mainly associated with 3 biological processes: metabolic processes, responses to stimulus, and biological regulation; 3 cellular components: nucleus, cytosol, membrane enclosed lumen; and 2 molecular functions: protein binding and ion binding (Figure 4A). As revealed in Figure 4B, KEGG pathway analysis showed that the 111 targets were strongly correlated with 10 pathways, including prostate cancer, pancreatic cancer, and the PI3K-Akt signalling pathway. Moreover, the KEGG map showed that the common target genes were mainly distributed in the cancer pathway. The PI3K-Akt signalling pathway (Figure 4C) is a crucial pathway that includes 32 potential therapeutic targets. It is well known that the PI3K/Akt pathway is a critical pathway that is associated with cancer. These findings suggested that tetrandrine may protect against endometrial cancer through the PI3K-Akt pathway. Based on the results of the network analysis, in vitro experiments were designed to verify our prediction.

Figure 4 (A) GO map of putative target genes. (B) Kegg pathway analysis of putative target genes. (C) Kegg map of PI3K/Akt signaling pathway.

Docking Results Analysis

In this study, Akt1 protein and tetrandrine were selected for molecular docking analysis. AutoDock Vina software output the results in the form of affinity. Affinity can be used to evaluate the affinities between ligands and receptor molecules. Generally, an affinity score <-5.0 kcal/mol indicates that the active component has good binding activity with the target. The docking score of Akt1 protein and tetrandrine was −8.0 kcal/mol. The results showed that tetrandrine had good binding activity to Akt1 (Figure 5).

Figure 5 Molecular docking simulation of tetrandrine to Akt1. (A) Holistic Big picture. (B) Local picture.

Tetrandrine Inhibited Endometrial Cancer Cell Proliferation

The CCK-8 assay was carried out to evaluate the cytotoxic effect of tetrandrine on endometrial cancer cell lines. Ishikawa and HEC-1-B cells were treated with different tetrandrine concentrations (0, 5, 10, 20, 40, and 80 µM) for 24, 48, and 72 h. The viability rate of the non-treatment cells (0 µM tetrandrine) was defined as 100%, and the viability rate of cells from all other concentrations of tetrandrine was calculated separately from that of the control group (0 µM tetrandrine). As shown in Figure 6, tetrandrine reduced the viability of both cell lines in dose- and time-dependent manners.

Figure 6 Effect of tetrandrine on the proliferation of Ishikawa and HEC-1-B cells. Both cell lines were treated with tetrandrine (0, 5, 10, 20, 40, and 80μM) for 24, 48, and 72h. The cell viabilities were measured by CCK-8 assay.

Tetrandrine Induced DNA Fragmentation and Apoptosis in Endometrial Cancer Cells

As the microscopy images in Figure 7A show, the blue staining intensities increased and the number of cells was reduced with higher tetrandrine concentrations. These findings indicated that tetrandrine induced nuclear chromatin condensation in the Ishikawa and HEC-1-B cells. To investigate the proapoptotic effect of tetrandrine, we used a flow cytometry assay with Annexin V-FITC/PI double staining. The group that was treated with 0 µM tetrandrine served as the control. As shown in Figure 7B and C, after treatment with tetrandrine (10 and 20 µM) for 24 h, the apoptotic rates of Ishikawa cells were 26.08±3.45, and 37.74±3.47%, respectively, which were significantly higher than that of the control group (7.40±1.70%, P<0.05). For the HEC-1B cells, the apoptotic rates of cells that were treated with tetrandrine (0, 10, and 20 µM) were 6.59±1.44, 25.97±2.35, and 42.67±2.39%, respectively. These data suggested tetrandrine induced apoptosis in Ishikawa and HEC-1-B cells in a dose-dependent manner.

Figure 7 Tetrandrine induced DNA fragmentation and apoptosis in endometrial cancer cells. The Ishikawa and HEC-1-B cells were treated with 0, 10 or 20µM tetrandrine for 24h. (A) Hoechst 33258 staining showed typical apoptotic morphology changes (scale bars: 100 μm). (B) The cell apoptosis was assessed by Annexin V- FITC/PI staining. (C) Histogram analysis showed the percentage of apoptotic. Data were presented as means ± SD (n=3), #P<0.05.

Effect of Tetrandrine on the mRNA and Protein Expressions of Bax and Bcl-2

The qRT-PCR assay showed that the mRNA levels of bcl-2 were decreased and that the mRNA levels of bax markedly increased, as the tetrandrine concentration increased in Ishikawa and HEC-1-B cells (Figure 8A). Then, the protein levels of Bcl-2 and Bax were evaluated by Western blot analysis. As shown in Figure 8B and C, the expression of Bcl-2 was downregulated by tetrandrine (P<0.05), whereas the protein expression of Bax was upregulated (P<0.05).

Figure 8 Effect of tetrandrine on the mRNA and protein expressions of Bax and Bcl-2. The Ishikawa and HEC-1-B cells were treated with 0, 10 or 20 µM tetrandrine for 24 h. (A) The mRNA expression levels of Bax and Bcl-2 were measured by qRT-PCR. (B) The protein expression levels of Bax and Bcl-2 were detected by Western blotting. (C) The relative protein expression of Bax and Bcl-2 were normalized to β-actin. Data were presented as means ± SD (n=3), #P<0.05.

Effect of Tetrandrine on the PI3K/Akt Pathway in Endometrial Cancer Cells

Western blot assay and qRT-PCR were carried out to investigate the mechanism of tetrandrine regulated cell proliferation and apoptosis. PI3K/Akt signalling is commonly disrupted in human cancers, with Akt being a central component of the pathway, which influences multiple processes that are directly involved in tumourigenesis.20 Furthermore, our results predicted that PI3K-Akt signalling may be a key pathway by which tetrandrine protects against endometrial cancer. Hence, we explored the effect of tetrandrine on Akt expression. The qRT-PCR results showed that there were no significant differences in the mRNA levels of Akt during tetrandrine treatment (Figure 9A). However, as shown in Figure 9B and C, tetrandrine remarkably downregulated the protein expression ratios of p-Akt/Akt in a dose-dependent manner in both Ishikawa and HEC-1-B cells. These data indicated that the inhibition of proliferation and apoptosis induced by tetrandrine may be associated with the downregulation of the PI3K/Akt signalling pathway. To further examine whether tetrandrine downregulates p-Akt, we surveyed the locations of p-Akt in cells with an immunofluorescence assay. As shown in Figure 9D and E, the relative fluorescence intensities of p-Akt in the tetrandrine treatment group were lower than those in the control group (0 µM tetrandrine), which agreed with the Western blot assay results. These data indicated that the inhibition of proliferation and apoptosis induced by tetrandrine may be associated with downregulation of the PI3K/Akt signalling pathway.

Figure 9 Tetrandrine repressed the PI3K/Akt signalling pathway in endometrial cancer cells. The Ishikawa and HEC-1-B cells were treated with 0, 10 or 20 µM tetrandrine for 24 h. (A) The mRNA expression levels of Akt were measured by qRT-PCR. (B) The protein expression levels of p-Akt and Akt were detected by Western blotting. (C) The ratio of p-Akt/Akt was relative to control group (0 µM tetrandrine). #P<0.05. (D) Immunofluorescence staining of p-Akt was observed by a fluorescence microscope (scale bars: 50 μm). (E) Quantitative analysis of p-Akt immunofluorescence. Data were presented as means ± SD (n=3), #P<0.05.

Discussion

In recent years, with changes in human habits and diets, endometrial cancer has shown increasing incidence rates and younger onsets. Over the past 20 years, its incidence has risen by more than 50%.21 To date, there is no well-tolerated and effective treatment for advanced and recurrent endometrial cancer. TCMs are a significant source for cancer treatments. Recently, the promise of TCM in cancer treatments has been increasingly recognized, and TCM is one of the most common complementary therapies for chemotherapy, surgery, and radiotherapy that is used worldwide, especially in Asia.22 Network pharmacology provides an appropriate approach for drug-target exploration and modern TCM research.23 Previous studies have verified that tetrandrine can inhibit cancer cell growth and progression in multiple types of cancers. To date, studies of tetrandrine against EC have not been reported. Therefore, in this study, the key mechanism of tetrandrine against endometrial cancer was investigated by using a combination of network pharmacology prediction and experimental validation. Through the use of publicly available databases, we obtained 111 potential targets between tetrandrine and EC. Then, the PPIs of the common targets were constructed, and the key gene targets were obtained. We constructed a drug-target-disease network to describe these interactions. To further investigate the potential therapeutic targets, we performed GO function and KEGG pathway enrichment with WebGestalt. GO enrichment analysis indicated that these targets were associated with metabolic processes, responses to stimulus, and biological regulation. The KEGG pathway analysis showed that the common target genes were mainly distributed in the PI3K/Akt signalling pathway. Moreover, the molecular docking results showed that tetrandrine exhibited good binding activity to Akt1, which was one of the key targets.

Additional in vitro experiments were performed to verify the predicted molecular mechanisms of tetrandrine against EC. In our study, the effects of tetrandrine on proliferation were investigated by a CCK-8 assay. The experiments revealed that tetrandrine inhibited endometrial cancer cells in a time- and dose-dependent manner. Flow cytometric analysis indicated that tetrandrine induced apoptosis of endometrial cancer cells with a dose-dependent pattern.

Apoptosis, a form of programmed cell death, is responsible for tumour development and progression. In cancer, deregulated apoptotic signaling, particularly the activation of antiapoptotic systems, allows cancer cells to escape this program, which leads to uncontrolled proliferation and tumour survival, therapeutic resistance and recurrence of cancer.24 The Bcl-2 gene family has a central role in regulating programmed cell death by controlling pro-apoptotic and anti-apoptotic intracellular signals.25 In the Bcl-2 family, Bax is a proapoptotic member, while Bcl-2 is an antiapoptotic member. When unbalanced, the Bcl-2 family can act as a barrier to apoptosis and facilitate tumour development and resistance to cancer therapy.26 In our study, the results revealed that the mRNA and protein expression levels of Bcl-2 were significantly downregulated, while the expression levels of Bax were upregulated in the groups treated with tetrandrine. Therefore, apoptosis that was induced by tetrandrine in endometrial cancer cells was associated with Bcl-2 family proteins.

The PI3K/ Akt pathway is one of the most frequently dysregulated pathways in cancer that regulates cell proliferation, growth, cell size, metabolism, and motility.27,28 Akt participates in the key role of the pathway, and the abnormal overexpression or activation of Akt has been observed in many cancers, including ovarian, lung, and pancreatic cancers.29 In addition, overactivation of the PI3K/ Akt pathway has recently been implicated in endometrial cancer pathogenesis, and due to this, inhibition of the PI3K/ Akt pathway is of therapeutic interest.30 Therefore, to verify the prediction that we obtained from biological data mining, we determined the expressions of Akt and p-Akt by using Western blot assays. The experimental results showed that the expression ratios of p-Akt/Akt significantly decreased in the tetrandrine groups. Furthermore, immunofluorescence assays confirmed that the relative fluorescence intensities of p-Akt decreased as the tetrandrine dose increased. Taken together, these results revealed that tetrandrine exerted tumour suppressive effects on EC by regulating the PI3K/Akt signalling pathway. However, this study still has limitations. First, the mechanism of tetrandrine against endometrial cancer is complicated and involves multiple pathways. We need to further explore other mechanisms. In addition, it is necessary to conduct additional in vivo experiments to further confirm the results.

In conclusion, we revealed that the PI3K/Akt signalling pathway is a promising target that is relevant to the mechanism of tetrandrine against endometrial cancer based on network pharmacology approaches. In vitro experiments confirmed that tetrandrine suppresses the proliferation and induces the apoptosis in endometrial cancer cells via the PI3K/Akt pathway. These results suggest that tetrandrine is a promising and effective multitargeted medication for endometrial cancer.","{'neg': 0.063, 'neu': 0.907, 'pos': 0.03, 'compound': -0.9994}"
18,Global variation in postoperative mortality and complications after ...,7 months ago,Inclusion criteria were adult patients aged 18 years or older; undergoing their first surgical procedure for the treatment of one of the three...,https://www.thelancet.com/article/S0140-6736(21)00001-5/fulltext,"Higher levels of mortality after cancer surgery in LMICs was not fully explained by later presentation of disease. The capacity to rescue patients from surgical complications is a tangible opportunity for meaningful intervention. Early death after cancer surgery might be reduced by policies focusing on strengthening perioperative care systems to detect and intervene in common complications.

Between April 1, 2018, and Jan 31, 2019, we enrolled 15 958 patients from 428 hospitals in 82 countries (high income 9106 patients, 31 countries; upper-middle income 2721 patients, 23 countries; or lower-middle income 4131 patients, 28 countries). Patients in LMICs presented with more advanced disease compared with patients in high-income countries. 30-day mortality was higher for gastric cancer in low-income or lower-middle-income countries (adjusted odds ratio 3·72, 95% CI 1·70–8·16) and for colorectal cancer in low-income or lower-middle-income countries (4·59, 2·39–8·80) and upper-middle-income countries (2·06, 1·11–3·83). No difference in 30-day mortality was seen in breast cancer. The proportion of patients who died after a major complication was greatest in low-income or lower-middle-income countries (6·15, 3·26–11·59) and upper-middle-income countries (3·89, 2·08–7·29). Postoperative death after complications was partly explained by patient factors (60%) and partly by hospital or country (40%). The absence of consistently available postoperative care facilities was associated with seven to 10 more deaths per 100 major complications in LMICs. Cancer stage alone explained little of the early variation in mortality or postoperative complications.

This was a multicentre, international prospective cohort study of consecutive adult patients undergoing surgery for primary breast, colorectal, or gastric cancer requiring a skin incision done under general or neuraxial anaesthesia. The primary outcome was death or major complication within 30 days of surgery. Multilevel logistic regression determined relationships within three-level nested models of patients within hospitals and countries. Hospital-level infrastructure effects were explored with three-way mediation analyses. This study was registered with ClinicalTrials.gov

80% of individuals with cancer will require a surgical procedure, yet little comparative data exist on early outcomes in low-income and middle-income countries (LMICs). We compared postoperative outcomes in breast, colorectal, and gastric cancer surgery in hospitals worldwide, focusing on the effect of disease stage and complications on postoperative mortality.

This insufficiency of high-quality data limits global efforts to improve cancer care. Strategic planning mandates detailed and accurate information, so that appropriate resources can be allocated and quality improvement prioritised. Demographic and clinical data, together with details of hospital resources, are needed to help refine public health initiatives, treatment strategies, and quality improvement interventions. To address these issues, we did an international, multicentre, prospective cohort study that aimed to determine the variation in mortality and complication rates for breast, colorectal, and gastric cancers in low-income, middle-income, and high-income countries.

Irrespective of the development status of a country, surgery remains the cornerstone of cancer cure and palliation. Solid tumours are often untreated in LMICs and this carries significant macroeconomic consequences; cumulative gross domestic product losses are estimated to be as high as 1·2% for 2016–30.Cancer resection procedures are often highly invasive, leading to postoperative morbidity and mortality. In previous work, we identified significant global disparities in surgical outcomes, with patients in LMICs two to three times more likely to sustain a major complication or to die after surgery.These consequences are devasting for patients and their families and, in the context of cancer treatment, complications can lead to long-term morbidity or death, increased treatment costs, and delays in adjuvant treatment. Rescuing patients who sustain a major complication from dying has become an important focus of quality improvement in surgery.Not only must complications be minimised, but the timely recognition and management of complications is essential if avoidable mortality is to be minimised. Little is known about factors contributing to early death and complications after cancer surgery in LMICs.

Direct estimates of the incidence and distribution of cancer by stage are absent for many LMICs, and little is known about variation in access, quality, and outcomes in global cancer care. Breast, colorectal, and gastric cancer represent a significant burden of disease across income settings and, as such, are clear targets for intervention.Breast cancer is the most common cancer worldwide, and a leading cause of cancer-related morbidity and mortality in LMICs. Addressing inequities in breast cancer treatment will be essential in meeting gender equality Sustainable Development Goals , as well as health and wellbeing objectives. Colorectal cancer incidence is rising in LMICs and represents the second most common cause of cancer-related death globally. Gastric cancer is the third most common cause of cancer-related death in LMICs. These facts were reflected in a recent LMIC-led research prioritisation exercise, where cancer surgery was identified as a major priority.

Global Burden of Disease Cancer Collaboration Global, regional, and national cancer incidence, mortality, years of life lost, years lived with disability, and disability-adjusted life-years for 32 cancer groups, 1990 to 2015: a systematic analysis for the Global Burden of Disease Study.

Perioperative mortality is disproportionately greater in LMICs, which contributes to significantly worse cancer survival. Urgent assessment of pragmatic perioperative interventions led by investigators in LMICs is needed to avert avoidable mortality after the development of common complications after surgery.

To our knowledge, our study is the first to provide comprehensive data across income settings on early outcomes in patients undergoing surgery for three common cancers. We used standardised, validated, and prospective methods to gather global, contemporaneous, and comprehensive data. Even after case-mix adjustment, patients in LMICs had higher postoperative mortality, despite similar complication rates. The capacity to rescue patients from death after the development of common postoperative complications explains a significant part of the disproportionate mortality burden in LMICs.

We searched for evidence of multinational research assessing early outcomes after surgery for three globally common cancers (breast, colorectal, and gastric cancer) focusing on low-income and middle-income countries (LMICs). We searched PubMed, MEDLINE, Google Scholar, and ClinicalTrials.gov for articles published between Jan 1, 1990, and Aug 1, 2020, using the terms “cancer” OR “malignancy” AND “surgery” AND “developing countries” OR “low income” OR “middle-income” OR “low and middle-income”, without language restrictions. Identified studies largely focused on single tumour types and did not compare outcomes across different income settings. No studies systematically collected comparative data examining outcomes after cancer surgery in different income settings.

Cancer prevalence and its associated mortality is increasing in low-income and middle-income countries (LMICs).Of the 15·2 million individuals diagnosed with cancer worldwide in 2015, 80% needed surgery.Despite this need, fewer than 25% of people worldwide have robust access to effective surgical care.In tumours amenable to resection, surgery offers the best chance of cure, particularly in early-stage disease; thus, expanding the availability of surgery is likely to yield large improvements in cancer survival in LMICs.

Global Burden of Disease Cancer Collaboration Global, regional, and national cancer incidence, mortality, years of life lost, years lived with disability, and disability-adjusted life-years for 32 cancer groups, 1990 to 2015: a systematic analysis for the Global Burden of Disease Study.

National Institute for Health Research (NIHR) Global Health Research Unit Grant (NIHR 17–0799) funded hub development in a subset of contributing countries. The views expressed are those of the authors and not necessarily those of the NHS, the NIHR or the UK Department of Health and Social Care. The funder of the study had no role in study design, data collection, data analysis, data interpretation, or writing of the Article. The corresponding author had full access to all the data in the study and had final responsibility for the decision to submit for publication.

All analyses were done using R (version 3.6.3), using the finalfit, tidyverse, and lme4.

Quantities of interest were calculated from logistic regression models for different covariate levels (patient and disease characteristics). Absolute risk differences were calculated, and CIs determined using bootstrap resampling. The number needed to treat to benefit was defined as the reciprocal of the absolute risk difference.

Mediation analysis was performed by three-way decomposition of total effects into direct, indirect, and interactive effects.The mediators examined were at the level of the hospital, defined as the presence or absence of postoperative care infrastructure, and it was assumed that there was no causal relationship between these and patient-level covariates. Similarly, no mediator-outcome confounders were specified. Uncertainty was determined using bootstrap resampling (5000 draws) and CIs constructed using percentiles.

Models were constructed using the following principles: variables associated with outcome measures in previous studies were accounted for; demographic variables were included in model exploration; population stratification by hospital and country of residence was incorporated as random effects; all first-order interactions were checked and included in final models if found to be influential (reaching statistical significance or resulting in a 10% or greater change in the odds ratio (OR) of the explanatory variable of interest); final model selection was done using a criterion-based approach by minimising the Akaike information criterion and discrimination determined using the C-statistic (area under the receiver operator curve). Effect estimates are presented as ORs and 95% CIs. The variance explained at each level of multilevel models was determined.The conditional pseudo Rwas defined as the sum of the variance components of fixed and all random effects divided by total variance. The variance explained by each component (marginal pseudo R) was expressed as a proportion of the conditional pseudo R

Variation across different international health settings was assessed by stratifying countries by World Bank country group classifications. Differences between World Bank tertiles were tested with the Pearson χ 2 test for categorical variables and with the Kruskal-Wallis test for continuous variables. Multilevel logistic regression models were constructed to account for case mix (differing patient, disease, and operative characteristics), with population stratification by hospital and country of residence incorporated as random intercepts with constrained gradients. Further post hoc analyses were then performed exploring the relationship between primary outcome measures, patient factors, and hospital care facilities.

As described in the protocol,consideration was given to the sample size needed to compare income groups. Estimates of 30-day mortality for gastrointestinal cancer surgery were determined using data from the GlobalSurg 1 and 2 studies.Stratification of results by country income group show differences between high-income countries and LMICs in both emergency surgery (75 [11·6%] of 644 vs 59 [27·3%] of 216, respectively) and elective surgery (30 [2·0%] of 1501 vs 23 [5·5%] of 416, respectively). An indicative sample size calculation using the smaller of these estimates suggests around 500 patients per group at 80% power (2·0% vs 5·5%, α=0·05) or 640 patients per group at 90% power would be required to conclude a difference in 30-day mortality rate between income groups.

The secondary outcome measures were defined in the protocoland designed to describe cancer care quality. They included: 30-day any complication (defined by Clavien-Dindo grade I–V); 30-day unplanned reintervention (defined as operative, radiological, or endoscopic reintervention any time until 30 days after surgery); unplanned readmission to a health-care facility; cancer-specific complications including seroma (breast), anastomotic leak (gastric and colorectal), surgical site infection (all),abscess formation (all), and postoperative bleed (all); cancer treatment pathways; and hospital-level care processes. Patients were assessed at 30 days to determine postoperative outcomes, with follow-up done in person, by telephone, or by review of medical or re-admission records, dependent on local practices.

The primary outcome measures were 30-day mortality and 30-day major complication, as defined by Clavien-Dindo grade III, IV, or V.Death was included in the definition of major complication and therefore was not a competing risk. Capacity to rescue was defined as the absolute risk difference of death in patients sustaining a complication of surgery. Mortality conditional on major complication was analysed post hoc.

Classification of surgical complications: a new proposal with evaluation in a cohort of 6336 patients and results of a survey.

Data validation was done in three parts across a representative sample of centres, according to a prespecified protocol ( appendix pp 47–51 ). First, centres self-reported the key processes used to identify and follow up patients ( appendix p 7 ). Second, independent validators (ie, doctors, nurses, or medical students who were not part of the recruiting teams) quantitatively reported case ascertainment and sampled data accuracy. Third, validators identified any missing eligible patient within the local cohort and collected the missing information for each omission (age, sex, operation urgency, and 30-day mortality). These data were used to determine whether patient data were missing at random.

Disease stage was defined according to the Essential TNM classification of malignant tumours system,to account for differences in local protocols and availability of investigations for preoperative staging. A pragmatic view was taken to the confirmation of cancer diagnosis, because postoperative pathological examination worldwide is dependent on the availability of patient and health-care resources. To reflect this situation, we recorded the basis of cancer diagnosis using a hierarchical scale ranging from clinical diagnosis only to pathological confirmation ( appendix p 7 ).

Patient variables included age, sex, performance status according to the Eastern Cooperative Oncology Group, physical status according to the American Society of Anesthesiologists (ASA) grading system, and smoking status. Disease-related variables included cancer type, disease stage, timing of surgery (elective vs emergency), intent of surgery (curative vs palliative), and use of WHO surgical checklist. Presence of preoperative perforation or obstruction, and operative approach (open or minimally invasive) were also included for gastric and colorectal cancers.

Data variables were selected to be objective, standardised, easily transcribed, and internationally relevant to maximise completeness and accuracy. Local investigators uploaded records to a secure website, provided using the Research Electronic Data Capture system.The lead investigator at each site checked the accuracy of all cases before data submission. To ensure data quality, real-time assessment was done on entry into the database and disparities highlighted to the local collaborator for immediate review. The submitted data were then checked centrally and when missing data were identified, the local lead investigator was contacted and asked to complete the record. Online data visualisation tools aided this process. Once vetted, the record was accepted into the dataset for analysis. Records that were vetted but remained incomplete were included in the patient flow chart, but excluded from analysis.

The inclusion of primary breast, colorectal, and gastric cancer was based on global prevalence, potential for cure with surgical treatment, and relevance to general surgeons working in resource-constrained settings. There was an absolute requirement for all cases in the chosen period to be included, but no minimum number was set to avoid bias against smaller centres. Patients provided consent to participate if required by local research regulations and could withdraw at any time during the study period. Due to potential limitations in preoperative diagnosis in some settings, all patients receiving surgical treatment for suspected cancer were enrolled. Patients subsequently found to have a non-oncological diagnosis were excluded from data analysis. Emergency procedures were defined as unplanned, non-elective operations. Open and minimally invasive procedures (eg, laparoscopic or robotic) were eligible. Patients were excluded if the primary pathology was not suspected to be breast, colorectal, or gastric cancer; if the pathology was a suspected cancer recurrence; or if they were undergoing a procedure that did not require a skin incision.

Investigators included consecutive patients undergoing surgery for breast, colorectal, or gastric cancer, from one or more 28-day period between April 1, 2018, and Jan 31, 2019, with validation performed until April 23, 2019. Inclusion criteria were adult patients aged 18 years or older; undergoing their first surgical procedure for the treatment of one of the three cancers; and requiring a skin incision performed under general or neuraxial (eg, regional, epidural or spinal) anaesthesia. All patients fulfilling the inclusion criteria within the defined period were enrolled. A 28-day period was chosen to balance sample size requirements and pragmatism for the working clinicians who were enrolling patients and contributing data.

A UK National Health Service (NHS) Research Ethics proportionate review considered this study exempt from formal research registration (South East Scotland Research Ethics Service, reference NR/161AB6) because it was deemed a clinical audit. Individual centres obtained their own audit or institutional approval, together with ethical approval as per local regulations.

This international, multicentre, prospective cohort study was done according to a published protocol.The study was designed in a collaborative research prioritisation workshop.Breast, colorectal, and gastric cancers were prioritised on the basis of global prevalence and mortality, and relevance to the majority of our collaborators, who are predominantly general surgeons and manage these cancers regularly. To maximise case ascertainment, ensure data quality, and enable engagement across a global network, a pragmatic decision was taken not to collect data on additional cancer types. All Global Surgery study documents, training materials, and language translations are available online . Teams of local investigators undertook the study and were coordinated by a network of national lead investigators. The collaborative network method has been described in detail previously.Any health-care facility providing emergency or elective surgery for breast, colorectal, or gastric colorectal cancer worldwide was eligible to participate.

In 265 hospitals in 69 countries randomly selected for validation (1060 hospital-weeks of data collection), 3805 patients fulfilled inclusion criteria compared with 3669 (96·4%) in the primary dataset ( appendix p 47 ). Accuracy was high for the validated continuous predictor (Pearson's correlation coefficient 0·99; appendix p 50 ). Agreement for categorical predictors was good (sex, T stage, urgency, and intent; Cohen's κ coefficients >0·75; appendix p 51 ) and lower for N stage (κ 0·67). Agreement was very good for 30-day mortality (κ 0·89) and good for 30-day major complication (κ 0·63).

The association between country income group and 30-day mortality was examined in a three-way decomposition mediation model of postoperative care infrastructure ( figure 5 appendix p 44 ). No interaction was found between this mediator and country income group. A significant proportion of the excess mortality after major complication was mediated by the absence of postoperative care infrastructure in low-income or lower-middle-income (aOR 1·19, 95% CI 1·01–1·42; 20%) and upper-middle-income (1·19, 1·01–1·42; 22%) groups. The absolute risk differences for 30-day mortality after major complication with and without consistently available postoperative care infrastructure were examined for common patient covariates ( figure 5 appendix p 45 ). The presence of postoperative care infrastructure was associated with fewer deaths in both the low-income or lower-middle-income group (seven to ten fewer deaths per 100 major complications, number needed to treat 10–14) and the upper-middle-income group (five to eight fewer deaths per 100 major complications, number needed to treat 13–20). Cancer care pathways were not shown to mediate any association with 30-day mortality.

We assessed hospital facilities and processes to determine relationships with excess mortality after major complications. Hospitals in high-income (n=232), upper-middle-income (n=72) and low-income or lower-middle-income (n=95) groups were sampled. Hospitals in upper-middle-income and low-income or lower-middle-income groups were less likely to have postoperative care infrastructure (designated postoperative recovery areas, consistently available critical care facilities, and an available and working CT) and cancer care pathways (tumour board, oncology services, and palliative care services; appendix pp 41–42 ).

In a four-level model of patients nested in hospitals, countries, and World Bank income groups, 60% of the variation in outcome captured by the model (pseudo R 2 0·42) was explained by patient or disease factors, with the remaining 40% explained by hospital, country, and country income group factors.

In a model accounting for patient factors and clustering by country and hospital, patients in upper-middle-income (aOR 3·89, 2·08–7·29) and low-income or lower-middle-income (6·15, 3·26–11·59) groups were more likely to die after a major complication compared with the high-income group ( figure 5 appendix p 43 ). Patient performance status and emergency surgery were strong predictors of death after major complication. Although patients with stage IV cancer had a greater probability of dying after major complication, stage I to III cancer was not associated with an excess mortality when accounting for other variables in the model. A sensitivity analysis using final pathological staging, as opposed to preoperative clinical staging, showed similar findings ( appendix pp 15–16 ).

(A) Multilevel logistic regression model for predictors of death after major complication in colorectal and gastric cancer. Box size proportional to group size (n). (B) Three-way decomposition mediation model of the proportion of the effect of country income group on 30-day mortality mediated by postoperative care infrastructure (the consistent presence of a designated postoperative recovery area, the availability of critical care facilities, and the existence of a working CT scanner). (C) Proportion of 30-day mortality variation explained at the level of patient or disease, hospital, country, and country income group, in patients with colorectal or gastric cancer who died after major complication. The variance explained at each of the four levels of the model (marginal pseudo R 2 ) is expressed as a proportion of the total variance explained (conditional pseudo R 2 ). (D) Absolute risk difference for 30-day mortality after major complication in the presence of consistently available postoperative care infrastructure. Estimates for age 55 years, ECOG performance status 1, ASA grade 2, cancer stage II, and elective surgery. WB=World Bank. OR=odds ratio. ECOG=Eastern Cooperative Oncology Group. ASA=American Society of Anesthesiologists.

The pattern of complications occurring within cancer types was broadly similar across country income groups ( appendix p 5 ). No systematic differences in the types of complications being sustained (eg, bleeding, infection) were seen in different country income groups.

The proportion of patients sustaining a major complication who subsequently died was higher in upper-middle-income and low-income or lower-middle-income countries compared with high-income countries, in both unadjusted ( figure 3 ) and adjusted analyses ( appendix p 4 ). The relationship between mortality and country income group was consistent across cancer stage of presentation, except for stage IV gastric cancer, where mortality was high across all country income groups ( appendix p 4 ). Similarly, the proportion of patients sustaining complications across country income groups was unchanged after stratification by stage of presentation ( appendix p 4 ).

Given similar complication rates across country income groups, we did an analysis defined post hoc to examine factors predicting mortality after major complications in colorectal and gastric cancer, to determine where capacities to rescue patients might exist.

No statistical interactions were seen between patient factors and country income group for mortality or complications; for example, the effect of age, body-mass index, and ASA grade on outcomes did not differ by country income group.

The proportion of patients sustaining a major complication or any complication in these adjusted analyses was similar across country income groups, with weak evidence of fewer major complications after breast surgery in the upper-middle-income group ( figure 4 ).

Outcomes were adjusted in three-level models accounting for patient and disease factors nested within hospitals and country of treatment ( figure 4 appendix pp 22–38 ). Higher 30-day mortality was seen in gastric cancer in low-income or lower-middle-income countries (adjusted OR [aOR] 3·72, 95% CI 1·70–8·16) and in colorectal cancer in upper-middle-income countries (2·06, 1·11–3·83) and low-income or lower-middle-income countries (4·59, 2·39–8·80; figure 4 ). No difference in mortality was seen in breast cancer.

Models were built incorporating patient and disease factors specific to each cancer. Univariable, full multivariable, parsimonious multivariable, and multilevel (patient, hospital, country) models for each outcome in each cancer type are given in the appendix (pp 22–38) . Box size proportional to group size (n). WB=World Bank. OR=odds ratio.

30-day mortality was higher for gastric cancer in the low-income or lower-middle-income group (33 [10·1%] of 326) and for colorectal cancer in the upper-middle-income group (47 [4·3%] of 1102) and low-income or lower-middle-income group (63 [7·0%] of 905), compared with the high-income group (gastric 27 [3·8%] of 702; colorectal 94 [2·3%] of 4142; figure 3 appendix p 20 ). However, the proportion of patients with a major complication or any complication was similar across all income groups.

The proportion of patients with later-stage disease who had surgery was greater in upper-middle-income countries and low-income or lower-middle-income countries for all three cancer groups ( figure 3 appendix p 8 ). There was a strong positive correlation between cancer stage and performance status for patients with gastric cancer, and a weaker relationship in patients with breast and colorectal cancer ( appendix pp 9–14 ). No strong relationship between operative risk (ASA grade) and cancer stage was seen.

(A) Proportion of patients enrolled by cancer stage by country income group. (B) Proportion of patients dying or sustaining a major complication or any complication by day 30 after surgery stratified by country income group. (C) Proportion of patients sustaining a major complication who died within 30 days.

Overall, 8406 (52·7%) patients had surgery for breast cancer, 6215 (38·9%) for colorectal cancer, and 1337 (8·4%) for gastric cancer ( figure 1 ). The distribution of cancer type, unadjusted mortality, and complication rates across country income group are shown in figure 2

Data are for 15 958 patients from 82 countries and 428 hospitals. Crude outcome rates are shown for 30-day mortality, 30-day major complication (Clavien-Dindo grade ≥III), and 30-day any complication.

On stratification by World Bank country income groups, 9106 (57·1%) patients were from high-income countries, 2721 (17·0%) from upper-middle-income countries, and 4131 (25·9%) from low-income or lower-middle-income countries ( table appendix p 2 ). Patients from upper-middle-income countries and low-income or lower-middle-income countries were younger, more likely to have lost weight, and had fewer comorbidities compared with patients from high-income countries. Missingness was low and no patterns were seen when comparing included and missing data ( appendix pp 2–3 ).

Numbers are n (%) or mean (SD). High income included 31 countries and 241 hospitals. Upper-middle income included 23 countries and 81 hospitals. Lower-middle income or low income included 28 countries and 106 hospitals. The total column therefore includes 82 countries and 428 hospitals. For patient characteristics by cancer type, see appendix p 2 . ASA=American Society of Anesthesiologists. ECOG=Eastern Cooperative Oncology Group.

Between April 1, 2018, and Jan 31, 2019, 16 838 patient records were submitted for analysis. 880 (5·2%) did not fulfil the inclusion criteria, leaving 15 958 records for the final analysis ( figure 1 ). These patients were from 428 hospitals, across 82 countries—22 in Africa, 17 in Asia, 30 in Europe, five in North America, two in Oceania, and six in South America.

Discussion

Differences in early cancer outcomes in LMICs compared with high-income countries are often attributed to the advanced stage of presentation, together with an absence of access to cancer-specific treatments. In this prospective, international cohort study of 15 958 patients in 82 countries undergoing surgery for breast, colorectal, and gastric cancer, we show that 30-day postoperative mortality is four-times higher in resource-limited settings, despite patients experiencing similar major complication rates. Although patient factors partially explained the higher postoperative mortality rate in LMICs, health system factors, including access to postoperative monitoring, emergent imaging, and critical care facilities also appeared key, resulting in an insufficiency of capacity to rescue after major complications. This excess mortality after cancer surgery will hamper cancer control efforts in LMICs, and prevent cancer patients, communities, and economies from realising the benefits of cancer-specific treatments.

16 Chaker L

Falla A

van der Lee SJ

et al. The global impact of non-communicable diseases on macro-economic productivity: a systematic review. 2 Sullivan R

Alatise OI

Anderson BO

et al. Global cancer surgery: delivering safe, affordable, and timely cancer surgery. 2 Sullivan R

Alatise OI

Anderson BO

et al. Global cancer surgery: delivering safe, affordable, and timely cancer surgery. 3 Meara JG

Leather AJM

Hagander L

et al. Global surgery 2030: evidence and solutions for achieving health, welfare, and economic development. 2 Sullivan R

Alatise OI

Anderson BO

et al. Global cancer surgery: delivering safe, affordable, and timely cancer surgery. According to Global Cancer Observatory data, cancer is a leading cause of death and disability worldwide, exerting substantial economic effects in countries at all stages of development,with a disproportionate burden of disease now emerging in LMICs.Surgery is fundamental to the treatment of solid cancers across all income settings, acting as a pivotal component of multidisciplinary care, together with imaging, pathology, chemoradiotherapy, and palliation. Effective surgical care plays a crucial role in the prevention of death from cancer,and requires systems of the highest quality throughout the preoperative and postoperative periods.If the opportunity to strengthen surgical cancer systems is not taken, an estimated US$6·2 trillion in gross domestic product will be lost by 2030.

17 Ng-Kamstra JS

Arya S

Greenberg SLM

et al. Perioperative mortality rates in low-income and middle-income countries: a systematic review and meta-analysis. 7 GlobalSurg Collaborative

Mortality of emergency abdominal surgery in high-, middle- and low-income countries. , 8 Bhangu A

Ademuyiwa AO

Aguilera ML

et al. Surgical site infection after gastrointestinal surgery in high-income, middle-income, and low-income countries: a prospective, international, multicentre cohort study. Mortality reported in our study across LMICs for both gastric (7·2%) and colorectal (5·5%) cancer were higher than current global estimates.Existing perioperative mortality rates in the literature are limited by the absence of standardised reporting and risk stratification, and are often derived from small, single-centre studies. The 30-day mortality in our study was similar to that in our previous multicentre observational cohorts.Across gastric and colorectal cancers, variation in 30-day mortality between high-income countries and LMICs was shown after both emergency (7·1% vs 18·0%, respectively) and elective (1·9 vs 4·0%, respectively) surgery.

2 Sullivan R

Alatise OI

Anderson BO

et al. Global cancer surgery: delivering safe, affordable, and timely cancer surgery. 18 McPhail S

Johnson S

Greenberg D

Peake M

Rous B Stage at diagnosis and early mortality from cancer in England. 19 Fearon K

Strasser F

Anker SD

et al. Definition and classification of cancer cachexia: an international consensus. 20 Gyawali B

Bouche G

Crisp N

André N Challenges and opportunities for cancer clinical trials in low- and middle-income countries. 21 Ahmad T

Bouwman RA

Grigoras I

et al. Use of failure-to-rescue to identify international variation in postoperative care in low-, middle- and high-income countries: a 7-day cohort study of elective surgery. There are well described factors that could contribute to an early excess mortality after cancer surgery. Locally advanced or metastatic cancer is a common initial presentation in LMICs, due in part to reduced access to timely and affordable surgical services.Delays in presentation result in poorer survival through a combination of cancer progression,cancer-related cachexia,and the consequences of emergency presentation. Achieving early detection and treatment through cancer screening initiatives is important, and often the focus of public health initiatives and funding.However, in this study we show that excess mortality after cancer surgery in LMICs is only partly explained by the later presentation of disease. We have shown an excess in postoperative mortality despite similar rates and patterns of complications. The importance of rescuing patients from common complications is now well established with variation described globally.To our knowledge, our study is the first to identify capacity to rescue as an important early determinant of outcomes from cancer surgery in resource-restricted settings. Furthermore, we have shown an association between the consistent presence of postoperative care infrastructure and lower mortality rates after major complications. The capacity to rescue patients is likely to limit expected reductions in mortality from current global development funds and multilateral investments in cancer control. Better perioperative care systems to detect and intervene in common complications are essential if early death after cancer surgery is to be reduced.

12 Piñeros M

Parkin DM

Ward K

et al. Essential TNM: a registry tool to reduce gaps in cancer staging information. 4 Ward ZJ

Scott AM

Hricak H

et al. Estimating the impact of treatment and imaging modalities on 5-year net survival of 11 cancers in 200 countries: a simulation-based analysis. , 17 Ng-Kamstra JS

Arya S

Greenberg SLM

et al. Perioperative mortality rates in low-income and middle-income countries: a systematic review and meta-analysis. , 22 Santhirapala V

Peden CJ

Meara JG

et al. Towards high-quality peri-operative care: a global perspective. A major strength of this study is its prospective design and deep patient-level and hospital-level data collected simultaneously from a wide breadth of global settings. More than 100 variables were included, making it one of the richest datasets in this area, to our knowledge. The use of the Essential TNM system, together with standard TNM 8 classifications, make meaningful comparisons of cancer stage possible in settings with limited access to imaging and pathological services.The assessment of cancer stage, treatment, and outcome was standardised, and training provided through an online platform. Data quality was ensured though collaborator-facing web applications and real-time data entry quality assurance. An independent validation study verified data accuracy and case ascertainment. Quantification of surgical cancer care in resource-limited settings has been hindered by an insufficient amount of high-quality data.This study therefore contributes to closing this knowledge gap and allows meaningful comparison from multiple income settings with accurate case-mix adjustment.

2 Sullivan R

Alatise OI

Anderson BO

et al. Global cancer surgery: delivering safe, affordable, and timely cancer surgery. , 4 Ward ZJ

Scott AM

Hricak H

et al. Estimating the impact of treatment and imaging modalities on 5-year net survival of 11 cancers in 200 countries: a simulation-based analysis. 23 Sud A

Jones ME

Broggio J

et al. Collateral damage: the impact on outcomes from cancer surgery of the COVID-19 pandemic. Limitations of this study include looking at outcomes only in the 30 days after surgery. Oncological outcomes are essential in capturing the effectiveness of cancer treatments, including surgery, and these outcomes are poorly captured and understood in resource-limited settings.Disease-free and overall survival after surgery are likely to be significantly lower in LMICs, for many of the reasons described in this study, including the later stage disease across included cancers. The effect of delayed surgery in life-years lost for stage I–III disease is well described in high-income countries;however the impact of this in global settings is less clear. The current study will be extended to capture longer-term outcomes and other cancers in the future, which should add significantly to the picture of global surgical cancer care we have provided here.

Only patients undergoing primary surgery for breast, colorectal, or gastric cancers were included in our study, and therefore outcomes in patients receiving non-surgical care were not examined. Furthermore, the relationship between outcomes and hospital-level facilities were associations. Hospitals with CT and critical care facilities are likely to have other differences in infrastructure and processes that might contribute to better outcomes. Although we provide several important measures of hospital facilities ( appendix pp 41–42 ), further detailed analyses of these data are ongoing. Finally, the substantial economic and financial costs to patients undergoing cancer treatment are known to be significant, but were not measured.

3 Meara JG

Leather AJM

Hagander L

et al. Global surgery 2030: evidence and solutions for achieving health, welfare, and economic development. 24 Nepogodiev D

Bhangu A

Glasbey JC

et al. Mortality and pulmonary complications in patients undergoing surgery with perioperative SARS-CoV-2 infection: an international cohort study. Reducing early mortality after surgery is key to improving cancer outcomes and achieving Universal Health Coverage for non-communicable diseases worldwide. The Lancet Commission on Global Cancer Surgery identified the key requirements to scale up surgical cancer services by 2030.Improvements in the provision of cancer care remain essential if Sustainable Development Goals are to be met. Yet, detailed global information supporting focused initiatives to develop infrastructure, improve quality, and implement effective interventions remains limited. Although complete analysis of the patient pathway was not possible within this study, we identified multiple components of the surgical health system and patient-level risk factors that could be targeted for further study and intervention. High-quality perioperative care requires appropriate recovery and ward space, a sufficient number of well trained staff, the use of early warning systems, and ready access to imaging, operating theatre space, and critical care facilities to deal with complications when they occur—the delivery of which is even more challenging in the present COVID-19 pandemic.

25 WHO

World Health Assembly 70. Cancer prevention and control in the context of an integrated approach. Access to cancer surgery is an important barrier to safe and effective care for people with cancer in LMICs.Improved access comes with further opportunities for optimisation of individual patients through, for instance, nutritional interventions and neoadjuvant therapies. Addressing these factors with high-quality interventional trials to build a global evidence base for the delivery of safe cancer surgery is likely to have significant effect and improve cancer survival.

This study has produced a unique prospective dataset of patients undergoing breast, colorectal, and gastric cancer surgery worldwide. Future research should focus on the detailed characterisation of perioperative care processes and the implementation of strategies to both reduce complication rates, and to rescue patients from complications when they do occur. Policy makers worldwide must balance investments in the early detection and treatment of cancer with the simultaneous improvement in safe perioperative care. Without these investments, mortality gains in cancer control will not be fully realised.

Correspondence to: Prof Ewen M Harrison, National Institute for Health Research Global Health Research Unit on Global Surgery, Centre for Medical Informatics Usher Institute, University of Edinburgh, Edinburgh EH16 4UX, UK [email protected]

Global Cancer Observatory see For more on thesee https://gco.iarc.fr/","{'neg': 0.148, 'neu': 0.77, 'pos': 0.082, 'compound': -1.0}"
19,announces Spring 2021 graduates - Fort Hays State University,2 months ago,"6/24/21. A total of 2,547 students completed associate, bachelor, ... Graduates are listed with their degrees and majors and, in parentheses,...",https://www.fhsu.edu/news/2021/06/fort-hays-state-university-announces-spring-2021-graduates,"6/24/21

A total of 2,547 students completed associate, bachelor, or graduate degrees at Fort Hays State University in the spring 2021 term.

Graduates are listed with their degrees and majors and, in parentheses, areas of concentration. The university conferred 544 graduate degrees (master’s, Education Specialist, and Doctor of Nursing Practice degrees), 1,957 bachelor’s degrees, and 46 associate degrees. Of those, 49 students graduated with two degrees. Graduates who requested privacy are included in the count but omitted from this listing.

FHSU does not release degree lists until transcripts have been verified as having met all requirements for graduation.

Graduates are arranged alphabetically by home county, city, and ZIP. Graduates from other states are listed alphabetically by state, city, and ZIP. International students are listed by country and city.

ALLEN

Humboldt (66748): Hannah Michelle Lucas, a Bachelor of Science in elementary education.

Iola (66749): Bryce Baumwart, a Master of Science in health and human performance.

Holly Lynn Karhoff, a Master of Science in Education (transition to teaching).

Savonburg (66772): Rhonda Shepherd, a Bachelor of Science in agricultural business.

ANDERSON

Garnett (66032): Rebecca Lyn Modlin, a Bachelor of Science in elementary education.

Kincaid (66039): Zachary Mason, a Master of Science in counseling (school).

ATCHISON

Effingham (66023): Kathleen J. Oswald, a Bachelor of General Studies (education).

BARBER

Kiowa (67070): Jenny L. Cantrell, a Master of Science in Education (transition to teaching).

Medicine Lodge (67104): Brenna L. Lawless, a Master of Science in biology.

Sara Kaitlyn McDonald, a Bachelor of Science in elementary education.

Mecate Thomas, a Bachelor of Science in elementary education.

BARTON

Albert (67511): Bryce Michael Maneth, a Bachelor of Science in agriculture (general).

Claflin (67525): Kylee Ann Kasselman, a Bachelor of Science in Nursing.

Rebecca Ann Littrell, a Bachelor of Science in psychology.

Ellinwood (67526): Stephanie Ann Errebo, a Bachelor of General Studies (human services).

Jenna Rose Oelke, a Bachelor of Science in medical diagnostic imaging and an Associate of Science in radiologic technology.

Devann R. Patten, an Education Specialist in school psychology.

Great Bend (67530): Jonathan David Ball, a Bachelor of Business Administration in finance (banking).

Natasha Shyanne Bieker, a Master of Science in health and human performance.

Brooklyn Grace Burkhart, a Bachelor of Science in education (early childhood unified).

Allan Michael Clark, a Bachelor of General Studies (psychological).

Carli Denning, a Master of Science in Education (elementary).

Alex Dawn Gruber, a Master of Social Work (clinical).

Kayanna Hammeke, a Bachelor of Arts in communication.

Joshua W. Holuska, a Master of Liberal Studies (management information systems).

Payton Scott Mauler, a Bachelor of Science in agriculture (agronomy).

Elsi May Miller, a Bachelor of Science in biology (natural resources).

Matthew Gary Miller, a Bachelor of Science in biology (natural resources).

Madison Paige Otter, a Bachelor of Fine Arts in art (graphic design).

Lauren Marcene Penka, a Bachelor of Science in medical diagnostic imaging (ultrasound).

Logan Dale Perry, a Bachelor of Science in health and human performance (exercise science).

Devani L. Prieto-Sandoval, a Master of Social Work (clinical).

Paola C. Ramirez-Lucio, a Bachelor of Social Work.

Laura Dee Sanchez, a Bachelor of Science in communication sciences and disorders.

Alexander Duane Smith, a Bachelor of Science in elementary education, non-certified.

Brayden Don Smith, a Bachelor of Science in business education (corporate communication).

Alejo Villegas, a Bachelor of Business Administration in finance (financial planning).

Lacy A. Wells, a Bachelor of Business Administration in management information systems.

Kelsi Jayne Wertz, a Bachelor of Science in agriculture (general).

Maryann Marie Whaley, an Associate of Science in radiologic technology.

Hoisington (67544): Kealy Ray Burris, an Associate of General Studies (biological).

Hunter Jacob Hanzlick, a Bachelor of Science in biology (natural resources).

Emma M. Harmon, a Bachelor of Science in communication sciences and disorders.

Delaney Jenae Smith, a Bachelor of Business Administration in accounting.

Lisa Thompson, a Master of Science in health and human performance.

BOURBON

Fort Scott (66701): April Beth Stock, a Master of Science in Education (elementary).

BROWN

Hiawatha (66434): Sadie M. Miller, a Bachelor of Science in mathematics (teaching) and a Bachelor of Science in secondary education.

BUTLER

Andover (67002): Spencer Kyle Archibald, a Bachelor of Science in computer science.

Wanda Mae Atkinson, a Master of Science in Education (elementary).

Rebecca Linnell Carr, a Bachelor of Science in elementary education.

Jessica N. Parker, a Bachelor of Science in medical diagnostic imaging.

Sheryl Denise Wiele, a Master of Science in special education (high incidence).

Augusta (67010): Jennifer Rebekah Bosley, a Master of Science in Education (elementary).

Tricia M. Brown, a Bachelor of Science in elementary education.

Keegan Marshall Hallmark, a Master of Science in special education (gifted).

Heidi Mae Jones, a Bachelor of Business Administration in finance (banking).

Benton (67017): Casey Lee Shinkle, a Bachelor of Science in technology studies (manufacturing).

Amanda Weber, a Bachelor of Fine Arts in art (graphic design).

El Dorado (67042): Kelly Ankrom, a Master of Science in special education (high incidence).

Hannah Danae Haury, a Bachelor of Business Administration in marketing and a Bachelor of Business Administration in management.

Mandi J. Sherman, a Bachelor of Arts in psychology.

Rose Hill (67133): Brittney J. Burba, a Bachelor of Science in Nursing.

Cheyenne N. Depue, a Master of Science in Education (transition to teaching).

Jillian Elizabeth Harper, a Bachelor of Science in Nursing.

Jeffrey Allan Haugh, a Bachelor of Science in information networking and telecommunication (web and mobile application development).

Whitewater (67154): Morgan Leigh Claassen, a Bachelor of Science in elementary education.

CHAUTAUQUA

Sedan (67361): Rachel Marie Campbell, a Master of Science in special education (high incidence).

CHEROKEE

Columbus (66725): Ashley Nicole Thompson, a Bachelor of General Studies (education).

Riverton (66770): Dylan A. Weaver, a Master of Science in Education (transition to teaching).

CHEYENNE

St. Francis (67756): Hanna Suzanne Bracelin, a Bachelor of Science in psychology.

Garrett Alan Brunk, a Bachelor of Science in agricultural business.

Laura N. Brunk, a Master of Science in Education (transition to teaching).

Sydney B. Foster, a Bachelor of Business Administration in marketing (business development and sales).

Lane Dawson Hobrock, a Bachelor of Social Work.

Taylor James Rogers, a Bachelor of Science in agricultural business.

Sydney Rae Sundstrom, an Associate of General Studies (massage therapy) and a Bachelor of Science in health and human performance.

Madison Ann Tice, a Bachelor of Science in communication sciences and disorders.

CLARK

Minneola (67865): Logan D. Hernandez, a Master of Science in Education (transition to teaching).

Nikki Lee Simmons, a Master of Science in counseling (clinical mental health).

Madison Marie Timmons, a Master of Science in Education (English for speakers of other languages).

Thomas Mark Timmons, a Master of Science in Education (English for speakers of other languages).

CLAY

Clay Center (67432): Erika Swaim, an Education Specialist in school psychology.

Alexis Michaela Walter, a Bachelor of Science in psychology.

Wakefield (67487): Faith Dianne Kloth, a Bachelor of Science in sociology.

CLOUD

Aurora (67417): Kahlie Marie Miller, a Bachelor of Science in elementary education.

Clyde (66938): Shaylea Rose Lawson, an Associate of Science in radiologic technology and a Bachelor of Science in medical diagnostic imaging.

Concordia (66901): Heather Dawn Gennette, a Master of Professional Studies (organizational leadership).

Kali J. Harvey, a Bachelor of Science in psychology.

Madeline G. Hoard, a Master of Social Work (clinical).

Cooper Ronald Holmes, a Bachelor of Science in technology studies (construction management).

Tristan Lane Kearn, a Bachelor of Science in biology (natural resources).

Katie M. Pfanz, a Bachelor of Science in criminal justice.

Caleb Wayne Strait, a Bachelor of Arts in history (secondary education) and a Bachelor of Science in secondary education.

Logan Scott Widen, a Bachelor of Science in medical diagnostic imaging.

Miltonvale (67466): Connor Lance Graham, a Bachelor of Science in technology leadership.

Lane Stewart Sanders, a Bachelor of Science in health and human performance (sport and exercise therapy).

COFFEY

Burlington (66839): Madisson Jesse, a Master of Science in speech-language pathology.

Madison Stewart, a Master of Science in education administration.

COMANCHE

Coldwater (67029): Makena Lynn Hess, a Bachelor of Science in Nursing.

COWLEY

Arkansas City (67005): Cortland J. Chittick, a Bachelor of Science in medical diagnostic imaging.

Mai-Ling Renee Kannenberg, a Bachelor of Science in sociology.

Joshua M. Metzinger, a Bachelor of Business Administration in management.

Toni Jene Mitchell, a Master of Science in special education (high incidence).

Winfied (67156): Joshua C. Brandt, a Bachelor of Science in Nursing.

Lindsay Christine Miller, a Master of Science in Education (transition to teaching).

Kyle Richard Westerman, a Master of Science in education administration.

CRAWFORD

Frontenac (66763): Travis Shane Bowman, a Master of Professional Studies (criminal justice).

Girard (66743): Graham Taylor Dixon, a Master of Science in Education (higher education student affairs).

Hepler (66746): Stephenie A. Montgomery, a Bachelor of General Studies (leadership).

Pittsburg (66762): Taylor M. Walker, a Bachelor of Science in psychology.

DECATUR

Jennings (67643): Melinda Sue Fleckenstein, a Master of Science in instructional technology.

DICKINSON

Abilene (67410): McKenna Ann Duffy, a Bachelor of Science in medical diagnostic imaging (ultrasound).

Stephen Paul Gray, a Bachelor of Science in criminal justice.

Marie Elizabeth Haycook, a Doctor of Nursing Practice.

Kelsey Lynn Jones, a Bachelor of Science in biology (health professions).

Kelsey Trower, a Bachelor of Science in education (early childhood unified).

Makayla Leann Wassenberg, a Master of Science in health and human performance.

Jessica Anne Younkman, a Bachelor of Science in Nursing.

Chapman (67431): Brittni Ann Gillespie, a Master of Science in special education (high incidence).

Kristine Betsy Gugler, a Bachelor of Arts in psychology.

Sadie Lynae Selenke, a Bachelor of Science in Nursing.

Herington (67449): Amanda Danielle Barnes, a Bachelor of Science in elementary education.

Tate William Becker, a Bachelor of Science in agricultural business.

Solomon (67480): Nate S. Seidl, a Master of Science in counseling (school).

Woodbine (67492): Jaryth Michael Barten, a Bachelor of Arts in communication and a Bachelor of Science in organizational leadership.

DONIPHAN

Troy (66087): Kennedy Shea McKernan, a Master of Science in Education (elementary).

Holly Rush, a Bachelor of General Studies (general business).

DOUGLAS

Baldwin City (66006): Taylor Ann Cawley, an Associate of Science in radiologic technology.

Gwendolyn Mathis, a Master of Science in Education (transition to teaching).

Jennifer Lea Ruth, a Bachelor of Science in medical diagnostic imaging.

Eudora (66025): Ryan Christopher Jacobs, a Master of Science in instructional technology.

Lisa Jane Moffitt, a Master of Science in counseling (school).

Katelyn Paige Ormsby, a Bachelor of Arts in psychology.

Erin M. Weinmaster, a Master of Science in special education (high incidence).

Lawrence (66044): Alisha Teriann Reese, a Bachelor of Arts in psychology.

Taylor L. Reeves, a Bachelor of Science in psychology.

Jacob Joseph Staab, a Bachelor of Science in computer science.

Lawrence (66046): Michaela Jo Akagi, a Bachelor of Business Administration in management (human resource management).

Ben Bolton, a Master of Science in Education (transition to teaching).

Lawrence (66047): Jama Adair Glenn, a Master of Science in instructional technology.

Lawrence (66049): Whitney A. Ahlvers, a Bachelor of Science in tourism and hospitality management.

Sarah Ashley, a Bachelor of Science in elementary education.

Constance Crane, a Bachelor of Science in sociology.

Mikaela Jane Daniels, a Bachelor of Science in organizational leadership.

Crystal Desiree Fowler, a Master of Science in special education (high incidence).

Austin Clark Hershberger, a Master of Science in education administration.

Samantha Raye Hershberger, a Master of Science in special education (high incidence).

EDWARDS

Kinsley (67547): Brittney Lynne Dockendorf, a Bachelor of Science in Nursing.

ELK

Moline (67353): Deborah Roxane Walker, a Bachelor of Science in elementary education.

ELLIS

Ellis (67637): Todd Michael Gaetke, a Bachelor of Business Administration in accounting.

Jasmyn Maria Hernandez, a Bachelor of General Studies (biological).

Ashley Brianne Jacobs, a Bachelor of Science in Nursing.

Susie Lea Kohlrus, a Bachelor of Science in Nursing.

Justin R. Longbine, a Master of Science in Education (transition to teaching).

Lexie Taylor Rome, a Bachelor of Science in health and human performance (recreation and sport management).

Jessica Marie Russell, a Master of Science in Education (elementary).

Kori Lea Rutherford, an Education Specialist in school psychology.

Aspen R. Younger, a Bachelor of Business Administration in accounting (public accounting).

Hays (67601): Katie Ann Abukhodair, a Bachelor of Science in elementary education.

Justin Lee Adcock, a Bachelor of Science in psychology.

Jacob Nolan Alexander, a Bachelor of Science in biology (natural resources).

Omar Ruiz Alvarez, a Bachelor of Business Administration in finance.

Iuliia Alekseyauna Askolia, a Bachelor of Business Administration in marketing (digital).

Alonso Barragan-Martinez, a Master of Science in biology.

Madison McKay Barrera, a Bachelor of Arts in psychology.

Isys Marie Bearley, a Bachelor of General Studies (general business).

Josh B. Beiker, a Bachelor of Science in technology leadership.

Casey Ann Benyshek, a Bachelor of Science in criminal justice.

Meagan Elizabeth Brin, a Bachelor of Science in health and human performance.

Kerisa Kay Brown, a Bachelor of Arts in communication (public relations and advertising).

Katie Anne Brungardt, a Bachelor of Science in elementary education.

Alyssa Bryant, a Bachelor of Science in psychology.

Quinn Andrew Buffington, a Bachelor of Science in geosciences (geography).

Christian J. Burd, a Bachelor of Arts in philosophy.

Kirsten Rene Burger, a Bachelor of Business Administration in management (human resource management).

Rene Lyne Burns, a Master of Science in education administration.

Tanner Cole Callis, a Bachelor of Science in psychology.

Sangam Chhatkuli, a Bachelor of Science in information networking and telecommunication (computer networking).

Maggie Chitty, a Master of Science in instructional technology.

Grant Edward Coffman, a Bachelor of Arts in communication (organizational).

Amanda M. Cranwell, a Bachelor of Science in agricultural business.

Yiwen Cui, a Bachelor of Science in organizational leadership.

Jordyn Elise Dake, a Bachelor of Social Work.

Braydon Tod Delzeit, a Bachelor of General Studies (general business).

Melissa R. Dible, a Master of Science in biology.

Yubing Ding, a Bachelor of Arts in organizational leadership.

Marissa Joy Dinkel, a Bachelor of Science in Nursing.

Sally Margaret Dinkel, a Bachelor of Science in organizational leadership.

Marcelle Samirah Djachechimbieleu, a Bachelor of Business Administration in finance.

Corey Ryan Donnelly, a Master of Social Work (clinical).

Jackson Robert Dwyer, a Master of Science in health and human performance.

Sierra Nicole Eichman, a Bachelor of Science in biology (health professions).

Courtney Ellis, a Master of Social Work (clinical).

Adam Taylor Emerson, a Bachelor of Science in criminal justice.

Mark A. Faber, a Bachelor of Science in biology (health professions).

Kimberly Flores, an Associate of General Studies (biological).

Cameron James Fouts, a Master of Science in health and human performance.

Stephanie Ann Ganoung, a Master of Science in special education (high incidence).

Shelly Lynn Gasper, a Bachelor of Business Administration in accounting.

Haley P. George, a Bachelor of Science in elementary education.

Makenzie Giess, a Bachelor of Social Work.

Janie Rose Gilmore, a Master of Professional Studies (human resource management).

Ana Gligorijevic, a Bachelor of Arts in foreign language (Spanish for specific purposes).

Heather N. Gordon, a Master of Professional Studies (criminal justice).

Yali Gu, a Master of Science in Education (higher education student affairs).

Miah Elizabeth Haines, a Bachelor of Arts in political science.

Racheal D. Hamel, an Associate of Science in radiologic technology.

Peyton L. Harris, a Bachelor of Science in secondary education.

Dacia Haselhorst, a Master of Professional Studies (organizational leadership).

Shayla A. Haselhorst, a Master of Science in psychology (clinical).

Ross Michael Hattan, a Bachelor of General Studies (general business).

Cyrus Haynes, a Master of Business Administration (human resource management).

Jared Haynes, a Bachelor of Business Administration in accounting and a Bachelor of Business Administration in finance (financial planning).

Hannah Lane Hearld, a Master of Science in Education (higher education student affairs).

Andrew Francin Heimann, a Bachelor of Science in Nursing.

Layke Michael Heimerman, a Bachelor of Arts in communication (public relations and advertising).

Michael Robert Hepp, a Master of Science in instructional technology.

Nicholas Hernandez, a Bachelor of General Studies (leadership).

William Francis Heronema, a Master of Professional Studies (computer networking).

Bryan M. Hirsch, a Master of Arts in history.

Jennifer Lynn Howard, a Master of Science in Education (elementary).

Haileigh Jacobs, a Master of Arts in history (public).

Fiona Dawson Jaime, an Associate of General Studies (general business).

Kylie Ann Jank, a Bachelor of Science in psychology.

Aaron Jeffus, a Bachelor of Science in information networking and telecommunication (digital media production and journalism).

Dakota Neil Johnson, a Bachelor of Science in psychology.

Sydney Klaus, a Bachelor of Science in tourism and hospitality management.

Imelda Koenke, a Master of Science in Education (English for speakers of other languages).

Cody Joseph Kreutzer, a Master of Liberal Studies (music).

Laura Ann Krug, a Bachelor of Fine Arts in art (graphic design).

Tracey Lynn Larsen, a Bachelor of Business Administration in management (human resource management).

Joel Seongho Lee, a Bachelor of Arts in history.

Bailee Renae Leiker, a Bachelor of Science in medical diagnostic imaging (ultrasound).

Lori Lynn Leiker, a Bachelor of Science in Nursing.

Bradley Little, a Master of Science in health and human performance.

Robert Zane Mahanna, a Master of Fine Arts in art (sculpture).

Grace Marie Marshall, a Bachelor of Social Work.

Matthew H. Martin, a Bachelor of Business Administration in accounting.

Rachelle Lynn Martinson, a Bachelor of Science in Nursing.

Mohamed Mbaye, a Bachelor of Business Administration in finance.

Lisa Ellen McCormick, a Master of Science in counseling (clinical mental health).

Spencer Ryan McCue, a Master of Science in biology.

Koby M. McEwen, a Bachelor of Business Administration in management.

Brett T. Meyer, a Master of Science in health and human performance.

Lauren Kay Miller, a Bachelor of Science in agriculture (agronomy).

Rachel Gabriel Moravek, a Bachelor of Science in sociology.

Tanner Wayne Morel, a Bachelor of Arts in English (literature).

Nicole Napell, a Bachelor of Social Work.

Precious Chinazam Ohanson, a Bachelor of Science in Nursing.

Bianca Mikael Okinda, a Bachelor of Science in Nursing.

Samuel F. Ortiz, a Bachelor of Business Administration in accounting (public accounting).

Mark Allan Pakkebier, a Bachelor of Science in Nursing.

Anna Marie Partida, a Master of Science in Nursing (education).

Taylor Patzner, a Master of Social Work (clinical).

Sheila Jazmine Penaloza, a Bachelor of Social Work.

Brandy Marie Pfeifer, a Bachelor of Science in Nursing.

Nicole Lynnzy Pfeifer, a Bachelor of Business Administration in accounting.

Trevor Lee Pfeifer, a Bachelor of Science in information networking and telecommunication (digital media production and journalism).

Katelyn Brooke Pilgrim, a Master of Social Work (clinical).

Amber Prochaska, a Master of Science in special education (high incidence).

John Bryan Ramirez, a Bachelor of Science in criminal justice.

Steven Shane Reed, a Master of Science in Education (transition to teaching).

Ashton M. Royer, a Master of Science in speech-language pathology.

Lucia Saldana, a Bachelor of Business Administration in management (human resource management).

Morgan Lashai Sanchez, a Bachelor of Social Work.

Javaris D. Sanders, a Bachelor of Science in health and human performance (recreation and sport management).

Caitlyn Alissa Scheck, a Bachelor of Science in medical diagnostic imaging and an Associate of Science in radiologic technology.

Kora Lynn Schindler, a Bachelor of Science in communication sciences and disorders.

Eric Schmidt, a Bachelor of Science in technology studies (engineering design).

Katelyn Nichole Schmidt, a Master of Science in Education (reading specialist).

Nicholas Donald Schumacher, a Master of Professional Studies (music performance).

Lucas Scott, a Bachelor of Science in computer science (technology studies).

Jessica D. Seib, a Master of Science in Nursing (education).

Tylor Marie Shepherd, a Bachelor of Business Administration in accounting (public accounting).

Ethan John Shippy, a Bachelor of Science in biology (education) and secondary education.

Dominique Valissamarie Simmons, a Bachelor of Business Administration in accounting (public accounting).

Rohey Singhateh, a Bachelor of Science in health and human performance (exercise science).

Sheriffu Singhateh, a Bachelor of Science in psychology.

Israel Wyatt Smitherman, a Bachelor of Science in psychology.

Molly Spencer, an Education Specialist in school psychology.

Conner Jacob Staab, a Bachelor of Science in information networking and telecommunication (computer networking).

Taryn Elaine Stauth, a Bachelor of Science in Nursing.

Kelsey Lynn Stremel, a Master of Liberal Studies (information analysis and communication).

Madison Rose Tasset, a Bachelor of Science in elementary education, honors.

Peyton Reed Taylor, a Bachelor of Business Administration in management information systems.

Kylie Denae Ubert, a Bachelor of Arts in psychology.

Hannah Unrein, a Bachelor of Science in education (early childhood unified).

Conrad Leo Vajnar, a Bachelor of Business Administration in accounting.

Jared Thomas Vitztum, a Master of Business Administration (finance).

Beatrice N. Walsh, a Bachelor of Science in criminal justice.

Brianna Leigh Walter, a Master of Science in speech-language pathology.

Grace Marie Wasinger, a Bachelor of Science in psychology.

Monica Watson, a Bachelor of Business Administration in management (human resource management).

Brady Werth, a Master of Science in geosciences.

Madison May White, a Bachelor of General Studies (biological).

Marcus Jordyn Willey, a Bachelor of Science in health and human performance (recreation and sport management).

Haley Rae Williams, a Master of Professional Studies (organizational leadership).

Sarah Windholz, a Bachelor of Social Work.

Maddux Allan Winter, a Bachelor of Science in health and human performance (sport and exercise therapy).

Hannah Wolff, a Bachelor of Science in biology.

Khay Youm, a Bachelor of Science in psychology.

Kemberly Zamora, a Bachelor of Arts in foreign language (Spanish for specific purposes).

Brandi Alexandra Zimmerman, a Bachelor of Social Work.

Marc Robert Zolnierz, a Master of Science in instructional technology.

Schoenchen (67667): Chantz Canon Taliaferro, a Bachelor of Arts in foreign language (Spanish for specific purposes).

Victoria (67671): Julia Katherine Gfeller, a Bachelor of Science in Nursing.

Steven Grant, a Master of Business Administration (management information systems).

Sienna Jean-Eva Hockersmith, a Bachelor of Science in general science (chemistry).

Wheaton Hockersmith, a Bachelor of Science in agricultural business.

Karly Oberle, a Bachelor of Science in medical diagnostic imaging and an Associate of Science in radiologic technology.

Sara Elizabeth Schippers, a Bachelor of Science in Nursing.

Jacob D. Weigel, a Bachelor of Arts in history.

ELLSWORTH

Ellsworth (67439): Sabrina Kay Bourbon, a Master of Science in Education (reading specialist).

Jessie E. Graves, a Bachelor of Science in communication sciences and disorders.

Stephenie R. MacPherson, a Bachelor of Science in secondary education.

Jason Maisog, a Master of Science in instructional technology.

Jerika Rishelle Mitchell, a Bachelor of General Studies (child development).

Bailey Brooke Schulteis, a Bachelor of Science in medical diagnostic imaging and an Associate of Science in radiologic technology.

Wilson (67490): Anna Catherine Criswell, a Bachelor of Arts in English (teaching) and a Bachelor of Science in secondary education.

Anita Teresa Maloysmith, a Bachelor of General Studies (human services).

FINNEY

Garden City (67846): Sylvia Arias, a Master of Social Work (clinical).

Mariel Victoria Asebedo, a Bachelor of Science in medical diagnostic imaging (ultrasound).

Nathaniel David Bailey, a Master of Science in instructional technology.

James Levi Burnfin, a Master of Science in Education (transition to teaching).

Nancy Julissa Castillo, a Master of Science in psychology (clinical).

Lourdes Juliette Covarrubias, a Bachelor of Business Administration in management.

Ryan Curran, a Bachelor of Business Administration in accounting (public accounting).

Nyvia Delacruz, a Bachelor of Arts in communication (public relations and advertising).

Aubrie Maurie Diehl, a Master of Science in Education (transition to teaching).

Terah Lea Domme, a Master of Science in Nursing (administration).

Brook Michelle Eichhorn, a Master of Social Work (clinical).

Ariel M. Evans, a Bachelor of Science in biology.

Adriana Figueroa, a Bachelor of Business Administration in management information systems.

Vanessa Gonzalez, a Bachelor of Fine Arts in art (interior design).

Joshua Greenberg, a Master of Science in instructional technology.

Justin Raymond Groth, a Master of Science in Education (transition to teaching).

Kaitlin Nicole Guebara, a Bachelor of Social Work.

Jared Michael Koster, a Bachelor of Business Administration in management.

Tracy E. Lamb, a Master of Science in Nursing (education).

Alyssa Renee Long, a Bachelor of Science in psychology.

Joseph Daniel Lowry, a Master of Liberal Studies (music).

Marissa Yvette Lujan, a Master of Social Work (clinical).

Jennifer L. Mata, a Bachelor of Science in criminal justice.

Ivon Navarrete-Benitez, a Bachelor of Business Administration in management.

Vicki Nguyen, a Bachelor of Science in medical diagnostic imaging (ultrasound).

Kristi Lee Nichols, a Master of Science in Education (English for speakers of other languages).

Erica Jordan Ramos, a Bachelor of Science in Nursing.

Justin Reich, a Master of Science in Education (transition to teaching).

Lisa Rodriguez, a Master of Professional Studies (human resource management).

Daisy Annette Saavedra, a Bachelor of Science in tourism and hospitality management.

Amanda Serafin, a Bachelor of Arts in psychology.

Brooklen Elizabeth Skipton, a Bachelor of General Studies (education).

Giselle Velasco, an Associate of Science in radiologic technology.

Maricela Villa, a Master of Social Work (clinical).

Tiffany Irene Ward, a Bachelor of Social Work.

Jennifer Nicole Wieberg, a Master of Science in counseling (school).

Holcomb (67851): Emie Novack, a Master of Science in counseling (school).

Ryli Elise Soukup, a Bachelor of Social Work.

Sara Louise Teeter, an Associate of Science in radiologic technology.

FORD

Dodge City (67801): Alicia Birney, a Master of Science in special education (high incidence).

Andrew Doan, a Master of Business Administration (finance).

Leona L. Engelcke, a Master of Science in education administration.

Whitney Lyn Ernst, a Bachelor of Business Administration in management (human resource management).

Daniel B. Finder, a Master of Science in Education (transition to teaching).

Michael Gillott, a Master of Science in instructional technology.

Sharon Frances Gleason, a Bachelor of Science in medical diagnostic imaging and an Associate of Science in radiologic technology.

Brian C. Groth, a Bachelor of Science in information networking and telecommunication (digital media production and journalism).

Saul Abdon Hernandez, a Master of Science in Education (English for speakers of other languages).

Cristina I. Jimenez, a Bachelor of Science in criminal justice.

Jessica Morgan, a Bachelor of Science in communication sciences and disorders.

Itzel Agripina Moya, a Master of Social Work (clinical).

Dylan Ratts, a Bachelor of Business Administration in finance (banking).

Teresita Reyes, a Master of Science in Education (English for speakers of other languages).

Nallely Guadalupe Rios-Ramirez, a Bachelor of Science in Nursing.

Carlie Rouse, a Bachelor of Science in information networking and telecommunication (health informatics).

Ryan Allen Schultz, a Bachelor of Science in psychology.

Dillon Ray Shouse, a Master of Science in special education (high incidence).

Emmaly A. Slattery, a Bachelor of Business Administration in finance and a Bachelor of Business Administration in accounting (public).

Alejandro Tapia, a Bachelor of Business Administration in management information systems.

Sarah Jane Thomas, a Master of Science in counseling (school).

Irwin Martin Torresmarino, a Master of Science in Education (English for speakers of other languages).

Socorro Campos Vega, a Master of Professional Studies (computer networking.

Chelsea L. Wagner, an Education Specialist in school psychology.

Bailey R. White, a Bachelor of Arts in criminal justice.

Stephanie Marie Wilton-Perez, a Bachelor of Arts in art education and a Bachelor of Science in secondary education.

Spearville (67876): Hunter T. Brown, a Bachelor of Science in biology (natural resources).

Scott Krominga, a Master of Science in Education (English for speakers of other languages).

FRANKLIN

Ottawa (66067): Elsie K. Bones, a Master of Science in education administration.

Shelly Jo Pearson, a Bachelor of Science in sociology.

Brandon W. Pfizenmaier, a Bachelor of Science in technology studies (construction management).

Paige Alyson Weidner, a Master of Science in special education (high incidence).

Pomona (66076): Amber Booton, a Master of Science in special education (high incidence).

Princeton (66078): Angela Pearl Malone, a Bachelor of Science in education (early childhood unified).

Rantoul (66079): Jacob Alexander Pryor, a Bachelor of Science in technology studies (construction management).

GEARY

Fort Riley (66442): Samantha Mae Hublick, a Bachelor of Science in elementary education.

Elizabeth A. McPhearson, a Master of Science in education administration.

Junction City (66441): Jaden Patrick Bradney, a Bachelor of Science in health and human performance (recreation and sport management).

Candice Victoria Haines, a Bachelor of General Studies (education).

Aryus Rashawn Jones, a Bachelor of Science in criminal justice.

Gena Ann Olson, a Master of Science in counseling (clinical mental health).

Lauren Renee Simmons, a Master of Science in counseling (school).

Lara George Strauss, a Master of Science in instructional technology.

GOVE

Gove (67736): Janna L. Cook, a Bachelor of Science in agricultural business.

Grainfield (67737): Brooke Bixenman, a Bachelor of Science in health and human performance (sport and exercise therapy).

Melissa Ann Bixenman, a Bachelor of Business Administration in accounting (public accounting).

Grinnell (67738): Tenille Janae Tholen, a Bachelor of Science in medical diagnostic imaging (ultrasound).

Quinter (67752): Zachary Funk, a Bachelor of Science in criminal justice.

Taya Thornburg, an Education Specialist in school psychology.

GRAHAM

Hill City (67642): Annalise Mikayla Albrecht, a Bachelor of Fine Arts in art (graphic design).

Darien R. Pimlott, a Bachelor of General Studies (child development).

GRANT

Ulysses (67880): Joshua David Arnett, a Master of Science in Education (elementary).

Michelle Christine Barb, a Bachelor of Fine Arts in art (interior design).

Alex Alan Barbosa, a Bachelor of Science in technology studies (construction management).

Dwight Green Jr., a Master of Science in special education (high incidence).

Tyra Jo Hayden, a Bachelor of Science in elementary education.

Marisa Pristine Koehn, a Bachelor of General Studies (psychological).

Deborah Lou Kreie, a Master of Science in special education (high incidence).

Shadow R. Love, a Master of Science in psychology (clinical).

Katrina L. McMahon, a Bachelor of Science in psychology.

Ashley Nicole Partin, a Bachelor of General Studies (human services).

Laura Jewel Sarracino, a Master of Science in Education (transition to teaching).

GRAY

Cimarron (67835): Krysteen Nicole Bonjour, a Bachelor of Social Work.

Brooklyn N. Walker, a Bachelor of Science in elementary education.

Ingalls (67853): Christopher Joseph Wendel, a Bachelor of Science in agriculture (agronomy).

Montezuma (67867): Remington Hope Clark, a Master of Science in speech-language pathology.

Garrison Hendricks, a Master of Science in health and human performance.

Elizabeth Rose Kemper, a Bachelor of Arts in English (writing).

Cassandra Lynn Zweygardt, a Master of Science in Education (transition to teaching).

GREELEY

Tribune (67879): KC Barnes Higley, a Master of Science in Education (transition to teaching).

Jessica Alejandra Mendoza, a Bachelor of Science in Nursing.

Heather Ann Myers, an Education Specialist in advanced professional studies (leadership in reading).

Cordell Ray Waggoner, a Bachelor of Science in tourism and hospitality management.

Brooke Noelle Wineinger, a Master of Science in speech-language pathology.

GREENWOOD

Eureka (67045): Calisa Erin Marlar-Hall, a Master of Science in Education (transition to teaching).

HAMILTON

Syracuse (67878): Lauren Kate Durler, a Bachelor of Science in communication sciences and disorders.

Bret E. Harkness, an Education Specialist in school psychology.

Kaylee Schwieterman, a Master of Science in Education (reading specialist).

Colten Soelzer, a Master of Science in education administration.

HARVEY

Halstead (67056): Cory Dean Hiebert, a Bachelor of Business Administration in international business and economics.

Adelle Runnebaum, a Bachelor of Science in criminal justice.

Newton (67114): Sarah Nicole Bartel, a Master of Science in health and human performance.

Jared Thomas Crist, a Bachelor of Science in technology studies (construction management) and a Bachelor of Arts in foreign language (Spanish for specific purposes).

Brianna Elizabeth Huser, a Bachelor of General Studies (psychological).

Jacob Randolph, a Master of Arts in history.

North Newton (67117): Christine Matthews, a Bachelor of Science in Nursing.

Matthew Niles Stucky, a Bachelor of Science in computer science.

Sedgwick (67135): Kiana Lewman, a Bachelor of Social Work.

Marshall Bauer Rutschman, a Bachelor of Science in agriculture (agronomy).

Kimberly Ann Schaffer, a Bachelor of Science in elementary education.

HASKELL

Sublette (67877): Jalane Paige Giesick, a Bachelor of Fine Arts in art (interior design).

HODGEMAN

Jetmore (67854): Kristen Nicole Tarman, a Bachelor of Science in Nursing.

Tayler Lyndsey Wade, a Bachelor of Science in Nursing.

JACKSON

Holton (66436): Chardae Ann Dick, an Associate of General Studies (math).

Alexis Grace Rieschick, a Bachelor of Science in elementary education.

Hoyt (66440): Lucas William Broxterman, a Bachelor of Science in agriculture (agronomy).

Morgan Blake New, a Bachelor of Business Administration in accounting.

Laura Snyder, a Master of Science in special education (high incidence).

Mayetta (66509): Jessica Ann Bienhoff, a Master of Science in special education (high incidence).

JEFFERSON

McLouth (66054): Travis Paul Riley, a Master of Science in biology.

Meriden (66512): Ashley E. Turpin, a Master of Science in health and human performance.

Macy Lynn Wallisch, a Master of Science in Education (transition to teaching).

Oskaloosa (66066): Alexis Leah Friskel, a Bachelor of Science in Nursing.

Heather O'Neal, a Master of Science in education administration.

JEWELL

Jewell (66949): Brittany Taylor Lienberger, a Master of Science in Education (reading specialist).

JOHNSON

De Soto (66018): Kayla M. Deghand, a Bachelor of Science in communication sciences and disorders.

James Lee Ingalls, a Bachelor of Science in medical diagnostic imaging.

Shelly Rae Roehrman, a Master of Science in special education (high incidence).

Fairway (66205): Zak Engelken, a Bachelor of General Studies.

Gardner (66030): Erin-Louise Chapman, a Master of Science in Education (library specialist).

Marguerite Elizabeth Hunting, a Master of Science in special education (gifted).

Suchun Amy Schutzel, a Master of Science in Education (elementary).

Courtney Blake Tarin, a Bachelor of Business Administration in finance.

Sabrina Ann Winner, an Associate of Applied Science in applied technology and leadership (business communication and technology).

Kansas City (66223): Anthony Wayne Fast, a Bachelor of Science in biology (natural resources).

Lenexa (66210): Thomas Sheffield Smithey, a Bachelor of Science in computer science.

Lenexa (66214): Garrett Alexander Stephens, a Bachelor of Business Administration in management.

Lenexa (66215): Britta Kristina Coleman, a Bachelor of Science in geosciences (geology).

Callie Virginia Guth, a Master of Science in Education (reading specialist).

Kristin Rene Nichols, a Master of Science in Education (transition to teaching).

Madalyne Kay Shackelford, a Bachelor of Science in elementary education.

Lenexa (66219): Fallon M. McGinnis, a Bachelor of Science in health and human performance.

Merriam (66202): Andrea Jean Stanley, a Bachelor of General Studies (psychological).

Olathe (66061): Amy Gudmens Holovach, an Education Specialist in school psychology.

Stephen James Mitchell, a Master of Science in Education (elementary).

Kendal Renee Renick, a Bachelor of Business Administration in accounting.

Olathe (66062): Sarah A. Ackerman, an Education Specialist in advanced professional studies (education innovation and leadership).

Anne Elizabeth Augustyn, an Associate of Science in radiologic technology.

Julie A. Bustos, a Bachelor of Science in elementary education.

Enrique J. Cabrera-Rodriguez, a Bachelor of Science in criminal justice.

Katherine Claudia Davidson, a Bachelor of Science in criminal justice.

Pearce A. Kinzer, a Bachelor of Arts in philosophy.

Daniel J. Kooser, a Bachelor of General Studies (musical studies).

Hayley Marie Nitz, a Bachelor of Science in biology and a Bachelor of Arts in foreign language (Spanish).

Tyler J. Olson, a Bachelor of Science in technology studies (construction management).

Elizabeth Patnode, a Bachelor of Science in Nursing.

Kevin David Wiesner, a Master of Science in Education (transition to teaching).

Overland Park (66085): Audrey Morgan Pounds, a Bachelor of Science in computer science.

Overland Park (66204): Sean Cameron Demaree, an Education Specialist in advanced professional studies (education administration).

Overland Park (66210): Jaime Gigstead, a Master of Science in Education (transition to teaching).

Nathaniel Boyd Higdon, a Master of Science in biology.

Andrea Nicole Jordan, a Master of Science in special education (high incidence).

Overland Park (66212): Kelley Elizabeth Emmett, a Master of Science in Education (transition to teaching).

Kaitlyn Johnson, a Master of Science in Nursing (administration).

Overland Park (66213): Samantha Elizabeth Arch, a Bachelor of Business Administration in management.

Kade Cook, a Master of Business Administration.

Cheri Renee Fox, a Bachelor of Science in elementary education.

Lindsey Nicole Lyons, a Master of Science in Education (transition to teaching).

Erica Colleen Vermillion, a Master of Science in counseling (school).

Overland Park (66214): Jaden Cooper Mount, a Master of Business Administration.

Overland Park (66221): Patrick Sanford Donahue, a Master of Science in instructional technology.

Rebecca Suzanne Perry, a Master of Science in special education (high incidence).

Jared Christian Way, a Bachelor of General Studies (tourism and hospitality management).

Overland Park (66223): Brendan Robert Baier, a Bachelor of General Studies (historical).

Prairie Village (66204): Megan Louise Illidge, a Master of Science in Education (English for speakers of other languages).

Shawnee (66203): Mary Katherine Forman, a Bachelor of Business Administration in management (human resource management).

Shawnee (66216): Natalie Ann Egan, a Bachelor of Arts in communication (public relations and advertising).

Adam L. King, an Education Specialist in advanced professional studies (education innovation and leadership).

Shawnee (66217): Haley Marie Slade, a Master of Science in Education (transition to teaching).

Shawnee (66218): Valerie Ann Conrade, a Master of Science in Nursing (administration).

Danielle Elizabeth Pippitt, a Bachelor of Science in computer science.

Shawnee (66226): Kelci Renea Lucas, a Bachelor of General Studies (education).

Christopher N. Swanson, a Bachelor of General Studies (literature).

Spring Hill (66083): Jamey Leon Kinyon, a Bachelor of Business Administration in management (operations).

Madison Jade Miller, an Associate of Science in radiologic technology and a Bachelor of Science in medical diagnostic imaging.

KEARNEY

Lakin (67860): Elizabeth Rodriguez, a Bachelor of Science in psychology.

KINGMAN

Kingman (67068): Cole Robert Walters, a Bachelor of Science in agriculture (agronomy) and a Bachelor of Science in agricultural business.

Zenda (67159): Terryll Corryn Miller, a Master of Science in Education (elementary).

KIOWA

Greensburg (67054): James D. Little, a Bachelor of Science in technology studies (construction management).

Haviland (67059): Landon John Davis, a Bachelor of Science in agricultural business and a Bachelor of Science in agriculture (agronomy).

Mullinville (67109): Janessa Kay Zenger, a Bachelor of Science in Nursing.

LABETTE

Oswego (67356): Sheila Rae Robison, a Master of Science in education administration.

Parsons (67357): Rebecca Jean Roach, a Master of Science in Education (elementary).

Alexis Dawn Smith, a Bachelor of Arts in psychology.

Charles Henley Thompson, a Master of Science in health and human performance.

Jeremy Woodworth, a Master of Science in counseling (school).

Cherokee Breeanne Wright, a Bachelor of Arts in political science.

LANE

Dighton (67839): Renee Lynn Trow, a Bachelor of Business Administration in accounting.

LEAVENWORTH

Basehor (66007): Nicole Michelle McDaniel, an Associate of General Studies (child development).

Timothy Shelley, a Bachelor of General Studies (criminal justice).

Lansing (66043): Tayler Elizabeth Arevalo-Mendoza, a Bachelor of Business Administration in management.

Sara Genevieve Meyers, a Master of Science in instructional technology.

Leavenworth (66048): Anthony Michael Danielbrigg, a Bachelor of Arts in history.

Shelbie Leintz, a Master of Science in instructional technology.

Kevin Rodriguez, a Master of Professional Studies (organizational leadership).

Tonganoxie (66086): Ashley Renee Trieb, a Master of Science in instructional technology.

Matthew David Walkup, a Master of Business Administration (health care management).

Marsha Marie Warren, a Master of Science in special education (high incidence).

LINCOLN

Lincoln (67455): Nathan Otto Feldkamp, a Bachelor of Science in geosciences (geology).

Monica Kay Zier, a Master of Science in special education (high incidence).

Sylvan Grove (67481): Logan Emma Batchman, a Bachelor of Science in agricultural business.

LINN

Pleasanton (66075): Hunter L. Secrest, a Bachelor of Science in agricultural business.

LOGAN

Oakley (67748): Jenna Ann Berkgren, a Bachelor of Business Administration in accounting.

Nathaniel Adair Johns, a Bachelor of Science in information networking and telecommunication (computer networking).

Taylor Anne Vaneaton, a Bachelor of Arts in environmental geosciences.

Winona (67764): Katherine Elizabeth Flentie, a Master of Science in Education (transition to teaching).

LYON

Emporia (66801): Heather Ann Patterson, a Master of Science in Education (transition to teaching).

Misty Slater, a Bachelor of Science in criminal justice.

Kerri L. Zorn, a Bachelor of Science in education (early childhood unified).

MARION

Hillsboro (67063): Morgan Kamry Ediger, a Master of Professional Studies (organizational leadership).

Lincolnville (66858): Callie Riffel, a Master of Science in speech-language pathology.

Tampa (67483): Shelby Layne Srajer, a Bachelor of Science in elementary education.

MARSHALL

Axtell (66403): Taylor Denise Feldkamp, a Master of Social Work (clinical).

Blue Rapids (66411): Anna Marie Fritzson, a Bachelor of General Studies (agricultural).

Julie Marie Popejoy, a Bachelor of Science in elementary education.

Bremen (66412): Matthew Friedrichs, a Master of Science in Education (transition to teaching).

Frankfort (66427): Emily Ford, a Master of Science in Education (transition to teaching).

Marysville (66508): Cassie Pralle, a Master of Social Work (clinical).

McPHERSON

Galva (67443): Jennifer Lynn Taylor, a Master of Science in counseling (school).

Lindsborg (67456): Sabrina Marie Feistner, a Master of Science in Education (reading specialist).

Haylee Anne Herman, a Bachelor of Science in biology (health professions).

Kara Sue Knopp, a Master of Science in instructional technology.

Vince Andrew Warbinton, a Master of Science in education administration.

McPherson (67460): Brian David Doherty, a Bachelor of General Studies (education).

Ellea Ediger, a Bachelor of Business Administration in finance (financial planning).

Emma Rose Ellet, a Bachelor of Arts in communication (organizational).

Taylor Goering, a Bachelor of Science in agricultural business.

Paige Elizabeth Gottwald, a Master of Social Work (clinical).

Daniel Joseph Holthus, a Bachelor of Science in computer science.

Leslie L. Kagle, a Master of Science in education administration.

Michelle E. Stolzenburg, a Bachelor of Science in elementary education.

Brittanee Dawn White, a Bachelor of Science in biology (health professions).

Moundridge (67107): Caleb Daniel Frye, a Bachelor of Business Administration in finance (financial planning).

Allison Elizabeth Rice, a Master of Science in counseling (school).

MEADE

Fowler (67844): Bailey Claire Lewis, an Associate of Science in radiologic technology and a Bachelor of Science in medical diagnostic imaging.

Meade (67864): Blake Andrew Keith, a Bachelor of Science in criminal justice.

Plains (67869): Cezar Marcos Aguirre, a Bachelor of Business Administration in management.

Clovis Matthew Bell, a Master of Science in Education (transition to teaching).

MIAMI

Bucyrus (66013): Martin William Verhaeghe, a Bachelor of Science in health and human performance.

Louisburg (66053): Lori Grace Reed, a Master of Science in special education (high incidence).

Osawatomie (66064): Kayla Lynn Hewson, a Master of Science in Education (elementary).

Ashley Jo White, a Bachelor of General Studies (psychological).

Paola (66071): Kaylee Renee Hill, a Bachelor of Business Administration in management information systems.

Philip A. Lovesee, a Master of Liberal Studies (political science).

Colton Alexander Wagner, a Bachelor of Arts in history.

MITCHELL

Beloit (67420): Melanie Jill Bourbon, a Master of Science in Education (reading specialist).

Ryan Joseph Gengler, a Bachelor of Science in Nursing.

Bradley M. Gober, a Master of Science in education administration.

William B. Mason, a Bachelor of Science in biology (natural resources).

Jared Ethan Mosher, a Bachelor of Science in health and human performance (K-12 teaching and coaching) and a Bachelor of Science in secondary education.

Amanda Brook Seyfert, a Master of Science in Education (reading specialist).

Cierra Jean Thiessen, a Master of Science in Education (reading specialist).

Tegan Weidenhaft, a Master of Science in Education (reading specialist).

Karissa Rose Winkel, a Bachelor of Science in health and human performance (sport and exercise therapy).

Glen Elder (67446): Audrey T. Shamburg, a Master of Science in speech-language pathology.

Tipton (67485): Cortney Ann Murrow, a Master of Science in Nursing (administration).

MONTGOMERY

Coffeyville (67337): Stacey Campbell, a Master of Science in education administration.

Amy Marie Murdock, a Master of Science in instructional technology.

Donald Dee Splechter, an Associate of Applied Science in applied technology and leadership (business communication and technology).

Independence (67301): Megan Leann Gaston, a Master of Science in education administration.

Bradley J. McHugh, a Bachelor of Science in business education (talent development).

MORRIS

White City (66872): Breanna M. Markley, a Bachelor of Science in criminal justice and a Bachelor of Science in psychology.

Cade Joseph Stilwell, a Bachelor of Science in agriculture (agronomy).

MORTON

Vassar (67954): Brianna M. Smith, a Bachelor of Science in criminal justice.

NEMAHA

Sabetha (66534): Wade Patrick Talley, a Master of Science in education administration.

Seneca (66538): Sheriden Lee Haverkamp, a Master of Science in counseling (school).

Cody Neal Rottinghaus, a Bachelor of Business Administration in management (operations).

NEOSHO

Chanute (66720): Devon Crabtree, a Master of Science in Education (transition to teaching).

Kelli Huser, a Bachelor of Science in elementary education.

Zoie Elizabeth Stewart, a Master of Science in speech-language pathology.

Crystal Treloggen, a Bachelor of Business Administration in management (operations).

Erie (66733): Jessica A. Letterman, a Bachelor of Science in business education (corporate communication).

NESS

Ness City (67560): Alexis Jane Clarke, a Bachelor of Science in Nursing.

Taylor Renee Gabel, a Master of Science in special education (high incidence).

Shelly Renae Pavlu, a Doctor of Nursing Practice.

Ransom (67572): Krystina Lynn Caudill, a Master of Social Work (clinical).

Jordan Nicklas Sargent, a Bachelor of Science in technology studies (manufacturing).

NORTON

Lenora (67645): Justice Riley Voss, a Bachelor of Business Administration in marketing.

Norton (67654): Alexander Lee Atkins, a Bachelor of General Studies (networking).

Wilson R. Ellis, a Bachelor of Business Administration in management.

Skylar Drew Johnson, a Bachelor of General Studies (health promotion).

William E. Johnson, a Master of Science in education administration.

Rachel C. Jones, a Bachelor of Arts in music.

Raenee Patterson, a Master of Professional Studies (organizational leadership).

OSAGE

Osage City (66523): Elizabeth Olorunfemi, a Master of Science in Education (reading specialist).

Osage City (66523): Julia Elizabeth Whalen, a Bachelor of Science in psychology.

Overbrook (66524): Emily Jo Linder, a Bachelor of Arts in English (writing).

OSBORNE

Alton (67623): Anna Mae Peterson, a Bachelor of General Studies (psychological).

Downs (67437): Tonja Renee Bisnette, a Master of Science in education administration.

Olivia Grace Engler, a Bachelor of Business Administration in finance (banking).

Natoma (67651): Hannah Marie Chambray, a Bachelor of Science in health and human performance.

Osborne (67473): Logan Bohde Sprick, a Bachelor of Science in health and human performance.

Pierce Garrison Wolters, a Bachelor of Science in health and human performance.

OTTAWA

Bennington (67422): Matthew Ray Friess, a Bachelor of Science in technology leadership.

Michaelyn Marie Mick, a Bachelor of Science in medical diagnostic imaging (ultrasound).

Delphos (67436): Trisha K. Kiser, a Bachelor of General Studies (education).

Minneapolis (67467): Carlie Huntar Sanders, a Bachelor of Science in Nursing.

Dason Perry Sweat, a Bachelor of Science in technology studies (engineering design).

PAWNEE

Larned (67550): Jennifer Anne Applequist, a Bachelor of Business Administration in accounting (public accounting).

Brandon Joseph Bartz, a Bachelor of Science in technology studies (construction management).

Braeden Andrew Corman, a Bachelor of Business Administration in accounting.

Madison Clarice Erway, an Associate of General Studies (psychological) and a Bachelor of Science in organizational leadership.

Danielle Nicole Kingsbury, a Bachelor of Science in organizational leadership.

Bonnie Jean Landgraf, a Doctor of Nursing Practice.

Alea Marie Makings, an Associate of General Studies (education).

Wyatt Neeland, a Bachelor of Science in agricultural business.

Maci Erin Perez, a Master of Science in health and human performance.

Antwome Sherrod Topps, a Bachelor of Science in sociology.

PHILLIPS

Agra (67621): Joel Robert Struckhoff, a Master of Science in Education (transition to teaching).

Glade (67639): Erica Ann Hoover, a Bachelor of Science in psychology.

Hannah Jean Hoover, a Bachelor of Science in medical diagnostic imaging and an Associate of Science in radiologic technology.

Kirwin (67644): Darah Kay Bohl, a Master of Science in speech-language pathology.

Logan (67646): Crystal Marie Bliss, a Bachelor of Science in biology (health professions).

Marie Rose Ko, a Bachelor of Business Administration in finance (banking).

Tristen Alexandria McClurg, an Associate of Science in radiologic technology and a Bachelor of Science in medical diagnostic imaging.

Sierra B. Tien, a Bachelor of Science in Nursing.

Phillipsburg (67661): Kelsi Leanne Blew, a Bachelor of Science in elementary education.

Karlee Laraye Braun, a Bachelor of Science in elementary education.

Kimberlee Ellen Griffith, a Master of Science in psychology (clinical).

David C. Hindman, a Master of Science in education administration.

Mandra Joy Imm, a Master of Science in special education (high incidence).

Joshua Michael Lenker, a Bachelor of Science in agriculture (agronomy).

Prairie View (67664): Alyssa Christine Deboer, a Bachelor of Science in Nursing.

Alissa Nicole Krafft, a Master of Science in instructional technology.

Kevin Andrew Pinkerton, a Bachelor of Business Administration in management (human resource management).

POTTAWATOMIE

Onaga (66521): Brandon Eli Merriman, a Bachelor of Science in health and human performance (recreation and sport management).

St. George (66535): Andrew Daniel Trent, a Master of Science in counseling (school).

St. Marys (66536): Shannon Page Woodard, a Master of Science in communication (organizational).

Wamego (66547): Brittanie Kalynn Brazzle, a Bachelor of Science in criminal justice.

Jamie R. Douglass, a Master of Liberal Studies (public administration).

Shianne Figge, a Bachelor of Arts in psychology.

Margaret Audine Strait, a Master of Science in special education (high incidence).

Jana E. Winter, a Master of Science in special education (high incidence).

Westmoreland (66549): Shae Noel Biedenbender, a Bachelor of Fine Arts in art (interior design).

Wheaton (66521): Maggie Michaela Revell, a Bachelor of Science in psychology.

PRATT

Pratt (67124): Ryan Everett Ford, a Master of Science in special education (high incidence).

Lauren Madeline Dempewolf, a Bachelor of Science in agriculture (animal science).

Jorja Elizabeth Elliott, a Bachelor of Science in biology.

Kylee Dawn Hedrick, a Master of Science in counseling (school).

Sydney Jo Koirth, an Associate of Science in radiologic technology.

Emily Elizabeth Meisenheimer, a Master of Business Administration (digital marketing).

Caden Phillip Patterson, a Bachelor of Science in agricultural business.

Lauren Taylor Voss, a Bachelor of Arts in English (literature).

RAWLINS

Atwood (67730): Olivia Bridget Chvatal, a Bachelor of Business Administration in accounting (public accounting) and a Bachelor of Business Administration in management.

Jennifer Melia, a Bachelor of General Studies (historical).

McDonald (67745): Cole Christopher Sramek, a Bachelor of Science in agricultural business.

RENO

Buhler (67522): Anthony David Hearn, a Bachelor of Business Administration in accounting.

Cunningham (67583): Mary Megan Hansen, a Master of Science in Education (library specialist).

Hutchinson (67501): Jennifer Michelle Adams, a Master of Science in Education (English for speakers of other languages).

Brett O. Bright, an Education Specialist in advanced professional studies (education innovation and leadership).

Maddie Lynn Burns, a Bachelor of Science in tourism and hospitality management.

Tammy Renee Goertz, a Bachelor of Science in sociology.

Chad Edward Mendenhall, a Bachelor of Science in computer science.

Paige C. Stewart, a Master of Science in Education (transition to teaching).

Hutchinson (67502): Katelyn Marie Burkhart, an Associate of Science in radiologic technology.

Anna Marie Deal, a Bachelor of Arts in communication (public relations and advertising).

Shannon Marie Donaldson, a Master of Science in Education (elementary).

Shawn Eugene Freeman, a Master of Science in special education (high incidence).

Kalen C. Hilst, a Master of Science in Education (transition to teaching).

Evan Westin Maldonado, a Master of Science in health and human performance.

Jocelyn Kristene Seburn, a Bachelor of Science in elementary education.

Nickerson (67561): Joel Ephraim White, a Bachelor of Science in agricultural business.

Dakota Yates, a Master of Science in Education (transition to teaching).

South Hutchinson (67505): Matthew William Lamunyon, a Bachelor of Arts in history.

Turon (67583): Janelle Renee Frank, a Master of Science in special education (high incidence).

REPUBLIC

Agenda (66930): Taylor Lea Thompson, a Bachelor of Science in agriculture (agronomy).

Belleville (66935): Elizabeth Storm Callaway, a Bachelor of Science in elementary education.

Kale Gene Johnson, a Bachelor of Science in agricultural business.

Kodi Smith, a Bachelor of Science in biology (natural resources).

Ty Matthew Sothers, a Bachelor of General Studies (health promotion).

Courtland (66939): Brailyn Rae Carlgren, an Associate of General Studies (biological).

Rileigh Elizabeth Gardner, a Bachelor of Science in agricultural business.

Colby Hamel, a Master of Science in Education (transition to teaching).

Scandia (66966): Mason Lynn Runft, a Bachelor of Science in agricultural business.

RICE

Little River (67457): Taylor Marie Rolfs, a Bachelor of Science in medical diagnostic imaging (ultrasound).

Brady Logan Stephenson, a Bachelor of Business Administration in finance (economics).

Lyons (67554): Monica Paola Gamez-Yanez, a Master of Social Work (clinical).

Austin Moyer Gautier, a Master of Science in Education (transition to teaching).

Jacqueline Nicole Norez, a Bachelor of Science in Nursing.

Odalis G. Ordaz-Landeros, a Bachelor of Science in Nursing.

Kayla Lee Reid, a Master of Science in speech-language pathology.

Sterling (67579): Makenzie Lei Cork, a Master of Science in health and human performance.

Karen Gunther, a Master of Professional Studies (instructional design).

Morgan Walton, a Master of Science in education administration.

RILEY

Manhattan (66502): Amanda M. Ericson, an Education Specialist in school psychology.

Garrett Felipe Fuentes, a Bachelor of Science in elementary education.

Cortney Leeann Giefer, a Bachelor of General Studies (biological).

Cole Jacob Gritton, a Bachelor of Science in biology.

Jessica Nicole Hampton, a Bachelor of Science in elementary education.

Travis Leon Mulanax, a Bachelor of General Studies (general business).

Devin A. Norris, a Bachelor of Science in health and human performance (sport and exercise therapy).

Manhattan (66503): Abigail Buser, a Master of Science in Education (library specialist).

Haleigh Carlson, a Master of Science in education administration.

Patricia Louise Gutowski, a Doctor of Nursing Practice.

Tyson M. Loewen, a Bachelor of Science in agricultural business.

Kamri Nehls, a Master of Science in counseling (school).

Hillary Smylie, a Bachelor of Science in elementary education.

ROOKS

Plainville (67663): Colton William Bobek, a Bachelor of Business Administration in accounting (public accounting).

Jared S. Copeland, a Bachelor of Science in technology studies (construction management).

Brent Vaughn Gehring, a Bachelor of Science in secondary education.

Mykeltie E. Horting, a Bachelor of Science in psychology.

Trever Truxil Houser, a Bachelor of Science in technology studies (construction management).

Kim Rose Junkermeier, a Bachelor of Science in elementary education.

Anthony Jose Ventura, a Bachelor of Science in biology (health professions).

Alexis Deann Werner, a Master of Science in speech-language pathology.

Stockton (67669): Cecelia Rose Beck, a Bachelor of Science in biology (health professions).

Joel Allen Green, a Bachelor of Science in agriculture (general).

Kinsey Paige Post, a Bachelor of Science in Nursing.

Woodston (67675): Kyle Scott Hull, a Bachelor of Science in health and human performance (recreation and sport management).

RUSH

La Crosse (67548): Jamie Marie Deuel, a Master of Professional Studies (organizational leadership).

Makayla Deuel, a Bachelor of General Studies (psychological).

Clinton Sherwood Renfrow, a Master of Science in Education (transition to teaching).

Daniel Paul Schlegel, a Bachelor of Business Administration in management.

Katelyn Nicole Schmidt, a Master of Science in Education (reading specialist).

Liebenthal (67553): Joshua Tobias Stark, a Bachelor of Arts in chemistry (teacher education) and a Bachelor of Science in secondary education.

RUSSELL

Paradise (67658): Gracyn S. Miller, a Master of Science in psychology (school).

Russell (67665): Daisi Rae Brand, a Bachelor of Science in psychology.

Matthew Michael Buhrle, a Bachelor of Science in athletic training.

Alexia Jaye Charbonneau, a Bachelor of Science in biology (health professions).

Stephanie A. Cross, a Master of Social Work (clinical).

Abigail Janice Dreher, a Master of Science in instructional technology.

Bernadette Mary Franks, a Master of Science in counseling (clinical mental health).

Deanna J. Gray, a Master of Social Work (clinical).

Lauren Ashleigh Kasselman, a Master of Science in Education (transition to teaching).

Erin Lane Risher, a Bachelor of Science in health and human performance.

Kyle Trois Schroeder, a Bachelor of Science in agriculture (agronomy).

Thomas G. Standley, a Bachelor of Science in information networking and telecommunication (web and mobile application development).

Chantel L. Straub, a Bachelor of Arts in political science.

Sarah Paige Vonfeldt, a Master of Social Work (clinical).

SALINE

Assaria (67416): Coleman Wyatt Westhoff, a Bachelor of Business Administration in accounting (public accounting) and a Bachelor of Business Administration in finance.

Brookville (67425): Riley Garrett Drees, a Bachelor of Science in biology (health professions).

Salina (67401): Sydney Ann Bacon, a Master of Science in special education (high incidence).

Nicole Lyn Burkhardt, a Bachelor of Science in medical diagnostic imaging.

Alea Burt, a Bachelor of Science in tourism and hospitality management.

Brent Campbell, a Bachelor of General Studies (leadership).

Fatima Contreras, a Bachelor of Social Work.

Jason Chandler Drouillard, a Master of Science in education administration.

Latoriea Edwards, a Bachelor of General Studies.

Ginger Rose Garcia, an Education Specialist in school psychology.

Nash Patrick Gestl, a Bachelor of Science in biology.

Kira E. Gilbert, a Bachelor of General Studies (leadership).

Dylan Thomas Greytak, a Bachelor of Science in computer science.

Marysa Marie McCartney, a Master of Science in Education (transition to teaching).

Jesse Robert Mitchell-Rodriguez, a Bachelor of Science in elementary education.

Quinn Nicole Munk, an Associate of General Studies (leadership) and a Bachelor of Science in organizational leadership.

Samual Aiden Neff, a Bachelor of Business Administration in accounting.

Denise Nunemaker, a Master of Science in psychology (clinical).

Jacqueline Leigh Pahls, a Bachelor of Science in Nursing.

Stephanie S. Pena, a Bachelor of Science in Nursing.

Rodney E. Penn, a Bachelor of General Studies (psychological).

Dariane Larae Piper, a Bachelor of Fine Arts in art (graphic design).

Kelsey D. Plummer, a Master of Science in special education (high incidence).

Kasey Morgan Renshaw, a Bachelor of Science in elementary education.

Clint Phillip Ryan, a Bachelor of Science in computer science.

Kelcey Nadine Smith, a Bachelor of Science in psychology.

Saralyn Marie Szyndlar, a Master of Science in special education (high incidence).

Kathleen Marie Taylor, a Bachelor of Science in elementary education.

Amanda Christine Thies, a Doctor of Nursing Practice.

Markie M. Townsend, a Master of Science in Nursing (education).

Mason Montgomery Unruh, an Associate of General Studies (massage therapy).

SCOTT

Scott City (67871): Brenda Nallely Aguirre-Apodaca, a Bachelor of Science in biology (health professions).

Oscar Luis Amezcua, a Bachelor of Science in Nursing.

Alysan Paige Buehler, a Bachelor of Science in communication sciences and disorders.

Kyle D. Cure, a Bachelor of Science in agricultural business.

Justin Wayne Faurot, a Bachelor of Science in health and human performance (recreation and sport management).

Judith M. Gutierrez-Aguilera, a Bachelor of Business Administration in marketing.

Abigail Josefina Hernandez, a Bachelor of Social Work.

Nicole Brooke Semenko, a Bachelor of Business Administration in management (human resource management).

Jalyn Marie Shaw, a Master of Social Work (clinical).

Kelly Allison Wycoff, a Master of Science in health and human performance.

SEDGWICK

Andale (67001): Christian Daniel King, a Bachelor of Science in health and human performance (sport and exercise therapy).

Zachary J. Meyer, a Bachelor of Science in chemistry (biochemistry).

Bel Aire (67213): Alicia Marie Perry, a Bachelor of Science in elementary education.

Bel Aire (67220): Calie Elizabeth Greenwood, a Master of Science in Education (transition to teaching).

Bel Aire (67226): Carolyn J. Creekmore, a Bachelor of Science in elementary education.

Cheney (67025): Sabrina Ashley Johnson, a Bachelor of Science in psychology.

Trae Dion Johnson, a Bachelor of Business Administration in management (human resource management).

Cody C. Kohler, a Master of Science in education administration.

MacKenzie McGregor, a Bachelor of Arts in English (writing).

Clearwater (67026): Sue Lynn Ake, a Bachelor of Science in elementary education.

Audrey Nicole Greene, a Bachelor of Science in Nursing.

Colwich (67030): Peter James Carney, a Bachelor of Business Administration in finance.

Virginia Rose Gerber, a Bachelor of Business Administration in management (human resource management).

Hannah M. Hulett, a Bachelor of Business Administration in management (human resource management).

Cole Patrick Murray, a Bachelor of Science in health and human performance (sport and exercise therapy).

Derby (67037): Braden Wayne Archer, a Bachelor of Business Administration in marketing.

Matthew Beigel, a Bachelor of Science in organizational leadership.

Sandra Kae Bosch, a Bachelor of Science in elementary education.

Josephine Mary King, a Bachelor of Science in elementary education.

Cole Laurence Maddux, a Bachelor of Science in biology (natural resources).

Allison M. Meyerhoff, a Bachelor of Science in elementary education.

Joseph Paul Standard, a Master of Science in education administration.

Eastborough (67207): Eric George, a Master of Science in instructional technology.

Garden Plain (67050): Kylie Nicole Thomas, a Bachelor of Fine Arts in art (graphic design).

Goddard (67052): Taylor Lee Richter, a Bachelor of Science in health and human performance (K-12 teaching and coaching).

Kaitlyn Marie Tibbitts, a Bachelor of Fine Arts in art (studio).

Haysville (67060): Kara Nicole Pape, a Bachelor of Science in Nursing.

Alexis Diane Sanchez, a Bachelor of Science in psychology.

Halle Ila Tripp, a Bachelor of Science in sociology.

Trudy Ann Ward, an Associate of General Studies (education) and a Bachelor of General Studies general studies (child development).

Laura Anne Williams, a Bachelor of Business Administration in management.

Maize (67101): Jamal Joynes, a Master of Science in Education (transition to teaching).

Valley Center (67147): Sierra Barr, a Doctor of Nursing Practice.

Anne Rose Breitigan, a Bachelor of Business Administration in management (human resource management).

Judson Dean Tillotson, a Bachelor of Arts in mathematics (teaching) and a Bachelor of Science in secondary education.

Wichita (67037): Ariona Bryanne Gardner, a Bachelor of General Studies (psychological).

Wichita (67203): Chario Danett Carter, a Master of Science in instructional technology.

Eleanore Johnson, a Master of Science in education administration.

Jennifer Ann Kramer, a Bachelor of General Studies (human services).

Corbie Leiker, a Master of Science in Education (transition to teaching).

Rachael Monarez, a Bachelor of General Studies (education).

Wichita (67204): Stephanie Ruth Marsh-Ballinger, a Bachelor of Science in sociology.

Cassandra Marie McIntyre, a Bachelor of Science in psychology.

Kelly Jane'e Moore, a Master of Social Work (clinical).

Wichita (67205): Tiffany Marie Kennedy, a Bachelor of Business Administration in management.

Cynthia Anne Kraft, a Master of Science in special education (high incidence).

Andrea Nietfeld, a Master of Science in counseling (school).

Christopher G. Schulte, a Master of Professional Studies (human resource management).

Brenna Rae Stamper, a Bachelor of Science in elementary education.

Wichita (67206): Grant Allen Culver, a Bachelor of Science in computer science.

Kayla Guetersloh, a Bachelor of Science in medical diagnostic imaging (ultrasound).

Samantha Jo Kidd, a Bachelor of Science in organizational leadership.

Heather Ann Madrigal, a Bachelor of Science in Nursing.

Nicole L. Parks, a Master of Science in Education (English for speakers of other languages).

Wichita (67207): Darin Andrew Donecker, a Bachelor of General Studies (health promotion).

Meredith Leigh Long, a Bachelor of Science in organizational leadership.

Erika Mikus, a Master of Social Work (clinical).

Amy Stewart, a Bachelor of Business Administration in management.

Wichita (67208): Cheryl R. Cazel, a Master of Science in counseling (school).

Isabela Alexandra Nickel, a Master of Science in Education (English for speakers of other languages).

Sarah Katherine Reilly, a Master of Science in Education (transition to teaching).

Wichita (67209): Cody N. Blasi, a Bachelor of General Studies (general business).

Kevin Paul Folsom, a Bachelor of Science in health and human performance (K-12 teaching and coaching).

Madison Renea May, a Bachelor of Arts in communication (public relations and advertising).

Emma Taylor, a Bachelor of Business Administration in accounting.

Wichita (67210): Jerryn Bernadette Albers, a Bachelor of Science in biology (natural resources).

Wichita (67211): Tierra Marie Knox, a Master of Science in Education (transition to teaching).

Megan Colleen Roth, a Bachelor of Social Work.

Wichita (67212): Taylor Blehm, a Master of Science in education administration.

Katelyn Page Darnell, a Bachelor of Science in Nursing.

Brooke Alexandria Hinkle, a Master of Science in education administration.

Alberto Jimenez, a Bachelor of Science in computer science.

David P. Lingg, a Bachelor of Business Administration in international business and economics.

Candace Lynn Nance, a Bachelor of Science in health studies.

Diana M. Santillan, a Master of Science in counseling (school).

Grace Marie Suter, a Master of Social Work (clinical).

Cami Nicole Taylor, a Master of Science in special education (high incidence).

Bria Ashley Tucker, a Bachelor of General Studies (education).

Rebekah Ziesch, a Bachelor of Science in information networking and telecommunication (web and mobile application development).

Wichita (67213): Ty Robinson, a Bachelor of Science in Nursing.

Wichita (67214): Moriah Carter, a Bachelor of Science in psychology.

Wichita (67215): Cody Mitchell Erwin, a Bachelor of Science in geosciences (geography).

Jamie Marie Patton, a Bachelor of General Studies (education).

Marianne Christine Roudebush, a Master of Science in instructional technology.

Wichita (67217): Nathan Carpenter, a Master of Science in Education (transition to teaching).

Brooke Elizabeth Hager, a Bachelor of Science in information networking and telecommunication (computer networking).

Austin James McQuilken, a Bachelor of Science in health and human performance.

Karli Lynn Robinson, a Bachelor of General Studies (child development).

Kelsie Eileen Young, a Bachelor of Science in Nursing.

Wichita (67218): Olivia Marie Albrecht, a Bachelor of Business Administration in marketing (digital).

Lisa Ann Gamble, a Master of Science in education administration.

Emily Rae Haltom, a Master of Science in Education (transition to teaching).

Wichita (67226): John E. Egan, a Bachelor of Business Administration in finance.

Kristina Lea Matthaei, a Master of Science in education administration.

Alaa Nidal Samaro, a Master of Liberal Studies (gerontology).

Blaine Thomas Wertz, a Master of Science in biology.

Wichita (67230): Jarod Alexander Appelhans, a Bachelor of Business Administration in finance (banking).

McKenzy Black, a Bachelor of General Studies (education).

Emily Marie Brecht, a Bachelor of Fine Arts in art (graphic design).

Monte Loren Brzon, a Bachelor of Science in biology (natural resources).

Wichita (67235): Makayli Anne Allender, a Bachelor of Arts in English (writing).

Pinwan C. Davis, a Bachelor of General Studies (education).

Jacob Ensz, a Bachelor of Science in information networking and telecommunication (cyber security).

Lance Osric-Albert Francis, a Master of Science in Education (transition to teaching).

Natasha Marie Kauffman, a Master of Science in Education (transition to teaching).

Joseph J. Kinnevan, a Bachelor of Business Administration in management.

Jacob Taylor, a Bachelor of Science in health and human performance (sport and exercise therapy).

Victoria Lynn Thompson, a Bachelor of Science in tourism and hospitality management.

SEWARD

Kismet (67859): Taryn Garza, a Bachelor of Science in medical diagnostic imaging and an Associate of Science in radiologic technology.

Liberal (67901): Odalys Rubi Avalosbarraza, a Bachelor of Arts in communication (public relations and advertising).

Bhavisha Bhakta, a Bachelor of Science in biology (health professions).

Jacie Anne Butler, a Master of Professional Studies (criminal justice).

Blanca Yarett Castro, a Bachelor of Arts in psychology.

James Kennedy Cooper, a Master of Science in Education (transition to teaching).

Magali Garcia, a Bachelor of Fine Arts in art (interior design).

Elena R. Gomez, a Bachelor of Social Work.

Daisey Nallely Hernandez, a Bachelor of Arts in foreign language (Spanish for specific purposes).

Anabel Parra, a Bachelor of Arts in psychology.

Brianna Renee Watt, a Bachelor of General Studies (political).

Rustin E. Watt, a Master of Science in Education (transition to teaching).

SHAWNEE

Auburn (66402): Robert Francis Schmidt, a Bachelor of Business Administration in accounting.

Rossville (66533): Kathleen Elizabeth Long, an Associate of Science in radiologic technology.

Kallie N. Musick, a Bachelor of Science in health and human performance.

Silver Lake (66539): Joshua Hunter Klein, a Bachelor of Science in health and human performance (recreation and sport management).

Tecumseh (66542): Zachary Joe Mickens, a Master of Science in special education (high incidence).

Topeka (66601): Zhuang He, a Bachelor of Business Administration in international business and economics.

Topeka (66603): Diane Nunez, a Bachelor of Science in geosciences (geography).

Topeka (66604): Nathan James Hanna, a Master of Science in special education (high incidence).

Kasi Renae Kraus, a Master of Science in special education (high incidence).

Lindsee Ann Myers, a Bachelor of General Studies (general business).

Lisbeth White, a Master of Science in Education (library specialist).

Topeka (66605): Regina Marie Errebo, an Associate of General Studies (networking information systems).

Nicholas Everett Henry, a Bachelor of Science in information networking and telecommunication (computer networking).

Jody A. Johnson, a Bachelor of General Studies (general business).

Megan Elizabeth Rose, a Bachelor of Fine Arts in art (interior design).

Danielle E. Szuba, a Bachelor of Arts in communication.

Topeka (66606): Katelyn B. Dinkel, a Master of Science in education administration.

Erin Elizabeth Perkins, a Master of Science in education administration.

Topeka (66607): Yohanna Beatriz Barreno, a Bachelor of Science in education (early childhood unified).

Topeka (66610): Paige Maureen Alexander, a Master of Science in speech-language pathology.

Alicia Marie Lamb, a Master of Science in education administration.

Angela Janine Peoples, a Bachelor of Science in education (early childhood unified).

Alex Douglas Rea, a Bachelor of Science in political science.

Topeka (66611): Connor Champney, a Bachelor of Science in biology (natural resources).

Carrie Jo Gros, a Master of Science in Education (transition to teaching).

Topeka (66614): Jaime Anne Berry, a Doctor of Nursing Practice.

Kylie Breanne Bussell, an Associate of Science in radiologic technology and a Bachelor of Science in medical diagnostic imaging.

Benjamin Reed Coultis, a Bachelor of Science in information networking and telecommunication (computer networking).

Jordan Lynn Ferron, a Bachelor of Business Administration in finance (banking).

Dana Leigh Fitzgerald, a Master of Science in Education (library specialist).

Hannah Marie Fritz, a Bachelor of Business Administration in management.

Joellen Elizabeth Key, a Bachelor of Science in Nursing.

Timothy Erin Rush, a Master of Science in counseling (clinical mental health).

Rachel Wells, a Master of Professional Studies (human resource management).

Topeka (66615): Trenton Scott Colter, a Bachelor of Arts in philosophy.

Emily Velazquez, a Master of Liberal Studies (political leadership).

Topeka (66616): Courtney L. Appelhanz, a Master of Science in special education (high incidence).

Dawn Deann Cott-Acosta, a Bachelor of General Studies (education).

Topeka (66617): Kari Leigh Baker, a Master of Science in special education (high incidence).

Jordan Michelle Eshbaugh, a Bachelor of Science in Nursing.

Evan R. Woodward, an Associate of General Studies (general business).

Topeka (66618): Rachel Leah Motta, a Bachelor of General Studies (education).

Lawrence Monroe Woltje, a Bachelor of General Studies (networking).

Emily Elizabeth Wools, a Master of Science in speech-language pathology.

Topeka (66619): Danae S. Hayes, an Education Specialist in school psychology.

Wakarusa (66546): John Philip Boyd, a Bachelor of Science in health and human performance (fitness programming).

Amanda Elizabeth Miller, a Bachelor of Science in communication sciences and disorders.

SHERIDAN

Hoxie (67740): Leah Pauline Heskett, a Master of Science in instructional technology.

Chelsey Danielle Moser, a Bachelor of Science in Nursing.

Hannah Mary Wildeman, a Bachelor of Science in elementary education.

SHERMAN

Goodland (67735): Jacob Cole Brown, an Associate of Science in radiologic technology and a Bachelor of Science in medical diagnostic imaging.

Valerie Marie Ihrig, a Master of Science in instructional technology.

Melissa Dawn Pelkey, a Bachelor of Science in Nursing.

Teryn Rees Tompkins, a Bachelor of Business Administration in marketing (digital).

SMITH

Gaylord (67638): Sierra Delea Kirchhoff, a Bachelor of Science in agriculture (animal science).

Kensington (66951): Ciara Rae Calhoon, a Bachelor of Music (education) and a Bachelor of Science in secondary education.

Morgan Anne Westbrook, a Bachelor of Business Administration in accounting.

Lebanon (66952): Cheyanne Nicole Molzahn, a Bachelor of Science in medical diagnostic imaging (ultrasound).

Smith Center (66967): Belen Barragan, a Bachelor of Science in psychology.

Lauryn Dean Davis, a Bachelor of Science in elementary education.

Dalton Oliver, a Bachelor of Science in biology (natural resources).

Kacie Jo Timmons, a Bachelor of Science in agricultural business.

STAFFORD

Macksville (67557): Deisy Carrillo, a Bachelor of Arts in communication (public relations and advertising).

St. John (67576): Clayton Dwayne Brummer, a Bachelor of Science in agricultural business.

Brad Emery, a Master of Science in education administration.

Kourtney May Smith, a Bachelor of Science in psychology.

Stafford (67578): Dianna Jene Bunker, a Master of Science in Education (elementary).

Harlee Marie Mead, a Bachelor of General Studies (education).

STANTON

Johnson (67855): Ressa Tanae Mason, a Bachelor of General Studies (education).

STEVENS

Hugoton (67951): Alayna Marie Addison, a Master of Science in Education (reading specialist).

Jennifer Rose Burrows, a Master of Science in Education (transition to teaching).

Kara Delauretis, a Master of Science in special education (high incidence).

Pedro Ordonez, a Bachelor of Science in computer science.

Chelsi Randle, a Master of Science in Education (transition to teaching).

Sydni Francis Root, a Bachelor of General Studies (psychological).

Moscow (67952): Micaela Lynn Thompson, a Bachelor of Science in elementary education.

SUMNER

Conway Springs (67031): Brian Allen Vancuren, a Bachelor of Science in secondary education.

Mulvane (67110): Kaitlyn Flickinger, a Master of Science in Education (transition to teaching).

Carly Ann-Marie Nichols, a Bachelor of Science in elementary education.

South Haven (67140): Melissa Ann Russell, a Master of Science in Education (transition to teaching).

Wellington (67152): Karen Abby Cornejo, a Master of Science in Education (transition to teaching).

Judy T. Joseph, an Associate of General Studies (human services).

Kristi Elaine Whaley, a Master of Science in Education (reading specialist).

THOMAS

Colby (67701): Laura Lea Graham, a Bachelor of General Studies (general business).

Tayber Haremza, a Bachelor of Science in agricultural business.

Taylor Ireland, a Master of Science in instructional technology.

Brandon Douglas Johnson, a Bachelor of Science in agricultural business.

Hannah E. Johnston, a Master of Science in psychology (school).

Makenna Lorraine Mettlen, a Bachelor of Science in agricultural business.

Matthew D. Pieper, a Bachelor of Science in biology.

Shannon Diane Reilley, a Bachelor of General Studies (human services).

Ashlyn Liane Sager, a Bachelor of Fine Arts in art (interior design).

Brook Ziegelmeier, a Master of Science in health and human performance.

Gem (67734): Cole Victor Ziegelmeier, a Bachelor of Science in agricultural business and a Bachelor of Science in agriculture (agronomy).

Levant (67743): Jessica Leigh McCoy, a Master of Science in education administration.

Rexford (67753): Andrew Jacob Luna, a Master of Science in Education (elementary).

TREGO

Collyer (67631): Rae Ann Mattke, a Master of Science in special education (high incidence).

WaKeeney (67672): Nanette Marie Brown, a Master of Arts in English.

Cynthia Jean Cline, a Master of Business Administration (marketing).

Adrian J. Dietz, an Associate of Applied Science in applied technology and leadership (business communication and technology).

Kellie Danielle Lee, a Master of Science in Education (transition to teaching).

Cheyenne Nickelson, a Bachelor of Science in health and human performance (sport and exercise therapy).

WABAUNSEE

Alma (66401): Rayann June Johnson, an Associate of Science in radiologic technology.

Alta Vista (66834): Diana Kay Ehrlich, a Bachelor of General Studies (education).

Eskridge (66423): Sami Lee Logan, a Master of Science in Education (library specialist).

WALLACE

Sharon Springs (67758): Hannah B. Pletcher, a Bachelor of Business Administration in accounting.

Candice Andrea Vanallen, a Master of Science in Education (transition to teaching).

Wallace (67761): Grady Matthew Hammer, a Bachelor of Science in agriculture (agronomy).

Weskan (67762): Edgar Valenzuela, a Bachelor of Science in health and human performance.

WASHINGTON

Clifton (66937): Mikayla Rae Kieffer, an Associate of Science in radiologic technology and a Bachelor of Science in medical diagnostic imaging.

Washington (66968): Jayda Lynn Edgar, a Doctor of Nursing Practice.

Annie Yungeberg, a Master of Science in Education (elementary).

WICHITA

Leoti (67861): Andrea Dawn Bauck, a Master of Science in Education (elementary).

Hunter Blane Hassell, a Bachelor of Science in agricultural business.

Jacob Daniel Schumacher, a Bachelor of Business Administration in finance.

Trisha Marie Venosdel, an Associate of General Studies (education).

WYANDOTTE

Bonner Springs (66012): Sydney Foudray, an Education Specialist in school psychology.

Susan R. Lund, a Bachelor of General Studies (education).

Kansas City (66102): Gary Enrique Bradley-Lopez, a Master of Professional Studies (organizational leadership).

Abby Elise Gergick, a Bachelor of General Studies (biological).

Kansas City (66104): Michael Odi Etiobhio, a Bachelor of Science in computer science.

Kansas City (66109): Angela Carol Garrison, a Master of Professional Studies (criminal justice).

Richard Joseph Harris, a Master of Professional Studies (organizational leadership).

Kyle Kohler, a Master of Science in Education (transition to teaching).

Samuel Paul Lagle, a Bachelor of Science in information networking and telecommunication (cyber security).

Mallory Kendyl Milstead, a Master of Business Administration (accounting).

Tatum Nikole Monley, a Bachelor of Business Administration in accounting (public accounting).

Mario Sandoval Jr., a Bachelor of General Studies (general business).

Amy Marie Scruggs, a Master of Science in education administration.

Michelle Ann Stout, a Master of Science in health and human performance.

Kansas City (66111): Shanna Marie Smith, a Bachelor of Business Administration in marketing (general).

Kansas City (66112): Antonia Marie Becerra, a Bachelor of Business Administration in finance.

Salena (66101): Zhongyun Wang, a Bachelor of Business Administration in finance.

GRADUATES FROM OTHER STATES and TERRITORIES

ALABAMA

Alabaster (35007): Donald Morris Ray, a Bachelor of Science in technology leadership (career and technical education).

Mobile (36695): Brittney Marie Reed, a Bachelor of Science in medical diagnostic imaging.

ALASKA

Sterling (99672): Juanita Jacinto, a Bachelor of Science in Nursing.

ARIZONA

Gilbert (85296): Haley Lachnidt, an Associate of General Studies (general business).

Goodyear (85395): Robin Dannette Dorathy, a Bachelor of Business Administration in accounting.

Marana (85658): Sheila Jayne Bazulka, a Bachelor of General Studies (general business).

Mesa (85206): Dariane Schwartz, a Bachelor of General Studies (human services).

Queen Creek (85142): Hamda Hannan Awaal, a Doctor of Nursing Practice.

ARKANSAS

Fayetteville (72703): Benjamin T. Hoffhines, a Master of Science in psychology (school).

CALIFORNIA

Antelope (95843): Hulda Yesoon Kim, a Doctor of Nursing Practice.

Canyon Country (91387): Courtney Nichole Cordova, a Bachelor of Science in sociology.

Doha (05550): Jacqueline T. Penney, a Bachelor of Science in elementary education.

Escondido (92026): Lyle D. Whitaker, a Bachelor of General Studies (general business).

Fontana (92336): Caleb Bateman Rothe, a Master of Science in instructional technology.

Lake Elsinore (92532): Richard Kue, a Bachelor of Science in computer science.

Los Angeles (90045): Howie G. Hu, a Bachelor of Arts in philosophy and a Bachelor of Science in psychology.

Poway (92064): Eduardo C. Navarro, a Bachelor of Science in Nursing.

Rancho Santa Margari (95592): Sherry Kay Wagener, a Master of Liberal Studies (art).

San Diego (92106): Nicholas Randolph Wicker, a Bachelor of Business Administration in management information systems.

San Diego (92126): Jennifer Mique, a Bachelor of General Studies (general business).

Santa Ana (92707): Donna Montoya, a Bachelor of General Studies (human services).

Tulare (93274): Danielle Renee Gaspar, a Bachelor of Science in health and human performance.

Vallejo (94591): Malcolm Jacob Daniels, a Master of Professional Studies (human resource management).

Visalia (93292): Donovan D. McJunkin, a Bachelor of Arts in history.

Walnut (91789): Sarah Yvonne Ramos, a Bachelor of General Studies (child development).

West Sacramento (95605): Hailey L. Criss, a Master of Liberal Studies (management information systems).

COLORADO

Agate (80101): Holly Gaughan Sielaff, a Bachelor of Science in elementary education.

Michaela Grace Sielaff, a Bachelor of Science in biology.

Arvada (80005): Katja Mayhak, a Master of Science in speech-language pathology.

Ault (80610): Medora Ryan Fralick, a Master of Social Work (clinical).

Aurora (80015): Bonnie Marlane Hunt, a Bachelor of Business Administration in management.

Aurora (80016): Terran Dee Caldwell, a Bachelor of Science in Nursing.

Zariah Zhane Smith, a Bachelor of Social Work.

Brighton (80602): Savanah Nichole Hill, a Master of Science in instructional technology.

Byers (80103): Tanner Dean Despard, a Bachelor of Science in health and human performance (sport and exercise therapy).

Castle Rock (80104): Shane Michael Fast, a Bachelor of General Studies (criminal justice).

Centennial (80015): John Ryan Grasser, a Master of Science in health and human performance.

Centennial (80121): Christian Michael Delaney, a Bachelor of General Studies (biological).

Cheyenne Wells (80810): Rhiley Ann Unruh, a Bachelor of Science in criminal justice.

Colorado Springs (80906): Alisha Joanne Kurtz, a Bachelor of General Studies (education).

Ashley Maelyn Phillips, a Bachelor of General Studies (tourism and hospitality management).

Colorado Springs (80918): Bryan Donald Johnson, a Master of Science in speech-language pathology.

Colorado Springs (80920): Michelle Gurule Velazquez, a Master of Science in education administration.

Colorado Springs (80938): Alessandra Rosa Polignano, a Bachelor of Science in elementary education.

Denver (80207): Omar Almukhtar, a Master of Professional Studies (web and mobile applications).

Imani Bahati Moore, a Bachelor of Science in psychology.

Denver (80209): Cynthia Bankston Ray, a Bachelor of General Studies (political).

Denver (80238): William James Schramm, a Bachelor of General Studies (human services).

Eads (81036): Mindi Uhland, a Bachelor of Science in communication sciences and disorders.

Elizabeth (80107): Amanda Kay Judd, a Doctor of Nursing Practice.

Firestone (80504): Jaclyn Marie Scott, a Master of Science in education administration.

Fleming (80728): Lauren Marcell Whittington, a Bachelor of Science in medical diagnostic imaging and an Associate of Science in radiologic technology.

Fort Collins (80528): Megan Marie Jamison, a Bachelor of Science in elementary education.

Grace Philop, a Bachelor of Science in Nursing.

Kayla Ann Thiebaut, a Master of Science in special education (high incidence).

Fort Morgan (80701): Silvia Nayeli Gallarza, a Bachelor of Business Administration in management (human resource management).

Golden (80401): Megan Cooley Feiner, a Bachelor of Science in communication sciences and disorders.

Highlands Ranch (80129): Michael Strecker, a Bachelor of Science in business education (corporate communication).

Idaho Springs (80452): Chelsea Annarose Hanson, a Master of Science in biology.

Keenesburg (80643): Casey J. Cantwell, an Associate of General Studies (agricultural).

Lakewood (80215): Carly Jean Blackard, a Bachelor of Science in elementary education.

Nicole Kampmeier, a Master of Business Administration (leadership studies).

Lakewood (80228): Brooklyn Verdune Gaffner, a Bachelor of General Studies.

Lamar (81052): Leigh Allyson Forney, a Master of Science in counseling (school).

Kendra King, a Bachelor of General Studies (leadership).

Emma Katherine Westhoff, a Bachelor of Science in organizational leadership.

Las Animas (81054): Shelby Dawn Davis, a Master of Science in speech-language pathology.

Lisa Lynn Routh, a Master of Science in counseling (school).

Limon (80828): Veronica Jill Younger, an Associate of Science in radiologic technology and a Bachelor of Science in medical diagnostic imaging.

Littleton (80125): Andrea Marie Nimz, a Bachelor of Science in medical diagnostic imaging (ultrasound).

Lone Tree (80124): Alexis Haley Kagan, a Bachelor of Science in political science.

Louisville (80027): Kathryn Elaine Columbus, a Master of Science in health and human performance.

Loveland (80537): Scott Phillip Keenan, a Master of Science in instructional technology.

Kiran Chaitaly Muetz, a Bachelor of Arts in music.

Manitou Springs (80829): Shane Barrett Coyne, a Master of Professional Studies (organizational leadership).

Merino (80741): Rachel Mae Mari, a Bachelor of Science in health and human performance.

Monument (80132): Matthew William Northway, a Bachelor of Science in technology studies (construction management).

Northglenn (80233): Allyson Rachel Gottschalk, a Bachelor of Science in sociology.

Orchard (80649): Shane Robert Finegan, a Bachelor of Science in geosciences (geography).

Parker (80134): Kathryn Hope Foster, a Bachelor of General Studies (human services).

Taylor Rose Vogel, a Bachelor of Arts in psychology.

Parker (80138): Sara Lynn Breckbill, a Bachelor of Business Administration in marketing (digital).

Diane Michelle Culverhouse, a Bachelor of Science in organizational leadership.

Ethan Reid, a Bachelor of Science in geosciences (geology).

Peyton (80831): Raphael Furtado, a Bachelor of Business Administration in marketing (business development and sales).

Pueblo (81001): Tyler Kent Trahern, a Master of Science in education administration.

Pueblo (81005): Tony August Pechek, a Master of Science in education administration.

Pueblo West (81007): Clint Buderus, a Master of Science in education administration.

Simla (80835): Paeton Acacia Harms, a Bachelor of Science in communication sciences and disorders.

Sterling (80751): Brett Alexander Brewer, a Bachelor of Science in technology studies (construction management).

Jessica Holloway, a Bachelor of Science in medical diagnostic imaging and an Associate of Science in radiologic technology.

Sydney Erin Wright, a Bachelor of Science in medical diagnostic imaging and an Associate of Science in radiologic technology.

Strasburg (80136): Riley Everett Blagg, a Bachelor of Science in organizational leadership.

Thornton (80241): Joshua Sean Dupree, a Bachelor of Science in information networking and telecommunication (information systems).

Timnath (80547): Sarah E. Simpson, an Education Specialist in school psychology.

Trinidad (81082): Julia Katherine Duran, a Master of Science in psychology (clinical).

Westminster (80020): Karen Louise Rush, a Bachelor of Science in Nursing.

Westminster (80031): Tyler Shane Follett, a Bachelor of Science in information networking and telecommunication (web and mobile application development).

Whitewater (81527): Taryn Sargent, an Associate of General Studies (health promotion).

Wiley (81092): Avery E. Bollinger, a Bachelor of General Studies (health promotion).

Savannah Katheryn Bollinger, a Bachelor of General Studies (communication).

Taya Mae Jagers, a Master of Science in Education (reading specialist).

Woodland Park (80863): Drew Bealby, a Master of Science in geosciences.

Wray (80758): Paulyna M. Schulz, a Master of Science in psychology (clinical).

Yampa (80483): Mattie Renae Rossi, a Bachelor of Science in agricultural business.

CONNECTICUT

Manchester (06040): Sara Suitor, a Master of Science in Education (library specialist).

DELEWARE

Middletown (19962): Christine Adubato, an Education Specialist in school psychology.

FLORIDA

Boca Raton (33428): Nahir Ailen Lozza, a Bachelor of Science in psychology.

Chuluota (32766): Tristan Andrew Tucker, a Bachelor of Business Administration in management (entrepreneurship).

Crawfordville (32327): Dy'Juan Carney, a Bachelor of Science in elementary education.

Fort Myers (33913): Jeffrey John Grockowski, a Bachelor of Science in computer science.

Green Cove Springs (32043): Luke Batchelor, a Bachelor of Science in computer science.

Hollywood (33021): Simha Kohn, a Bachelor of Business Administration in accounting.

Merritt Island (32953): Tondalayo L. Schaller, a Bachelor of Science in tourism and hospitality management.

Miami (33186): Emilio Jose Lacayo-Valle, a Master of Science in instructional technology.

Odessa (33556): Ralph III Smith, a Master of Professional Studies (computer networking).

Orange City (32763): Elisha Gibeon Caffey, a Master of Science in psychology (school).

Orange Park (32065): Ilner Boucicaut, a Bachelor of Science in tourism and hospitality management.

Pahokee (33476): Amari Angram, a Bachelor of Science in information networking and telecommunication (digital media production and journalism).

Palm Coast (32164): Mary Ann Phillips, a Bachelor of General Studies (human services).

Pompano Beach (33062): Sandra Perkins, a Bachelor of General Studies (leadership).

Port St. Lucie (34983): Cassandra Novalien, a Master of Liberal Studies (global).

Port St. Lucie (34986): Jerome Nelson, a Master of Science in instructional technology.

Ruskin (33570): Shahara Stanfield, a Doctor of Nursing Practice.

Ruskin (33573): Jefrey Ezekiel Blake, a Bachelor of General Studies (general business).

Tallahassee (32310): Julia Beth Huft, a Master of Science in Nursing (education).

Tampa (33626): Abeni S. El-Amin, a Master of Professional Studies (public health administration).

West Melbourne (32904): Rachel Uberbacher, a Bachelor of Science in agricultural business.

West Palm Beach (33417): Annessa Edelstein, a Bachelor of General Studies (education).

Ryan Joshua Runkewich, a Bachelor of General Studies (human services).

GEORGIA

Athens (30607): Julius O. Ayovunefe, a Bachelor of Science in psychology.

Atlanta (30318): Kevin Sims, a Bachelor of Science in computer science (ne","{'neg': 0.008, 'neu': 0.958, 'pos': 0.034, 'compound': 0.9999}"
20,Mechanism of Huaihuasan Against Ulcerative Colitis | DDDT,1 month ago,"Network Pharmacology Prediction and Molecular Docking-Based ... After thousands of years of development, numerous herbal formulae of...",https://www.dovepress.com/network-pharmacology-prediction-and-molecular-docking-based-strategy-t-peer-reviewed-fulltext-article-DDDT,"Introduction

Ulcerative colitis (UC) is a form of inflammatory bowel disease (IBD) characterized by inflammation of the intestinal mucosa, whose pathogenesis consists of related immuno-inflammatory pathways.1 Although some traditional therapeutic drugs, for instance, corticosteroids, can be applied to treat UC, there still exist some adverse effects.2,3 Moreover, the incidence of the disease has been increasing over the past decade in both industrialized and developing countries, while the burden will continue to rise worldwide.4–7 Hence, it is urgent to explore alternative novel therapies of UC with low toxicity, low cost and high quality.

After thousands of years of development, numerous herbal formulae of Traditional Chinese Medicine (TCM) have been widely applied in multiple diseases, including cancer,8 diabetes mellitus,9 and so on. Besides, over the last few decades, TCM has been playing a more and more significant role in Chinese clinical practice especially during the COVID-19 pandemic in 2019.10–14 However, due to the complexity of the interactions between components and components, components and targets, targets and the disease, as well as targets and targets, how to uncover the mysterious veil of the underlying molecular mechanism of TCM remains a considerable challenge, which has largely hindered the universal acceptance of TCM worldwide.

Huai Hua San (HHS) is a classic TCM formula first mentioned in a famous ancient medicine treatise, “Pu-Ji-Ben-Shi-Fang”, of the Song dynasty. The formula comprises four herbs, including Aurantii Fructus (Chinese name: Zhiqiao), Schizonepetae Spica (Chinese name: Jingjiesui), Sophorae Flos (Chinese name: Huaihua), and Platycladi Cacumen (Chinese name: Cebaiye) at a weight ratio of 1:1:2:2. Massive evidence has demonstrated that HHS alone or HHS plus other herbs can exert favorable anti-UC effects. HHS was reported to effectively treat UC in rats mainly by reducing the infiltration of inflammatory cells and decreasing the level of inflammation.15 Besides, HHS has the potential to significantly regulate the composition and structure of colonic microbial and prevent DSS-induced dysbiosis, thereby ameliorating colitis in rats.16 Furthermore, according to further classification of UC by TCM theory, HHS could be used in combination with other TCM formulae including Taohuatang, Danggui Shaoyaosan, and Xianfang-Huoming Decoction, all of which exerted good anti-UC effects in clinical practice, with the efficacy consistent with or even better than the treatment with classic modern medicines of UC.17–19 Despite HHS’s long history of use and abundant experimental and clinical support, its active ingredients, putative target genes, and underlying mechanism have not been fully clarified.

Network pharmacology, as a brand new subject based on system biology, bioinformatics, and high throughput histology, is getting more and more motivated.20–22 In practice, the general routes of network pharmacology include research network construction based on databases, network analysis to search the key compounds and targets, and experimental verification to ensure the reliability of the predicted results.23 Therefore, by integrating TCM with network pharmacology analysis, a novel approach, TCM network pharmacology, was established, which can be applied to prioritize disease-associated genes, reveal drug-gene-disease associations, and illustrate the network regulation effects of TCM formulae.24,25 Additionally, molecular docking is a theoretical method to study the interaction and recognition between protein receptors and small molecule ligands owing to its ability to predict the binding mode and affinity strength.26–28 Collectively, network pharmacology and molecular docking can be complementarily integrated for studying TCM, which can provide novel insights in active compounds screening and mechanism exploration, and may even trigger a revolution in the process of TCM modernization and internationalization.

In the present study, a network pharmacology-based strategy, combined with molecular docking and in vitro validation, was performed to discover the active ingredients, potential targets, and molecular mechanism of HHS against UC. The workflow is shown in Figure 1

Figure 1 Schematic representation of the proposed mechanism in HHS against UC. Network pharmacology was used to analyze the crucial ingredients and key targets of HHS in the treatment of UC; molecular docking revealed that three candidate compounds could bind well with three candidate targets, respectively; cell experiments confirmed that candidate compound quercetin can alleviate inflammation in LPS-induced RAW264.7 cells by inhibiting inflammatory factors, phosphorylated c-Jun, as well as downregulating PI3K-Akt signaling pathway.

Materials and Methods

Data Preparation

Composition of HHS

The compounds of four herbs in HHS were obtained from four public databases including Traditional Chinese Medicine Systems Pharmacology Database and Analysis Platform (TCMSP, https://tcmspw.com/tcmsp.php ), A Bioinformation Analysis Tool for Molecular mechanism of Traditional Chinese Medicine (BATMAN-TCM, http://bionet.ncpsb.org.cn/batman-tcm/ ), The Encyclopedia of Traditional Chinese Medicine (ETCM, http://www.tcmip.cn/ETCM/index.php/Home/Index/index.html ), and Traditional Chinese Medicine [email protected] (TCM [email protected], http://tcm.cmu.edu.tw/zh-tw/review.php?menuid=3 ), all of which can provide information of ingredients in TCM herbs and have been widely reported to be available for compounds exploration in network pharmacology.29–32

Selection of Active Compounds by Pharmacokinetic ADME Prediction

The majority of compounds in TCM cannot reach the specific protein targets in cells owning to their unsuitable pharmacological properties. An appropriate oral bioavailability (OB) is one of the most significant pharmacokinetic parameters of the ADME (absorption, distribution, metabolism, and excretion) properties of drugs due to the primacy and convenience of oral administration, especially for TCM.33 Observation of drug-likeness (DL) is valuable to pre-evaluate plenty of compounds in a short time, and a widely used filter is Lipinski’s Rule-of-five. Compounds that do not violate any criteria as Lipinski’s Rule-of-five are more likely to become oral drugs.34,35

In this study, the specific OB and DL values of compounds in HHS were collected from the TCMSP database. Only those meeting the ADME criteria (ie, OB≥30% and DL≥0.18) were retained for further research.

Collection of Targets of Active Compounds in HHS and UC-Related Targets

Putative targets of active compounds in HHS were obtained from five online databases containing TCMSP, BATMAN-TCM (score cutoff was set to 20), ChemMapper ( http://lilab-ecust.cn/chemmapper/ , similarity threshold was set to 1.2 and DrugBank was chosen as the bioactivity database), PharmMapper Server ( http://www.lilab-ecust.cn/pharmmapper/index.html , normalized fit score ≥0.9), and TargetNet ( http://targetnet.scbdd.com/home/index/ , Prob value ≥ 0.5), all of which can provide information of multiple proven or predicted targets for the given molecules.29,30,36–38 The UniProt database ( https://www.uniprot.org/ ), which offers a comprehensive, high-quality, and freely accessible resource of protein sequence and functional information,39 was utilized to convert protein target names to their corresponding official gene symbols. Besides, UC-related targets were retrieved by searching the keyword “ulcerative colitis” from five public databases: GeneCards ( https://www.genecards.org/ , Relevance score ≥1), Online Mendelian Inheritance in Man (OMIM, https://omim.org/ ), PharmGKB ( https://www.pharmgkb.org/ ), Therapeutic Target Database (TTD, http://db.idrblab.net/ttd/ ), and DrugBank ( https://go.drugbank.com/ ), all of which can be applied to collect disease-related targets.40–44

Bioinformatics Analysis

Protein–Protein Interaction (PPI) Data

To further identify the core regulatory targets, PPI analysis was performed by submitting overlapping targets of active compounds in HHS and UC to the STRING database ( https://string-db.org/ ), which currently owns the largest number of organisms and proteins, as well as broad and diverse benchmarked data sources.45 The species was limited to Homo sapiens, the minimum required interaction score was set to 0.97, and the independent target protein nodes were hidden. Subsequently, the PPI results were exported from STRING and imported into Cytoscape 3.8.0, which is widely applied to construct and visualize the network, especially in the field of network pharmacology analysis.

The CytoNCA plugin in Cytoscape software was utilized to calculate six topological parameters of nodes: betweenness centrality (BC), closeness centrality (CC), degree centrality (DC), eigenvector centrality (EC), network centrality (NC), and local average connectivity (LAC), all of which can provide an in‑depth analysis of the attributes of nodes in the interactive network. Higher quantitative values of parameters stand for the greater significance of nodes in the network. Only target nodes with all six parameters higher than the corresponding median values in PPI network were retained to construct a new PPI network for further research. The NetworkAnalyzer plugin for Cytoscape software was used for node degree distribution diagrams, and the network was treated as non-directed graph. Likewise, in the new network, six parameters were calculated and nodes with all six parameters higher than the corresponding median values were retained to construct the core PPI network.

Enrichment Analysis

After transferring official gene symbols of identified HHS-UC target genes to associated Entrez IDs, Gene Ontology (GO) enrichment analysis and Kyoto Encyclopedia of Genes and Genomes (KEGG) pathway enrichment analysis were carried out to further study the functions of the identified potential anti-UC target genes of HHS based on R 4.0.2 and related R packages (colorspace, stringi, DOSE, clusterProfiler, ggplot2, enrichplot, pathview, BiocManager, and org.Hs.eg.db). Only functional terms and pathways with q values <0.05 were considered statistically significant and retained.

Network Construction

Data of HHS-UC targets, bioactive compounds, disease, herbs, or signaling pathways were imported into the Cytoscape 3.8.0 software. After being polished, three networks were obtained as follows: (1) Compounds-disease-targets (C-D-T) network of treatment with HHS for UC; (2) PPI network of treatment with HHS for UC; and (3) Compounds-pathways-targets (C-P-T) network of treatment with HHS for UC.

Validation

Molecular Docking

Molecular docking is a frequently used method in drug discovery for its capacity to accurately predict the conformation of small molecule ligands within the appropriate target binding site and to assess the binding affinity.46,47 In the present study, candidate target proteins were selected for molecular docking analysis based on being from the human species, owning higher degree values in the core PPI network (s 2D and 3), and associated with more significant bioactive compounds in C-D-T network (Figure 4); candidate compounds for docking were selected based on owning higher values of degree in C-D-T network (Figure 4) and associated with more key targets in the core PPI network (Figure 2D). The docking process combined AutoDock tools 1.5.6 with Vina (ie, AutoDock Vina), which is a new and widely used strategy for molecular docking and has been validated to improve the speed and accuracy of molecular docking with a new scoring function, efficient optimization and multithreading.48,49 Parameters of the mating box were obtained from AutoDock tools 1.5.6, and the docking was carried out by Vina. The specific process was as follows:

Figure 2 PPI network of HHS-UC. (A) The interactive PPI network obtained from STRING database with the minimum required interaction score set to 0.97. It comprises 268 nodes and 637 edges. Each node represents relevant targets, and edges stand for protein-protein associations, including known interactions (azure represents curated databases, purple indicates experimentally determined), predicted interactions (green represents gene neighborhood, red stands for gene fusions, and blue indicates gene co-occurrence), and others (light green represents text mining, black stands for co-expression, and light blue indicates protein homology). (B) PPI network imported from STRING database to Cytoscape 3.8.0. (C) PPI network of more significant proteins extracted from (B) by filtering 6 parameters: BC, CC, DC, EC, NC and LAC. This network is made up of 75 nodes and 307 edges. (D) Core PPI network of core proteins extracted from (C); this network contains 18 nodes and 57 edges. Higher degree values indicate larger node sizes. Red indicates a higher degree, and yellow represents a lower degree.

Figure 3 (A–C) The node degree distribution diagrams of Figure 2 B–D; (D) The degree of 18 core targets of the PPI network in Figure 2D. The y-axis displays the degree values of related targets, and the x-axis shows gene names.

Figure 4 C-D-T network of HHS against UC. It contains 454 nodes and 2569 edges. Blue ellipse nodes stand for the target genes; the purple, orange, green, and rose-red colors in ellipse nodes indicate bioactive compounds from Schizonepetae Spica, Sophorae Flos, Platycladi Cacumen, and Aurantii Fructus, respectively; and the red diamond nodes represent four herbs in HHS.

(1) The preparation of macromolecule receptor files: 3D structures of proteins were retrieved from the Protein Data Bank (PDB) ( http://www.rcsb.org/ ) and then inputted into software Pymol to be modified by removal of water molecules, co-crystallized ligand and ions. Subsequently, in AutoDock tools 1.5.6, missing hydrogens and Kollman partial charges were added, non-polar hydrogens were merged to their corresponding carbons. The structures were then saved as PDBQT protein receptor files.

(2) The preparation of small molecule ligand files: After downloaded from PubChem database ( https://pubchem.ncbi.nlm.nih.gov/ ), the 2D structures of compounds were then imported into Chem3D software to minimize energy (MM2 force field) and transferred to 3D structures. Subsequently, in AutoDock tools 1.5.6, the obtained 3D structures were modified by the addition of hydrogens and protonation. Non-polar hydrogens were merged to their corresponding carbons rotations, and torsions were set automatically in the software. Then structures were saved as PDBQT ligand files.

(3) The construction of mating pockets: The PDBQT structures of receptors and ligands were imported to AutoDock tools 1.5.6 to construct mating pockets of docking. When constructing a mating box, spacing (angstrom) was set to 1, center was set on the macromolecule, and numbers of points in x-, y-, and z-dimension were set to keep the protein completely covered by mating box. For each protein, these parameters of the mating box were defined by a configuration (config) file for further docking by Vina, which included the following: the center of the mating box (centre_x, centre_y, centre_z), the size of the mating box (size_x, size_y, size_z), the maximum number of binding modes to output (num modes) (set to 20), energy_range (set to 5) and exhaustiveness (set to 8).

(4) Docking and visualization: Vina software was utilized to conduct molecular docking and calculate docking affinity. During the process, PDBQT files of protein and ligand were also used in addition to the config file, as the PDBQT files determine the information of ligands and proteins for docking. After Vina finished running, the results were output as .pdbqt* and log*.txt files and scored according to docking binding free energy to establish the binding affinity score between the target protein receptors and small molecule ligands. Docking models with the lowest binding affinity were visualized and hydrogen bonds were displayed by Pymol (3D) and LigPlus (2D), both of which have been widely applied to visualize the docking results including docking site and hydrogen-bond interaction patterns between the ligand and the main-chain or side-chain elements of the protein.50,51

Cell Culture

Mouse mononuclear macrophage leukemia cells (RAW264.7), purchased from Beijing Beina Chuanglian Institute of Biotechnology (Beijing, China), were cultured in Dulbecco’s Minimum Essential Medium (DMEM) medium supplemented with 10% fetal bovine serum, 100μg/mL streptomycin, and 100U/mL penicillin, at 37°C with 5% CO 2 and 95% air.

Enzyme-Linked Immunosorbent Assay

The RAW264.7 macrophage cells were seeded in 6-well plates at 1.0–2.0×105 cells/well and incubated for 24 h. Subsequently, the experiment was divided into six groups, including control group, Que (H) group (quercetin: 20μM), LPS group (model group, LPS: 1μg/mL), LPS + Que (L) group (LPS: 1μg/mL, quercetin: 5μM), LPS + Que (M) group (LPS: 1μg/mL, quercetin: 10μM), LPS + Que (H) group (LPS: 1μg/mL, quercetin: 20μM). The culture supernatant was collected and then centrifuged at 3000 rpm for 20 minutes. Finally, the levels of TNF-α, IL-6, and IL-1β, and relative enzymatic activities of iNOS and COX2 were detected in the culture media through corresponding ELISA kits according to the manufacturer’s instructions.

Western Blot Analysis

Cell lysates were collected by using RIPA buffer with 0.1% PMSF (BOSTER Biological Technology; Wuhan, China). The protein samples were separated by SDS-PAGE using 8–10% gradient gel. The separated protein on the gel was transferred onto 0.45 μm PVDF membranes. The expression of target protein was normalized to GAPDH protein. Antibodies against iNOS (#13120), COX-2 (#12282), p-c-Jun (#9261), c-Jun (#9165), p-PI3K (#4228), PI3K (#4249), p-Akt (#2965), Akt (#4691), GAPDH (#2118), and horseradish peroxidase-linked anti-mouse IgG (#7076) or anti-rabbit IgG (#7074) were purchased from Cell Signaling Technology (Boston, USA).

Statistical Analysis

The results were presented as means ± S.E.M and data comparison of multiple groups was adopted by one-way ANOVA and Student-Newman-Keuls test. The results were considered statistically significant if the P value was less than 0.05.

Results

Data Statistics

The Acquisition of Active Compounds in HHS Using ADME Screening

HHS consists of Aurantii Fructus, Schizonepetae Spica, Sophorae Flos, and Platycladi Cacumen. After searching four databases and performing ADME screening (OB≥30 and DL≥0.18), a total of 28 bioactive compounds were recognized in HHS (Table 1). The 28 compounds included 10 species from Schizonepetae Spica, 10 species from Aurantii Fructus, 8 species from Sophorae Flos, and 7 species from Platycladi Cacumen. Among them, four compounds (hesperetin, kaempferol, quercetin, and β-sitosterol) were derived from more than one herb in HHS and may be the crucial compounds with the therapeutic potential in HHS for UC. The contents of some compounds in related herbs and HHS are shown in Supplementary Table 1 .

Table 1 28 Bioactive Compounds of HHS

Targets of Bioactive Compounds in HHS and UC-Related Targets

A total of 1052 reviewed or predicted target genes of the bioactives in HHS were retrieved from five databases after we removed duplication values and transferred protein names to gene symbols ( Supplementary Table 2 ). Besides, target genes related to UC were collected from GeneCards (Relevance score≥1, Supplementary Table 3 ), PharmGkb, Therapeutic Target Database (TTD), DrugBank, and Online Mendelian Inheritance in Man (OMIM) databases, which included 4100 genes in GeneCards, 15 in PharmGkb, 52 in TTD, 182 in DrugBank, and 1 in OMIM by using “ulcerative colitis” as the keyword. A total of 4153 related target genes for UC were collected after being taken for intersection (Figure 5A and Supplementary Table 4 ). Among 1052 HHS-related targets and 4153 UC-related targets, there were 421 overlapping identified targets, considered as the hub targets for subsequent study (Figure 5B and Supplementary Table 5 ).

Figure 5 Venn diagrams showing UC targets obtained from 5 databases (A) and the intersection of identified target genes of active compounds and UC (B), respectively.

The Construction of C-D-T Network and Topological Network Analysis

The association between 28 active compounds in HHS and 421 HHS-UC target genes was visualized by C-D-T network containing 454 nodes and 2569 edges (Figure 4). In C-D-T network, blue ellipse nodes stand for the target genes; the purple, orange, green, and rose-red colors in ellipse nodes indicate bioactive compounds from Schizonepetae Spica, Sophorae Flos, Platycladi Cacumen, and Aurantii Fructus, respectively; the red diamond nodes represent four herbs in HHS. Nodes with a greater number of edges have higher degree values and larger node sizes in the network, indicating greater significance and requiring more attention. The top 8 compound nodes with the largest size of degree were quercetin (MOL000098, n=180), isopimaric acid (MOL002039, n=114), kaempferol (MOL000422, n=104), DNOP (MOL002032, n=102), luteolin (MOL000006, n=102), naringenin (MOL004328, n=92), (6Z,10E,14E,18E)-2,6,10,15,19,23-hexamethyltetracosa-2,6,10,14,18,22-hexaene (MOL002372, n=91), and nobiletin (MOL005828, n=90). The top five gene nodes with the largest size of degree were CA2, RIPK2, TLR9, ALOX15, and PTGS1, with the degree values of 29, 27, 27, 26, and 25, respectively. These top compounds and genes may be the critical nodes in the network and possess an important anti-UC effect.

Construction and Analysis of HHS-UC-Related PPI Network

PPI network which contains 268 nodes and 637 edges was primitively constructed by STRING database, in which nodes represent proteins and edges stand for protein–protein interactions (Figure 2A). In order to further visualize and analyze the protein–protein interactions, the retrieved PPI data were subsequently imported into Cytoscape 3.8.0 to construct a new PPI network, which also includes 268 nodes and 637 edges (Figure 2B). Subsequently, the CytoNCA plugin in Cytoscape software was utilized for mining the core goals. The selection criteria based on corresponding median values were set as follows: BC >17.73, CC >0.01776, DC >3.00, EC >0.01394, NC >1.55, and LAC >1.00. Only gene targets that met the criteria were retained and colored yellow in Figure 2B, and a new PPI network made up of 75 nodes and 307 edges was extracted (Figure 2C). Likewise, in the network in Figure 2C, only targets that met the selection criteria (BC >36.71, CC >0.4111, DC >7.00, EC >0.08690, NC >3.80, and LAC >2.80) were retained and colored yellow in Figure 2C. Finally, a core PPI network comprising 18 nodes and 57 edges was screened out (Figure 2D). Node degree distribution diagrams of PPI networks were retrieved by a Cytoscape plug-in, Network analyzer (Figure 3A–C). In the core PPI network in Figure 2D, a node with larger size and redder color possesses a higher degree value, likewise, a node with smaller size and more yellow color has a smaller degree value. The target nodes with the highest degree values were JUN (n=12), MAPK1 (n=10), MYC (n=9), TP53 (n=8), MAPK3 (n=8), ESR1 (n=6), AKT1 (n=6), FOS (n=6), HSP90AA1 (n=6), IL6 (n=6), CDKN1A (n=6), and TNF (n=6) (Figure 3D), which may play a crucial role in the anti-UC effect of HHS.

Enrichment Analysis

In order to elucidate the functions and the enriched pathways of the potential anti-UC genes of HHS, GO enrichment analysis and KEGG pathway enrichment analysis were carried out.

The GO analysis consists of biological processes (BP), cellular component (CC), and molecular function (MF). In this study, a total of 3963 statistically significant GO terms, including 3528 of BP, 112 of CC, and 323 of MF, were obtained. The top 20 significant enrichment terms of BP, CC and MF with the highest gene counts were visualized in a bubble diagram in Figure 6. The redder color of a dot stands for the lower the q value and greater enrichment of the GO term. The results showed that the targets of HHS in the treatment of UC were mainly enriched in response to molecule of bacterial origin (GO: 0002237), response to lipopolysaccharide (GO: 0032496), response to nutrient levels (GO: 0031667), and other biological processes; in membrane raft (GO: 0045121), membrane microdomain (GO: 0098857), membrane region (GO: 0098589), and other cellular components; in protein serine/threonine kinase activity (GO: 0004674), DNA-binding transcription factor binding (GO: 0140297), cytokine receptor binding (GO: 0005126), and other molecular functions.

Figure 6 The bubble diagram of GO enrichment analysis of HHS-UC genes, including the top 20 significant enrichment terms of BP, CC, and MF. The abscissa represents the proportion of genes of interest in the entry, and the ordinate represents each entry. The larger size of a dot indicates the larger number of genes annotated in the entry, and the redder color of a dot stands for the lower the q value.

The KEGG pathways were applied to explore the functions and signaling pathways of the identified anti-UC targets of HHS. There were 190 statistically significant HHS-UC-related pathways, among them, the top 30 significant enrichment potential pathways with the highest gene counts were presented in a bar plot diagram (Figure 7), indicating that HHS plays an important role in the treatment of UC through multiple targets and multiple pathways. Furthermore, to elucidate the interrelationships of ingredients, targets and the top 30 pathways, C-P-T network containing 483 nodes and 3404 edges was constructed (Figure 8). The pathways with the top 5 highest gene counts were PI3K-Akt signaling pathway (n=68), Human cytomegalovirus infection (n=58), MAPK signaling pathway (n=57), Kaposi sarcoma-associated herpesvirus infection (n=56), and Hepatitis B (n=55), which could be the key pathways in the effect of HHS against UC. Among them, PI3K-Akt signaling pathway, associated with the highest number of genes, might be the most important HHS-UC pathway (Figure 9). Interestingly, we found that several target genes were involved in multiple pathways, for example, JUN, mentioned above as the most important target in HHS for UC, was involved in 54 HHS-UC-related KEGG pathways, including Inflammatory bowel disease, Kaposi sarcoma-associated herpesvirus infection, Hepatitis B, etc. Collectively, these results demonstrated that HHS acts on UC through multiple pathways, multiple targets, and overall cooperation.

Figure 7 Bar plot diagram of KEGG enrichment pathways (top 30). The x-axis represents the number of target genes in each pathway and the ordinate represents each entry. Redder means lower q value.

Figure 8 C-P-T network of top 30 pathways. Blue ellipse nodes stand for the target genes. The ellipse nodes in purple, orange, green and rose-red stand for compounds from Schizonepetae Spica, Sophorae Flos, Platycladi Cacumen and Aurantii Fructus. The representatives of red V nodes indicate four herbs in HHS. Each yellow diamond stands for each pathway. The size of the nodes represents the size of the degree.

Figure 9 PI3K/AKT signaling pathway map. Nodes in red represent HHS-UC-related genes.

Molecular Docking Analysis

Three candidate target proteins, including JUN (PDB ID: 1jun), TP53 (PDB ID: 1qkt), and ESR1 (PDB ID: 2vuk), were conducted molecular docking with three candidate bioactive compounds (quercetin, luteolin, and nobiletin; the corresponding 2D-chemical structures drawn using ChemDraw software are presented in Figure 10), whose results were visualized by Pymol (2D) and LigPlus (3D) as shown in Figure 11.

Figure 10 The molecular formulae and chemical structures of quercetin, luteolin, and nobiletin.

Figure 11 The docking model of quercetin, luteolin and nobiletin with JUN, TP53, and ESR1, respectively. The action model of JUN with quercetin, luteolin and nobiletin: (A) JUN with quercetin; (B) JUN with luteolin; (C) JUN with nobiletin. The action model of TP53 with quercetin, luteolin and nobiletin: (D) TP53 with quercetin; (E) TP53 with luteolin; (F) TP53 with nobiletin. The action model of ESR1 with quercetin, luteolin and nobiletin: (G) ESR1 with quercetin; (H) ESR1 with luteolin; (I) ESR1 with nobiletin. The hydrogen bonds were indicated by dashed lines and the length was added around the lines.

The results revealed that JUN interacted with quercetin, luteolin, and nobiletin, as shown in Figure 11A–C, respectively. As shown in Figure 11A, the structure of quercetin could interact with Gln290 and Asn299 through 2 hydrogen bonds, respectively, and Ser292 through one hydrogen bond in JUN. As shown in Figure 11B, the structure of luteolin could form one hydrogen bond, one hydrogen bond, and 2 hydrogen bonds with Arg302, Gln310 and Gln304, respectively, in JUN. As shown in Figure 11C, nobiletin could interact with Arg302 and Gln304 in JUN via one hydrogen bond and 2 hydrogen bonds, respectively.

The results indicated that TP53 interacted with quercetin, luteolin, and nobiletin, as shown in Figure 11D–F, respectively. As shown in Figure 11D, the structure of quercetin could form one hydrogen bond, one hydrogen bond and 2 hydrogen bonds with Ser166, Ala138 and Asn200 in TP53, respectively. As shown in Figure 11E, the structure of luteolin could interact with Ala138, Ser166, Arg196, Gln100, and Lys101 through one hydrogen bond, respectively, and Ser99 through 2 hydrogen bonds in TP53. As shown in Figure 11F, one hydrogen bond could combine nobiletin with Gly199 in TP53.

The results demonstrated that ESR1 interacted with quercetin, luteolin, and nobiletin, as shown in Figure 11G–I, respectively. As shown in Figure 11G, the structure of quercetin was linked to His524, Thr347, and Leu346 through one hydrogen bond, respectively. As shown in Figure 11H, the structure of luteolin could interact with His524, Thr347, Glu353, and Leu387 through one hydrogen bond, respectively, in ESR1. As shown in Figure 11I, nobiletin could form one hydrogen bond with His377 in ESR1. Therefore, there exists an interplay between these compounds and protein targets with hydrogen bonds.

The binding energy was frequently calculated to evaluate the affinity degree of ingredients with protein targets. It is generally accepted that binding energy which is less than −4.25 kcal/mol, −5.0 kcal/mol or −7.0 kcal/mol indicates a certain, good or strong binding activity between the ligand and the receptor, respectively. The binding energy reflects the possibility of binding between the receptor and the ligand. The lower the binding energy, the higher the affinity of the receptor and the ligand, the more stable the conformation.52 The results of docking binding energy in Table 2 revealed that these ingredients could bind well to the active sites of protein targets. Among them, the docking of ESR1 and luteolin had the lowest binding energy (−9.0 kcal/mol), the docking of JUN and nobiletin had the highest binding energy (−5.4 kcal/mol), and the average binding energy was −6.96 kcal/mol, mirroring a good or even strong binding activity in the molecular docking between all three candidate compounds and each of the candidate protein targets, respectively. Together, three representative compounds (quercetin, luteolin, and nobiletin) of HHS could bind well with three core targets of UC (JUN, TP53, and ESR1), all of which might play key roles in the treatment of UC.

Table 2 HHS Molecular Docking Binding Energy Results (Kcal/Mol)

Quercetin Suppressed Inflammation in LPS-Induced RAW264.7 Cells

To investigate the anti-inflammatory effects of quercetin against UC, lipopolysaccharide (LPS)-induced RAW264.7 cells were used as the inflammatory model and three concentrations (5μM, 10μM, 20μM) of quercetin were chosen for further cell experiments according to related references. As shown in Figure 12A–C, the levels of pro-inflammatory cytokines TNF-α, IL-6, and IL-1β increased in LPS-induced cells compared with unstimulated cells, while the levels of TNF-α, IL-6, and IL-1β decreased after quercetin treatment in a dose-dependent manner compared with LPS group. As shown in Figure 12D, the intracellular enzyme activities of iNOS and COX-2 increased significantly in LPS-induced RAW264.7 cells compared with control group. However, quercetin with different concentrations significantly reduced the intracellular enzyme activities of iNOS and COX-2 in LPS-induced RAW264.7 cells compared with LPS group, among which the treatment of 20μM quercetin showed the best effect. As shown in Figure 12E, the expression levels of inflammation proteins (iNOS and COX-2) in LPS-induced RAW264.7 cells were significantly higher than those in the control group, whereas the protein expression levels of iNOS and COX-2 in LPS-induced RAW264.7 cells treated with quercetin at different concentrations were significantly inhibited in a dose-dependent manner, of which the treatment effect of 20μM quercetin group was the best. Taken together, quercetin showed anti-UC effects by inhibiting inflammation, which further validated the prediction of network pharmacology that quercetin is the most important component in HHS against UC.

Figure 12 The effect of quercetin on the secretory levels of TNF-α (A), IL-6 (B) and IL-1β (C), the enzyme activity of iNOS and COX-2 (D), protein expression of iNOS and COX-2 (E) in RAW264.7 cells. Date are mean±S.E.M. n=3. **P < 0.01 vs Control; #P < 0.05, ##P < 0.01 vs LPS.

Quercetin Inhibited the Protein Expression of c-Jun and PI3K/AKT Pathway in LPS-Induced RAW264.7 Cells

Bioinformatics analysis has indicated that c-Jun is the most important target and PI3K/Akt signaling pathway is the most important pathway in the treatment of HHS against UC. Thus, to further investigate the underlying mechanism of how quercetin exhibits its anti-UC activities, the protein levels of p-c-Jun, c-Jun, p-PI3K, PI3K, p-Akt, and Akt in RAW264.7 were examined. As shown in Figure 13, the phosphorylation expression of c-Jun, PI3K, and Akt elevated markedly in RAW 264.7 induced by LPS compared with unstimulated cells, whereas the treatment with different concentrations of quercetin significantly inhibited the high expression of phosphorylation levels of c-Jun, PI3K, and Akt compared with LPS group, among which RAW264.7 cells treated with 20μM quercetin had the best inhibitory effect. In view of the crucial roles of c-Jun and PI3K/Akt signaling pathway in inflammatory responses,53–57 it could be concluded that quercetin exerts anti-inflammatory action through the suppression of the phosphorylated expression of c-Jun and PI3K/Akt signaling pathway in the treatment of UC, which further verified the network pharmacology results of the important functions of c-Jun and PI3K/Akt signaling pathway in HHS for UC.

Figure 13 The effect of quercetin on the protein secretion of c-Jun and PI3K/AKT pathway in LPS-induced RAW264.7. (A) Representative immunoblotting images of p-c-Jun, c-Jun, p-PI3K, PI3K, p-Akt, Akt, and GAPDH; (B–D) Gray value statistics of corresponding proteins. Date are mean±S.E.M. n=3. **P < 0.01 vs Control; #P < 0.05, ##P < 0.01 vs LPS.

Discussion

HHS has been reported to possess a good pharmacological role and therapeutic effect in the modern clinical treatment of UC. HHS could reduce the levels of tumor necrosis factor (TNF-α) and medullary peroxidase (MPO) inflammatory factors in serum, relieve inflammatory cell infiltration, improve experimental colitis, and reduce the local and systemic inflammatory responses in UC rats.15,58 The therapeutic effect of HHS involved the regulation of levels of inflammatory factors and expression of related proteins through signal transduction pathways.59

UC is a serious medical issue endangering the health of people worldwide, whose optimal disease control is warranted to be achieved.4,60 However, the more detailed mechanism of HHS against UC has not been fully elucidated. Network pharmacology is a promising approach frequently applied to reveal related mechanism and discover new important bioactive compounds from TCM formulae.61 Therefore, we performed network pharmacology and data analysis to explore bioactives, core therapeutic target genes, and potential mechanism of HHS in UC. Moreover, molecular docking analysis and in vitro experiments were conducted to further explore potential mechanism of HHS against UC.

In the present study, a total of 28 bioactive compounds in HHS and 421 HHS-UC target genes were obtained after collecting and screening from multiple databases. Nowadays, a substantial of natural compounds have attracted considerable attention due to their high therapeutic value, low systemic toxicity, and a wide range of pharmacological activities.62–66 Emerging evidence has demonstrated that rutin appears to be the major bioactive compound in HHS with pharmacological effects against UC, whose potential mechanism contains antioxidant effects, suppression of pro-inflammatory mediators’ release and expression of inflammatory proteins.67–69 However, in this study, we found that quercetin, associated with the highest number of genes in C-D-T network, is the most important compound in HHS for UC. Quercetin is a polyhydroxyflavonoid with a variety of biological functions such as antioxidant, anti-inflammatory, anti-viral, and so on.70 Quercetin could offer dose-dependent protection for IBD rats through antioxidant-like effect.71 Moreover, quercetin could exert anti-inflammatory effects in the treatment of UC, which is congruent with the fact that inflammatory responses are important pathological mechanism of UC.1 Both antioxidant and anti-inflammatory effects of quercetin appeared to be mediated via interference in signal transduction pathways including the AP-1 and NF-κB, as well as kinase systems.1,69 Besides, quercetin could enhance epithelial barrier in Caco-2 cells via inducing a strong increase of tight junctions protein claudin-4.72 Interestingly, rutin, mentioned earlier as the major bioactive compound of HHS, exerted a therapeutic potential for UC by liberating its bioactive aglycone quercetin in vivo, which indicates the role of rutin as a quercetin deliverer to the large intestine and further emphasizes the extremely pivotal functions of quercetin against UC.69,73 Taken together, all these studies and our findings highlight the great significance of quercetin in the function of HHS against UC.

In addition to quercetin, other bioactive ingredients screened from HHS were also revealed to possess anti-inflammatory properties and show pharmacological activities for UC. Luteolin (3,4,5,7-tetrahydroxy flavone) with a higher degree value in C-T-D network is a flavonoid with anti-inflammatory effects and has potential clinical use for patients with inflammatory bowel conditions by upregulating upstream proteins (eg, SOCS3 in JAK-STAT signaling), inhibiting ATP binding into the Syk/Src binding pocket as an upstream regulator of NF-κB and AP-1 signaling, and altering transcriptional activation of the STAT3/IRF-1, NF-κB, and AP-1 pathways.74,75 Additionally, luteolin played a good therapeutic role in acute colitis in mice, whose potential mechanism was to activate the Nrf2 signaling pathway, promote Nrf2 to enter the nucleus, up-regulate the levels of mRNA levels of downstream target genes HO-1 and NQ01, inhibit the expression of pro-inflammatory factors TNF-α and IL-6 mRNA, enhance the antioxidant activity of the colon, and regulate oxidation/anti-oxidation balance.76 Likewise, nobiletin with a higher degree value in C-T-D network exerted anti-inflammatory effects via the downregulation of inducible expression of nitric oxide synthase and cyclooxygenase 2 in colitic rats and could restore barrier function through the inhibition of the Akt-NF-κB-MLCK pathway.77 Besides, nobiletin could decrease inflammatory symptoms and markers as well as fibrotic collagen deposition and expression in colitis mice.78 What’s more, the related anti-UC target genes or pathways of quercetin, luteolin, and nobiletin mentioned in these studies are partially consistent with the identified anti-UC target genes and pathways in the present research, indicating the interaction between multi-components and multi-targets of HHS in treating UC. All of these reports provide evidence for the therapeutic potential of luteolin and nobiletin in HHS against UC.

To explore core targets in HHS for UC, the PPI network, which indicates protein–protein interaction, was constructed, revealing that JUN, MAPK1, MYC, TP53, MAPK3 and ESR1, especially JUN, TP53, and ESR1, might be the core targets in the anti-UC process of HHS. Among them, JUN, associated with the largest number of target nodes in the core PPI network, could be the most important target in HHS against UC. Proto-oncogene JUN (c-Jun) is an immediate-early gene and plays an important role in inflammatory responses, in other words, when faced with external stimuli, the expression of c-Jun increases rapidly in cells, enabling cells to adapt to environmental changes.53–56 Given that the inflammatory responses are important pathogenesis of UC,1 it is of great significance to strictly control the expression of c-Jun. Together, these studies elucidated the crucial effect of c-Jun in inflammatory responses. Moreover, the expression of c-Jun proteins increased in UC model groups compared to control groups and decreased in treatment groups compared to UC groups.79–81 These findings are congruent with our results that JUN is extremely important and may participate in the process of HHS against UC.

In addition to JUN, we found that TP53 and ESR1, which showed a higher degree value in the core PPI network and associated with more core ingredients in C-T-D network, might also play a certain anti-UC role in the function of HHS for UC. Several studies have supported our view. TP53 codon 72 Arg/Arg polymorphism was associated with a higher risk for IBD development with the potential roles as biomarkers for cancer and dysplasia screening among patients with IBD, which might provide targeted therapy in patients with IBD-associated colorectal cancer.82,83 Moreover, TP53 mutations represented an initial step in the progression from inflamed colonic epithelium to colorectal cancer, demonstrating the connection between TP53 and the prognosis of UC.84 Besides, the methylation of ESR1 was related to dysplasia/cancer and inflammatory status in UC patients, suggesting the involvement of the methylation of ESR1 in UC carcinogenesis due to chronic active inflammation.85,86 These data further support our findings on the great significance of TP53 and ESR1 in HHS for UC.

To annotate the functions of 421 protein targets and related pathways, the GO enrichment analysis and KEGG pathway enrichment analysis were further conducted. GO results suggested that the target genes were mainly enriched in sites of membrane raft, membrane microdomain, and membrane region, as well as in the biological functions of protein tyrosine kinase activity, heme binding, and monooxygenase activity. KEGG data suggested that 213 of the 421 target proteins significantly enriched in 190 signal pathways, highlighting a therapeutic effect of HHS on UC through multiple pathways. Among them, PI3K-AKT signaling pathway, exhibiting the highest gene count enrichment among the UC-related signal pathways, appeared to be the most critical pathway involved in the treatment of UC. AKT1, as a critical node in PI3K/Akt-mTOR signaling pathway, is involved in the progress and development of UC.87 Besides, PI3K/Akt-mTOR signaling pathway is an important cell signal transduction pathway with a vital role in mediating numerous processes, including cell proliferation, apoptosis, necrosis, inflammation, and so forth. The abnormality of PI3K/Akt-mTOR cell signaling pathway is considered to be involved in the onset of UC with great impacts on UC-induced cell apoptosis and inflammation, as well as colon cancer induced by long-term UC.88–92 Additionally, by up-regulating the PI3K/Akt-mTOR signaling pathway cell apoptosis and inflammation in UC rats could be triggered.57 These findings are congruent with our view that PI3K-AKT signaling pathway is the most important HHS-UC pathway and may be involved in the anti-UC mechanism of HHS.

Based on the findings of network pharmacology, we acquired three crucial bioactive ingredients and three representative targets. Thus, molecular docking was carried out to further validate the prediction by network pharmacology analysis. The results of docking showed that quercetin, luteolin and nobiletin could combine well with JUN, TP53, and ESR1, respectively, and the docking of luteolin and ESR1 showed the lowest binding energy, suggesting that the combination was the most stable. Based on our previous findings that in HHS against UC, quercetin and JUN might be the most important compound and the most important target, respectively, in vitro experiments were performed to further study the action of quercetin on JUN in the treatment of UC. As several reports found that the expression of c-Jun proteins decreased in treatment groups compared to UC groups,79,80 our cell experiments also proved that quercetin inhibited the expression of phosphorylated c-Jun and had an anti-inflammatory effect in LPS-induced RAW264.7 cells. PI3K-AKT signaling pathway was also found to be involved in the anti-UC effects of quercetin, further validating the KEGG results. These findings confirmed the prediction by the network pharmacology approach.

However, the present study has several limitations according to the corresponding guidance.93 Firstly, the information from online databases was based on the reviewed and predicted data; thus, those unproven and undocumented compounds or targets may not be included in our analysis. Secondly, studies on the quantitative determination of the content of 28 compounds are currently incomplete; therefore, future research on content determination should be carried out. Thirdly, absorption pathways, effective parts, markedly effective components, metabolic forms of bioactives in HHS should be studied. Moreover, quercetin, though determined as the most important bioactive ingredient of HHS against UC, could not completely stand for HHS. Thus, additional research is required to further explore the potential molecular mechanism of HHS in the treatment of UC in vitro and in vivo. Lastly, the anti-UC effect of quercetin needs to be further verified in animal models and clinical trials.

In conclusion, we firstly performed network pharmacology to elucidate that in the anti-UC effects of HHS, the most important bioactive compound was quercetin, JUN was the most important target, and PI3K-AKT signaling pathway was the most critical pathway. Additionally, molecular docking analysis validated the prediction by the network pharmacology-based method. Besides, in vitro experiments further demonstrated the molecular mechanism of quercetin against UC. Based on a multidisciplinary strategy, the present study provides evidence for the therapeutic role of HHS in UC, as well as a comprehensive and innovative approach to search for active compounds, core target genes and potential mechanisms in TCM.","{'neg': 0.013, 'neu': 0.909, 'pos': 0.078, 'compound': 0.9999}"
21,Differences and similarities of high-resolution computed tomography ...,10 months ago,A total of 112 AIDS patients (78 with pneumocystis pneumonia and 34 ... caused by cytomegalovirus in a 38-year-old male patient with AIDS.,https://idpjournal.biomedcentral.com/articles/10.1186/s40249-020-00768-2,"PJP and CMV-P are two of the most common infectious pathogens in AIDS patients leading to life-threatening pneumonia. In terms of baseline characteristics of enrolled patients, this study shows that CD4 T lymphocyte counts of PJP group and CMV-P group were both lower than 50 cells/mm3, highlighting the importance of cell-mediated immunodeficiency for the development of PJP and CMV-P. Here neutrophil percentage in PJP was higher than CMV-P. These may be correlated with an increase of inflammatory cytokines and use of corticosteroid in patients with PJP, that might promote neutrophils recruitment and granulopoiesis [18]. Additionally, lymphocyte percentage in CMV-P patients was higher than that of PJP, which may result from higher HIV viral loads in CMV-P group than that in PJP group.

Here we observed several similarities in radiological presentations between two types of pneumonia. The frequency of GGO were highly common, while the occurrence of cavity was relatively rare in both cohorts. Furthermore, both PJP and CMV-P patients showed similar frequency of reticulation, bronchial wall thickening, mosaic perfusion, cyst, crazy-paving pattern, TIB, and LN enlargement. Diffuse alveolar damage might be the main reason for these similarities [19, 20].

In contrast, the occurrence of consolidation, nodules, and the halo sign was more common in CMV-P than in PJP patients. In addition, large nodules with perilymphatic distribution were not found in any of CMV-P patients. The nodules’ occurrence were positively correlated with CD4+T cell count, CD8+T cell count and CD4/CD8 ratio in CMV-P patient, while no significant correlations were found in PJP patients. These differences in radiological presentations might result from intrinsic virulence factors and immune responses to these pathogens. Human cytomegalovirus belongs to the herpesvirus subfamily, with seroprevalence of 40–100% in the world’s population [5, 21]. Cytomegalovirus can establish life-long latent infection and reactivate during episodes of immunosuppression [22]. Despite eliciting strong and long-lasting immune responses, these antiviral immune responses cannot clear the virus entirely, nor can they effectively prevent superinfection with additional cytomegalovirus strains or reactivation of the persisting viruses. Hence, alterations in host immunity, such as HIV co-infection, tend to allow for increased virus replication and disease progression [5]. P. jirovecii is an extracellular fungus that almost exclusively inhabits alveolar spaces [23], causing pulmonary infection through adhesion to the surface of alveolar epithelium cells (type I pneumocytes) [24]. A normal immune response is sufficient to clear P. jirovecii infection in most people without any evidence of latent infection [23]. Moreover, P. jirovecii has a unique tropism for the lung, where it exists primarily as an alveolar pathogen without systemic dissemination. Therefore P. jirovecii adherence to alveolar epithelium cannot justify such diffuse alveolar damage observed during severe pneumonia. Rather, the patient’s inflammatory response is the primary driver of such extensive alveolar-capillary surface damage [25]. Granulomas are rare in patients with P. jirovecii infection, but have been described before [26]. Taken together, these mechanisms induce alterations in host histopathology, which in turn allow for radiological differences between these two diseases.

There are several limitations in present study. The single-centre design may hamper the generalization of our conclusions. Patients included were in different stages of diseases, since BAL results was used as diagnostic criteria, which might influence the frequency of CT features, such as halo signs and cavities; and the lack of histological specimens limited the analysis of correlation with pathologic radiology. In addition, sensitivity and specificity of these patterns in AIDS patients requires further validation in a blinded retrospective or future prospective study.","{'neg': 0.042, 'neu': 0.921, 'pos': 0.037, 'compound': -0.6529}"
22,Former Channel 8 host Lucy Chow's daughter has signed with ...,27 months ago,The 23-year-old is currently a fourth-year philosophy student at the ... She had asked home-grown songwriter Paul Lee to introduce a music...,https://www.straitstimes.com/lifestyle/entertainment/former-tv-compere-lucy-chows-daughter-enters-show-business,"SINGAPORE - Another progeny with show business ties has joined the industry.

Ms Neo Jia Jing, daughter of former Channel 8 compere Lucy Chow, signed with Mediacorp in January and will be an artist officially when she graduates from university later this year.

The 23-year-old is currently a fourth-year philosophy student at the National University of Singapore.

She took part in the Huayi Brothers Fashion Group Icon Search last year (2018) and was one of the Singapore representatives who made it to the grand final in Shenzhen, China.

""She has liked listening to songs since she was a child and would ask me to buy S.H.E's albums for her. She would sing along with the songs quite well and that was how I discovered her potential in singing,"" Chow, 61, told Lianhe Wanbao.

Chow and her family moved to Taipei after her daughter completed her Primary School Leaving Examination due to her husband Derek Neo's work.

Chow, also known as Zhou Ruzhu, and Mr Neo, who is not from the entertainment industry, made headlines when they registered their marriage in 1990 as she is nine years older than him. The couple have two daughters.

She had asked home-grown songwriter Paul Lee to introduce a music teacher in Taipei for her daughter. But she did not want her daughter to enter show business then as she was still in school.

The family returned to Singapore after living in Taiwan for five years.

Chow encouraged her daughter to take part in Icon last year. Although Ms Neo did not sign with Huayi, she found her interest in acting during the competition.

Chow and her daughter were invited on local TV show Taste Of Love after the event, and Ms Neo's performance caught the attention of Mediacorp, which signed her later.

Ms Neo told Wanbao that she felt some pressure at being a second-generation artist, but she told herself that she would just be herself.

""As a newcomer, I have lots to learn, regardless of whether you are a second-generation artist or not,"" she said.

Will she become a television host like her mother as she can speak Mandarin fluently too?

Ms Neo said she would give it a try if there is an opportunity, though she hoped to dabble in other areas too.

Chow said that besides having a strong command of the language, a good compere must also have other attributes, like adaptability and depth of knowledge.

Meanwhile, Ms Neo could be joined by the daughter of former Mediacorp actor Chunyu Shanshan, who stays in Melbourne with his family. He and his daughter Yidi flew to Singapore on Saturday (May 11) to take part in the audition for Star Search 2019 on Sunday.","{'neg': 0.012, 'neu': 0.901, 'pos': 0.086, 'compound': 0.9889}"
23,Nucleolin-targeting AS1411 aptamer-modified micelle | IJN,5 months ago,"The HepG2 cells were seeded in a 24-well ultra-low adsorption plate at a density of 3×104 cells/well and incubated at 37 °C for 4 days,...",https://www.dovepress.com/nucleolin-targeting-as1411-aptamer-modified-micelle-for-the-co-deliver-peer-reviewed-fulltext-article-IJN,"Introduction

Chemotherapy has been widely accepted to be the primary strategy in the treatment of hepatocellular carcinoma (HCC), exhibiting significant therapeutic efficacy in the clinic.1,2 However, it still suffers from undesirable side effects, such as systemic toxicity, short half-life and lack of precise targets.3–5 Especially, the occurrence of multidrug resistance (MDR) of cancer cells can reduce the efficacy of chemotherapeutic drugs,6,7 which has become the most crucial reason for the failure of HCC treatment. The phenomenon was mainly attributed to the over-expression of ATP-binding cassette (ABC) transporter family in cancer cells, including ABCG1, ABCC1 and ABCG2.8–10 Among them, ABCG2, one of the initially discovered transporters, plays an important role in the ABC-dependent drug efflux, and is capable of transporting a broad range of chemotherapeutic agents such as paclitaxel and doxorubicin (DOX), thus conferring the drug resistance and further leading to high recurrence and poor survival of patients bearing HCC.11–13 Therefore, to block ABCG2-mediated drug efflux by inhibiting the ABCG2 expression could efficiently reverse MDR in the carcinogenesis and enhance the sensitivity of cancer cells to chemotherapeutics.14 Non-coding microRNAs (miRNAs) can post-transcriptionally regulate the mRNA expression by targeting the 3ʹ-UTR region, and thus play a significant role in various cellular functions such as differentiation, proliferation and apoptosis.15,16 Differential expression of miRNAs has emerged to be vital regulators of MDR acquisition in HCC progression,17,18 where miR-519c has been demonstrated to be highly associated with the reversion of MDR by targeting the ABCG2 mRNA.19–21 Owing to its down-regulated expression in cancer cells, the combination of chemotherapy and miR-519c delivery exhibited great potential in the synergistic HCC therapy by overcoming the MDR and further enhancing the cells’ sensitivity to chemotherapeutic drugs.22

To achieve the maximal efficiency of combinational therapy, the development of efficient and safe nanocarriers is highly required.23–26 Up to now, a variety of carriers have been investigated for the co-delivery of drugs and genes/photosensitizers in anti-cancer trails, including cationic polymers, liposomes, human serum albumin, hydrogels and inorganic nanoparticles.27–33 Among them, polymeric micelles formed by amphiphilic block copolymers have gained more attention due to their unique properties such as the core/shell structure, excellent stability, and ideal encapsulation and delivery efficiency of hydrophobic drugs.34–37 Polyethylene glycol-polylactic acid (PEG-PLA), one of the most prominent amphiphilic block copolymers, can self-assemble into micelles with core/shell structure in aqueous phase.38 Also, the hydrophilic shell on the surface of PEG-PLA micelles is capable of hindering the adsorption of plasma proteins and avoiding the elimination by reticuloendothelial system, resulting in prolonged residence time in circulation system.39 The nanosized structure of micelles contributes to the diffusion of micelles through the leaky blood vessels to accumulate drugs in the tumor tissues, also known as enhanced permeability and retention (EPR) effect.40,41 Besides, the characteristics of excellent biodegradability and low toxicity will facilitate their wide applications in drug or gene delivery.42

Nevertheless, the micelles are still unsatisfactory to fulfill the requirements in clinical applications due to their limited cellular uptake efficiency and lack of tumor-targeting ability. Thus, the modification of micelles has been widely explored using tumor-targeting ligands including peptides and antibodies.43,44 Aptamers, also called “chemical antibodies”, are short DNA/RNA oligonucleotides and selected by SELEX technology based on nucleic acid libraries, which can specifically recognize various targets.45,46 Owing to the unique characteristics such as precise selectivity and high binding affinity, aptamers have been used to enhance the targeting ability of nanoparticles in drug/gene delivery.46 AS1411, a 26-mer DNA oligonucleotide, has been systemically evaluated in Phase II clinical trial for leukemia treatment.47 Recently, AS1411 was reported to possess a specific interaction with nucleolin, an important biomarker in various cancer cells to promote the tumor growth and metastasis.48,49 Thus, the modification of micelles with AS1411 will dramatically facilitate the drug delivery by recognizing the tumor cells via active targeting.

Herein, AS1411 aptamer-functionalized PEG-PLA micelles were constructed through an emulsion/solvent evaporation strategy for the co-delivery of DOX and miR-519c, namely MDPAS (Scheme 1). The therapeutic efficacy and related mechanism of micelles in the cancer treatment were explored based on the active targeting ability and the suppression of MDR, using hepatocellular carcinoma cell line HepG2 as a model.

Scheme 1 The illustration of micelle preparation.

Materials and Methods

Materials

AS1411 aptamer (5ʹ-GGTGGTGGTGGTTGTGGTGGTGGTGG-3ʹ) was ordered from Sangon Biotech. (Shanghai, China). The miR-519c expression plasmid was synthesized by GenePharma (Soochow, China). DC-cholesterol (DC-Chol), maleimide (Mal)-PEG 5K -PLA 21K and mPEG 5K -PLA 10K were purchased from Daigang Biomaterials Co. (Shandong, China). Doxorubicin hydrochloride (>99% purity) was provided by Huafeng Biotech. Co. (Beijing, China). Polyvinyl alcohol (PVA), 3-(4,5-dimethylthiazol-2-yl)-2,5-diphenyltetrazolium bromide (MTT) and tris(2-carboxyethyl)phosphine (TCEP) were purchased from Aladdin (Shanghai, China). 4,6-Diamidino-2-phenylindile (DAPI) and triethylamine were provided by Amresco (Solon, OH). Dulbecco’s modified Eagle’s medium (DMEM), fetal bovine serum (FBS) and PBS buffer were purchased from Gibco (Grand Island, NY). LysoTrackerTM Green dye and LIVE/DEAD® Viability/Cytotoxicity kit were purchased from ThermoFisher (Carlsbad, CA). Quant-iTTM Pico Green dsDNA assay kit was obtained from Invitrogen (Auckland, NZ). Cell cycle and apoptosis detection kits were provided by BestBio (Shanghai, China). The corresponding caspase activity assay kits and in situ TUNEL detection kit were ordered from Promega (Madison, WA). The primary antibodies against nucleolin, procaspase-3, procaspase-8, procaspase-9, ABCG2, Ki67 and β-actin, and the horseradish peroxidase (HRP)-conjugated secondary antibody were purchased from Abcam (Shanghai, China). TRAzol Universal reagent for RNA isolation was purchased from TIANGEN (Beijing, China). PrimeScriptTM RT-PCR kit and SYBR® Premix Ex TaqTM PCR kit were purchased from TaKaRa (Dalian, China). Other reagents were purchased with the highest grade and used without further purification.

Preparation of MDPAS Micelles

Micelles were prepared by an emulsion/solvent evaporation method, as shown in Scheme 1. Briefly, DC-Chol (1.0 mg), Mal-PEG 5K -PLA 21K (2.5 mg) and mPEG 5K -PLA 10K (22.5 mg) were dissolved in 0.5 mL chloroform. Doxorubicin hydrochloride (2.5 mg) and triethylamine (3.0 μL) were then added into the solution, and the sample was stirred at 4 °C overnight in the dark to achieve the dehydrochlorination and the encapsulation of DOX. The miR-519c plasmid diluted by ultrapure water (1500 ng/μL, 25 μL) was gently mixed with the solution, followed by the sonication at 80 W for 2 min. The mixture was added into 5.0 mL of PVA solution (0.1%, w/v) and allowed to sonicate at 80 W for 4 min in an ice bath. Afterward, the products were transferred into 25 mL of PVA solution (0.3%, w/v) and shaken for 3 h to remove chloroform. Finally, the sample was subjected to the centrifugation at 30,000 g for 1 h (4 °C) to obtain the MDP micelles, which were washed with distilled water twice. For the preparation of MDPAS micelles, AS1411 aptamer (OD 260 of 2.0) was dissolved in 10 mL of TCEP solution (10 mM) and stirred at 4 °C for 2 h. The prepared MDP micelles were re-suspended in the aptamer solution, and the reaction was carried out by the incubation at 4 °C overnight in the dark. The MDPAS micelles were collected through the centrifugation (30,000 g, 1 h, 4 °C) and washed with distilled water twice. Alternatively, M (blank micelles), MAS (blank micelles with the modification of AS1411 aptamer), MD (micelles harboring only DOX) and MDAS (micelles harboring DOX with the modification of AS1411 aptamer) were formulated in an identical procedure with the addition of corresponding components.

Characterization of MDPAS Micelles

Transmission electron microscopy (TEM) images of different micelle formulations were captured on a HITACHI-H800 microscope at an accelerating voltage of 200 kV. Hydrodynamic diameter and zeta potential of micelles were measured by Malvern Nano ZS90 Zetasizer (Malvern, UK). Agarose gel electrophoresis (1.0%) was carried out to detect the conjugation of AS1411 on the surface of MDPAS micelles (120 V, 20 min).

Loading and Release Analysis of DOX and miR-519c Plasmid

The DOX loading was measured by detecting the absorbance at 492 nm through GF-M3000 microplate reader (Shandong, China), and the loading of miR-519c plasmid was detected using Quant-iTTM Pico Green dsDNA assay kit. The encapsulation efficiency (EE) and drug loading efficiency (DL) were determined by the following two formulas:

The DOX release from micelles was evaluated by the incubation of micelles in 1 mL of PBS buffer at 37 °C for 7 days. At predetermined time points, the accumulative release of DOX in the supernatant was calculated through the absorbance at 492 nm following the collection of micelles by the centrifugation at 30,000 g for 1 h (4 °C).

Cellular Uptake and Distribution of MDPAS Micelles

The DOX fluorescence was utilized to assess the cellular uptake efficiency of MDPAS micelles in HepG2 and human hepatocyte L02 cells, which were obtained from the Shanghai Institute of Cell Bank (Shanghai, China). The cells were inoculated in 6-well plates at a density of 2.5×105 cells/well and cultured overnight, and then incubated with 1 mL of FBS-free medium containing free DOX, MDP and MDPAS micelles for 6 h, followed by the analysis on a flow cytometry (FACS) Caliber (BD Bioscience, Mountain View, CA). Meanwhile, the treated cells were rinsed with PBS twice and fixed in 4% paraformaldehyde for 30 min. Then the fixed cells were stained with DAPI solution for 20 min and observed using LSM 710 confocal laser scanning microscope (CLSM, Carl Zeiss Microscopy LLC, Germany). In addition, to investigate the tumor-targeting ability of MDPAS micelles, the cells were incubated with AS1411 aptamer at a final concentration of 1 mM in advance and then treated with MDP and MDPAS micelles for 6 h. Afterwards, FACS analysis and CLSM observation were conducted to evaluate the cellular uptake efficiency of micelles.

To further study the intracellular distribution of MDPAS micelles, HepG2 cells were incubated with MDPAS micelles for 12 h. After the removal of medium, the cells were fixed in 4% paraformaldehyde for 30 min and subsequently stained with LysoTrackerTM Green and DAPI for 30 min to label lysosome and nucleus, respectively. Finally, the cells were rinsed with PBS twice and observed through CLSM.

Determination of ABCG2 mRNA Expression

The expression of ABCG2 mRNA after the micelles’ treatment was evaluated using qPCR. In brief, HepG2 cells were inoculated in 6-well plates at a density of 2.5×105 cells/well and cultured overnight. Then the cells were incubated with different micelles containing 0.6 μM DOX for 48 h and lysed by TRAzol Universal reagent to extract total RNA. cDNA was prepared through the reverse transcription from 1 μg of total RNA using PrimeScriptTM RT-PCR kit, and further employed as a template for PCR amplification by SYBR® Premix Ex TaqTM kit. The qPCR reaction was conducted on an ABI 7500 Fast Real-Time PCR System (Life Science, Foster, CA) and analyzed through 2−ΔΔC T method. The primers of reference gene β-actin and ABCG2 were listed as follows:

β-Actin: forward: 5ʹ-GGATCAGCAAGCAGGAGTATG-3ʹ;

reverse: 5ʹ-CACCTTCACCGTTCCAGTTT-3ʹ.

ABCG2: forward: 5ʹ-GGGTTCTCTTCTTCCTGACGACC-3ʹ;

reverse: 5ʹ-CACCTTCACCGTTCCAGTTT-3ʹ.

Anti-Proliferative Effect of MDPAS Micelles

The anti-proliferative effect of MDPAS micelles was evaluated using the MTT assay in HepG2 cells. Briefly, the cells were seeded in 96-well plates at a density of 1.0×104 cells/well and incubated at 37 °C for 12 h, which were then incubated with different micelles harboring 0.6 μM DOX. After the exposure for 48 h, 20 μL of MTT solution (5 mg/mL) in PBS was mixed with the cells in each well, and the incubation was performed for another 4 h. After removing the medium, the formed formazan crystals in the wells were thoroughly dissolved using 200 μL DMSO, and the absorbance at 492 nm was monitored using a GF-M3000 microplate reader (Shandong, China). The cell viability (%) was calculated as follows:

Cell Apoptosis and Cell Cycle Arrest Analysis

The cell apoptosis and cell cycle arrest were carried out to investigate the mechanism of anti-proliferative effect induced by MDPAS micelles. First, HepG2 cells were seeded into 6-well plates at a density of 2.5×105 cells/well, and further cultured at 37 °C overnight. Different micelles containing 1.0 μM DOX were then added into each well, and the cells were harvested and rinsed with PBS three times after the treatment for 48 h. The Annexin V-FITC/PI staining procedure was conducted in the dark for 30 min based on the apoptosis detection kit’s instructions, whereas the cells were treated with PI staining solution according to the cell cycle detection kit’s protocol. Finally, the apoptosis and cell cycle arrest induced by MDPAS micelles were analyzed through 30,000 gated cells by FACS.

Western Blotting Analysis

The cells were seeded into 6-well plates and incubated overnight, and then treated with different micelles as described in the section “Cell apoptosis and cell cycle arrest analysis”. After the treatment for 48 h, the cells were harvested and lysed using RIPA buffer containing 1 mM phenylmethanesulfonyl fluoride. The protein concentration was quantified using the bicinchoninic acid detection kit. An equal amount of proteins was subjected to the 12% SDS-PAGE analysis, and the gel was transferred to polyvinylidene fluoride membrane through the electroblotting strategy (200 mA, 1.5 h). The membrane was subsequently incubated with the primary antibodies at 4 °C overnight and further treated with the HRP-conjugated secondary antibody at 25 °C for 1 h. Finally, the membrane was rinsed with PBST solution twice and visualized by ECL luminescence reagent, and the expression level of proteins was captured by Tanon 1600 gel imaging system (Shanghai, China).

Anti-Proliferative Effect of MDPAS Micelles in 3D Tumor Spheroids

The HepG2 cells were seeded in a 24-well ultra-low adsorption plate at a density of 3×104 cells/well and incubated at 37 °C for 4 days, achieving the construction of 3D tumor spheroids. The intact spheroids were selected and treated with different micelles containing 0.8 μM DOX for 24 h. Afterwards, the spheroids were observed through CLSM along the Z-axis. The tumor spheroids after the treatment were then digested with 1 mL of trypsin solution (0.25%, w/v) to obtain cell suspension, which was incubated with Annexin V-FITC/PI staining solution in the apoptosis detection kit at 37 °C for 30 min and analyzed through FACS to detect the apoptotic effect.

In vivo Anti-Cancer Efficacy of MDPAS Micelles

All the animal studies were conducted according to the “Guide for the Care and Use of Laboratory Animals” (eighth edition, International Publication No: 978-0-309-15400-0) and approved by the Institutional Animal Ethics Committee of Jilin University (license No. SCXK-(JI) 2014–0012). Female BALB/c-nude mice (6–7 weeks) were purchased from Vital River Laboratory Animal Technology Co. Ltd. (Beijing, China). The HepG2 cells were digested and re-suspended in PBS at a final amount of 1.0×107 cells and subcutaneously injected into the right flank of an individual mouse to establish the xenografted tumor model. Once the tumor tissue was developed with an average volume of 100 mm3, the HepG2 tumor-bearing mice were randomly separated into different groups (n=6 in each group) and intravenously injected with free DOX, MDP micelles and MPDAS micelles once a week for 4 times, with an equal DOX dose of 3.0 mg/kg per mouse. The daily change of body weight and tumor size of mice was monitored at the same time each day. The tumor volume (V) was measured by an electronic caliper and calculated using the formula V=(a×b2)×0.5, in which a and b represent the length of long axis and short axis of the tumor, respectively.

Histological Analysis

At 28 days post-administration, the HepG2-xenografted mice were sacrificed and dissected. Tumor tissues as well as major organs (heart, lung, liver, spleen and kidney) were harvested and fixed in 4% paraformaldehyde at 4 °C for 2 days. Then, the paraffin-embedded tissues were sectioned into slices of 20-μm thickness, stained with hematoxylin and eosin (H&E), and observed on an Olympus IX71 fluorescence microscopy (Tokyo, Japan). The apoptotic cells in tumor tissues were determined by in situ TUNEL detection kit according to the manufacturer’s protocol. To determine the Ki67 and ABCG2 expression in tumor tissues, the slices were treated with 0.2% Triton X-100 in PBS for 5 min and blocked with 5% goat serum for 2 h. Subsequently, the samples were incubated with primary antibodies at 4 °C overnight, and the HRP-conjugated secondary antibody was added into the samples. After the incubation at 25 °C for 1 h, the samples were observed through fluorescence microscopy. In addition, the expression of ABCG2 was analyzed at the mRNA level using qPCR as described in the section “Determination of ABCG2 mRNA expression”, in which 1 g of tumor tissues were homogenized in TRAzol Universal reagent at 4 °C (1000 rpm, 5 min) and then centrifuged at 120,000 rpm for 10 min (4 °C).

In vivo Biodistribution of MDPAS Micelles

To detect the in vivo biodistribution of MDPAS micelles, the tumor-bearing mice were randomly divided into three groups (n=3 in each group) when tumor tissues reached an average size of 500 mm3, including free DOX, MDP and MDPAS micelles. Different micelles were injected into mice via the tail vein at a DOX dose of 8.0 mg/kg per mouse. The mice were sacrificed and observed at 1 h, 4 h and 24 h post-injection, followed by the collection of heart, liver, spleen, lung, kidney and tumor tissues. The fluorescence of mice and harvested tissues were analyzed through a Kodak In-Vivo FX PRO Imaging System (New Haven, CT).

Statistical Analysis

Experiments were conducted for three times, and the data were presented as mean ± standard deviation (SD). The statistical analysis was performed by Student’s t-test and one-way analysis of variance (ANOVA), where p value <0.05 (*) and p value <0.01 (**) were considered to be the statistical significance.

Results and Discussion

Preparation and Characterization of MDPAS Micelles

In the past two decades, nanoparticles have gained great interest owing to their favorable properties including high capacity for drug loading, low systematic toxicity, ideal physical and chemical stability, and pharmaceutical improvement of drug properties, and thus they have been widely studied in a series of diseases such as tumors, neurodegenerative diseases and inflammatory bowel diseases.50–53 In the present study, polymeric micelles including M, MDP and MDPAS were prepared according to the procedure in Scheme 1. Briefly, MDP micelles were constructed using DC-Chol, Mal-PEG 5K -PLA 21K and mPEG 5K -PLA 10K as carriers in an emulsion/solvent evaporation strategy, where DOX was physically incorporated into the hydrophobic layer and miR-519c plasmid was encapsulated into the hydrophilic core. The AS1411 aptamer was then conjugated on the surface of micelles through Michael addition reaction, obtaining the tumor-targeted micelles MDPAS. The conjugation of AS1411 aptamer was determined using agarose gel electrophoresis ( Figure S1 ). Obviously, a clear band could be observed in the free aptamer group, and no bands could be detected for MDPAS micelles, indicating that AS1411 aptamer has been successfully conjugated on the surface of micelles.

The morphology of polymeric micelles was visualized by TEM, as shown in Figure 1A and S2 . Three micelles exhibited a uniform and spherical nanostructure with hydrodynamic diameter ranging from 240 to 300 nm. Meanwhile, a visible corona observed in micelles suggested that the micelles have been successfully formed with core/shell structure. Thus, the loading of hydrophobic DOX and hydrophilic miR-519c plasmid could be simultaneously achieved in MDPAS micelles. During the preparation of micelles, the first sonication was completed to form the W/O primary emulsion, and the second sonication aimed to the construction of W/O/W double emulsion, and thus the core/shell structure was formed after the solvent evaporation and centrifugation. Similar phenomenon has also been obtained in the previous reports which achieved the delivery of siRNA (mPEG-PLA and BHEM-Chol as carriers),54 and Cas9 mRNA and guide RNA (PLGA, PEG-PLA and BHEM-Chol as carriers).55 The EE and DL values of DOX and miR-519c plasmid in MDPAS micelles were listed in Table S1 . Particularly, a high EE value of miR-519c plasmid could be realized (86.53%), which was attributed to the presence of hydrophilic core and the positively charged density of DC-Chol confining the diffusion of nucleic acids within MDPAS micelles. We also evaluated the storage stability of MDPAS micelles for 7 days by particle size and zeta potential measurements (Figure 1B and C). The hydrodynamic diameter values of M, MDP and MDPAS micelles were determined to be 240 ± 4.99, 280 ± 2.01 and 315 ± 2.15 nm, respectively. Notably, the particle size of three micelles remained unchanged in 7 days, indicating that the micelles possessed good stability without the formation of large aggregates. In addition, all these micelles exhibited negatively charged state, and no substantial change of zeta potential was detected. Moreover, the Tyndall effect could be observed for the micelles after the storage for 60 days using a visible optical path, suggesting the presence of stable micelles in the sample ( Figure S3 ). Hence, MDPAS micelles was identified to possess favorable stability, which was beneficial to achieve the long-term storage and in vivo therapeutic applications.

Figure 1 Characterization and DOX release profile of MDPAS micelles. (A) The TEM images of M (a), MDP (b) and MDPAS micelles (c). The hydrodynamic size (B) and zeta potential (C) change of micelles stored at 4 °C for 7 days. (D) The cumulative release of DOX from MDPAS micelles under different pH conditions. Data were presented as mean ± SD of triplicate experiments.

Further, the DOX release profile from MDPAS micelles was examined in the simulated physiological environment of pH 7.4, tumor microenvironment of pH 6.5, and endosomal environment of pH 5.0 (Figure 1D). A sustained drug release in MDPAS micelles was achieved at pH of 7.4, with a cumulative drug release of 49.98% after 7 days. In contrast, the DOX release from micelles showed a faster release pattern at pH of 5.0 (DOX release of 88.71% after 7 days). As ester bonds in the carriers Mal-PEG 5K -PLA 21K and mPEG 5K -PLA 10K were pH-sensitive, faster drug release could be achieved in MDPAS micelles at pH of 5.0. These results indicated that MDPAS micelles exhibited a controlled release of drugs in a pH-dependent manner, which was potential to obtain the rapid drug release and accumulation in the tumor tissue.

Intracellular Uptake and Distribution of MDPAS Micelles

To confirm the AS1411-targeting ability of MDPAS micelles, we first compared the expression of nucleolin on the membrane of different cells using immunofluorescence analysis. As shown in Figure S4 , nucleolin was barely expressed in normal cells such as L02 and NIH3T3. In contrast, obvious over-expression of nucleolin was achieved in cancer cells, implying that the abnormal expression of nucleolin was a potential biomarker for the cancer diagnosis. As the highest expression of nucleolin was detected in HepG2 cells, the cellular uptake studies of MDPAS micelles were conducted using HepG2 and L02 cells through FACS and CLSM. In comparison to free DOX and MDP micelles, MDPAS micelles exhibited higher cellular uptake in HepG2 cells by FACS analysis (Figure 2A), indicating that AS1411 aptamer could enhance the cellular uptake efficiency of micelles by the favorable recognition ability towards nucleolin. However, the cellular uptake efficiency of MDPAS micelles decreased significantly when the cells were treated with AS1411 aptamer in advance. This phenomenon suggested that the pretreatment with aptamer could inhibit the endocytosis of MDPAS micelles by blocking the nucleolin expressed on the surface of HepG2 cells, therefore revealing that the internalization of MDPAS micelles in HepG2 cells was performed in an AS1411 aptamer-mediated endocytic pathway. Conversely, the pre-treatment with AS1411 aptamer had almost no influence on the endocytosis of MDPAS micelles in L02 cells, owing to the lower expression of nucleolin on L02 cells (Figure 2B). The internalization of micelles was further investigated in HepG2 and L02 cells through CLSM ( Figures S5 and S6 ). There was no significant change of cellular uptake in HepG2 cells for the treatment with MDP micelles regardless of the pre-treatment with AS1411 aptamer. In contrast, the red fluorescence intensity could be dramatically reduced when the cells were pre-treated with AS1411 aptamer prior to the transfection with MDPAS micelles, indicating that the aptamer pre-treatment inhibited the intracellular delivery of MDPAS micelles. In L02 cells, similar red fluorescence intensity could be achieved in MDP and MDPAS groups, and the pre-treatment of AS1411 aptamer did not influence the DOX fluorescence in cytosol. These results revealed that the conjugation of AS1411 aptamer on the micelles could improve the intracellular delivery efficiency of nanoparticles in cancer cells in an AS1411 aptamer-dependent internalization pathway.

Figure 2 Cellular uptake and intracellular distribution of MDPAS micelles. The cellular uptake efficiency of different formulations in HepG2 (A) and L02 cells (B) through FACS analysis (**p < 0.01). (C) The CLSM images for the intracellular distribution of MDPAS micelles in HepG2 cells after the incubation for 2, 6 and 12 h, respectively. Blue (DAPI, nucleus), green (LysoTracker Green, lysosome) and red (DOX). Scale bar: 50 μm. Abbreviation: N.S., no significance.

Subsequently, the lysosomal escape ability of MDPAS micelles was evaluated by CLSM (Figure 2C). Obviously, red fluorescence could be detected during the first 2 h, indicating that MDPAS micelles could be successfully uptake by HepG2 cells. After the incubation for 6 h, red and green fluorescence was obviously overlapped and a large area of yellow fluorescence could be observed, suggesting that MDPAS micelles were mainly entrapped in the lysosomes. Clearly, stronger red fluorescence could be obtained after 12 h which did not overlap with green fluorescence, demonstrating that MDPAS micelles could successfully realize the endosomal escape. Besides, MDPAS micelles exhibited a high accumulation in the nucleus, which was caused by the targeting ability of AS1411 aptamer to the nucleolin expressed on the nucleus. In conclusion, these results revealed that MDPAS micelles possessed favorable cellular internalization and lysosomal escape ability, further enhancing the co-delivery efficiency of DOX and miR-519c plasmid.

Reversing MDR Through the Inhibition of ABCG2

To verify whether MDR could be reversed by the inhibition of ABCG2, the intracellular DOX concentration and the ABCG2 expression level were detected by LC-MS/MS, qPCR and Western blotting, respectively. As shown in Figure 3A, blank micelle M and free DOX could not inhibit the expression of ABCG2 by qPCR analysis, whereas the micelles harboring miR-519c plasmid (MDP and MDPAS) dramatically decreased the expression of ABCG2 at the mRNA level. Notably, compared with MDP, MDPAS micelles achieved a higher inhibition of ABCG2 expression, which was mainly caused by the enhanced delivery efficiency from AS1411 aptamer-targeting ability. Consistently, Western blotting analysis showed that MDP and MDPAS micelles significantly decreased the ABCG2 expression at the protein level, and higher inhibition ability was obtained in the cells after the treatment with MDPAS micelles (Figure 3B and C). All these results elucidated that the delivery of miR-519c plasmid could efficiently achieve the knockdown of ABCG2. Further, the intracellular DOX concentration after the micelles’ treatment was explored by LC-MS/MS (Figure 3D). In comparison to the micelles without miR-519c plasmid, MDP and MDPAS micelles could greatly improve the intracellular DOX concentration after the treatment for 48 h, which was relied on the blockade of ABCG2-dependent drug efflux by miR-519c. These results demonstrated that MDPAS micelles containing miR-519c plasmid could reverse MDR by inhibiting the ABCG2 expression and decrease the resistance of cancer cells to chemotherapeutics. Thus, the co-delivery of DOX and miR-519c plasmid could facilitate the intracellular accumulation of DOX and potentially achieve a synergistic anti-cancer effect.

Figure 3 Expression level of ABCG2 and apoptosis-related proteins. (A) The ABCG2 expression level in HepG2 cells after the treatment with different formulations through qPCR analysis (**p < 0.01, vs control group). (B) Western blotting analysis and the quantitative results (C) of procaspase-3, −8 and −9 and ABCG2 expression in HepG2 cells after the treatment with different formulations. (D) The intracellular DOX concentration in HepG2 cells after the treatment with micelles for different time by LC-MS/MS analysis.

In vitro Anti-Proliferative Effect of MDPAS Micelles

To evaluate the anti-proliferative effect of MDPAS micelles, the cell viability after the micelles’ treatment was evaluated by MTT assay. As illustrated in Figure 4A, blank micelle M exhibited limited cytotoxicity in HepG2 cells, owing to the favorable biocompatibility of PEG-PLA and DC-Chol. Compared with free DOX, MDP and MDPAS micelles exhibited evident inhibition of cell proliferation, with cell viability of 47.80% and 36.30%, respectively. This phenomenon was mainly caused by the improved DOX accumulation in tumor cells due to the inhibition of ABCG2 drug efflux transporter by miR-519c. Notably, stronger anti-proliferative effect could be achieved in MDPAS micelles than MDP group, attributing to their efficient cellular uptake mediated by the targeting ability of AS1411 aptamer. Further, the proliferative inhibition of MDPAS micelles was measured by Live/Dead cell staining assay, in which live and dead cells generated green and red fluorescence, respectively. As shown in Figure 4B, more cells with red fluorescence were visualized in MDPAS group than those treated with free DOX and MDP micelles, indicating that MDPAS micelles could induce higher anti-proliferative effect in HepG2 cells. These data were consistent with the MTT assay, revealing that MDPAS micelles could achieve an improved inhibition ability of cell proliferation due to the high intracellular DOX concentration from efficient endocytosis of nanoparticles and suppression of MDR.

Figure 4 Anti-proliferative effect of MDPAS micelles. (A) The cell viability of HepG2 cells after the treatment with different micelles by MTT assay (**p < 0.01, vs control group). (B) Live/Dead cell staining assay of HepG2 cells treated with control (a), free DOX (b), MDP (c) and MDPAS micelles (d), respectively. Scale bar: 200 μm. (C and D) FACS analysis of the cell apoptosis and cell cycle arrest of HepG2 cells treated with control (a), M (b), free DOX (c), MDP (d) and MDPAS micelles (e).

To assay the anti-proliferative mechanism of MDPAS micelle, we conducted the cell apoptosis and cell cycle distribution after the micelles’ treatment by FACS analysis. As shown in Figure 4C, no apparent apoptosis was obtained in HepG2 cells after the treatment with blank micelle M, while free DOX induced obvious cell apoptosis with apoptotic ratio of 19.78%. In contrast, MDPAS micelles could improve the apoptotic ratio to 23.99% which was relied on the enhanced intracellular DOX concentration through the suppression of MDR effect by miR-519c. To analyze the apoptotic mechanism triggered by MDPAS micelles, the expression of apoptosis-related caspases was determined by Western blotting analysis (Figure 3B). Compared with blank micelle, the procaspase-3 expression decreased significantly in the case of MDP and MDPAS micelles, with the lowest expression in the MDPAS treatment group. These results showed that MDPAS micelles could initiate the apoptosis by the activation of caspase-3. Meanwhile, compared with free DOX, the micelles MDP and MDPAS could efficiently suppress the expression of both procaspase-8 and procaspase-9, implying the activation of caspase-8 and caspase-9 by these two micelles. Consistently, the relative activity analysis of caspase-3, -8 and -9 also demonstrated the activation of these apoptosis-related proteins after the treatment with MDPAS micelles ( Figure S7 ). In the apoptotic pathways, caspase-8 has been identified to execute the cell death receptor-mediated apoptosis, whereas the activation of caspase-9 has been considered as the initiator of mitochondria-dependent apoptosis signaling pathway.56 The data implied that both apoptotic routes could be activated by MDPAS micelles, thereby leading to the anti-proliferative effect in cancer cells.

Next, the effect of MDPAS micelles on the cell cycle distribution was conducted by PI staining, followed by FACS analysis (Figure 4D and S8 ). Compared with the untreated cells, free DOX could induce the cell cycle arrest at G2 phase with a ratio of 30.93%, owing to the inhibition of topoisomerase by DOX in the DNA synthesis process. In contrast, the cells treated with MDP and MDPAS micelles exhibited larger proportion of cells at G2 phase (65.45% and 78.35%), indicating that the co-delivery of DOX and miR-519c could induce the cell cycle arrest at G2 phase leading to the inhibition of cell proliferation in a synergistic mode. Taken together, our results suggested that MDPAS micelles harboring DOX and miR-519c could be successfully uptake by HepG2 cells through the AS1411 aptamer-dependent manner and induce the apoptosis and cell cycle arrest to achieve the anti-proliferative effect, indicating that the combinational therapy could facilitate the anti-cancer response in a synergistic pattern of two components.

Anti-Cancer Effect of MDPAS Micelles in 3D Tumor Spheroids

In contrast to 2D cell culture, the employment of 3D tumor spheroids could mimic the solid tumors more closely by sharing similar features such as the spatial distribution of cells, extracellular matrix, cell adhesion, hypoxia and acidic microenvironment, which has been widely used in the evaluation of anti-tumor drug delivery systems.57 Here, the internalization of MDPAS micelles was tested in 3D tumor spheroids derived from HepG2 cells (Figure 5A and B ). The 3D reconstruction and serial Z-stacks demonstrated that free DOX were distributed on the surface of tumor spheroids. In contrast, more red fluorescence of MDP and MDPAS micelles was observed in the inner portion of spheroids, indicating that the micelles could facilitate the penetration by overcoming the inner pressure of spheroids. Particularly, MDPAS micelles were capable of diffusing and penetrating across multilayer cells due to the targeting ability, which was critical for achieving excellent anti-cancer efficacy. Subsequently, the treated tumor spheroids were digested into single-cell suspension which was directly employed to determine the ratio of apoptotic cells through FACS analysis. As shown in Figure 5C, compared with untreated cells (5.54%), higher apoptotic ratios were obtained in the treatment groups with free DOX and MDP micelles (9.66% and 10.64%). Moreover, the treatment with MDPAS micelles could increase the proportion of apoptotic cells to 18.22% in 3D tumor spheroids, suggesting that the co-delivery of DOX and miR-519c by MDPAS micelles could achieve better therapeutic efficacy through the enhanced cellular uptake and deep penetration in tumor tissues.

Figure 5 Distribution and cell apoptosis in 3D tumor spheroids. (A) The CLSM images of 3D tumor spheroids treated with different micelles by scanning along the Z-axis. Scale bar: 50 μm. (B) The 3D reconstruction of spheroids treated with free DOX (a), MDP (b) and MDPAS micelles (c), respectively. (C) FACS analysis for the cell apoptosis in 3D spheroids after the treatment with different formulations: control (a), M (b), free DOX (c), MDP (d) and MDPAS micelles (e).

In vivo Biodistribution of MDPAS Micelles

Encouraged by the apparent anti-cancer effect of MDPAS micelles achieved in in vitro study, we established a tumor-xenografted mice model via the subcutaneous injection of HepG2 cells and then tracked the in vivo biodistribution of MDPAS micelles after 24 h post-intravenous injection. As shown in Figure 6 and S9 , free DOX was accumulated in tumor tissues during the first 1 h and rapidly eliminated by the bloodstream. In contrast, stronger red fluorescence could be obtained in tumor tissues for the MDPAS micelles, implying that they possessed an excellent tumor-targeting ability and facilitated the tissue penetration of DOX and miR-519c in tumor sites. In addition, red fluorescence of MDPAS micelles still remained in the tumor after 24 h post-injection, while no visible fluorescence was shown in free DOX, indicating that MDPAS micelles could extend the retention time of DOX in tumors owing to the inhibition of MDR effect by miR-519c. Interestingly, except for the accumulation in liver, MDP and MDPAS micelles displayed the accumulation in lung following 4 h post-administration, which was probably caused by the non-specific phagocytosis of lung tissue. Thus, these results demonstrated that MDPAS micelles maintained the stability to prevent the quick elimination in the blood and also possessed an excellent tumor-targeting capacity, providing an efficient strategy for the co-delivery of DOX and miR-519c in the cancer treatment.

Figure 6 Biodistribution analysis of MDPAS micelles. (A) In vivo biodistribution of micelles in different organs and tumor tissues (n=3 per group). (B–D) The mean fluorescence intensity of different organs and tumor tissues at 1, 4 and 12 h post-injection, respectively.

In vivo Anti-Cancer Efficacy of MDPAS Micelles

To investigate the in vivo therapeutic efficacy of MDPAS micelles in cancer treatment, different formulations were injected to the HepG2-bearing mice via intravenous administration. The tumor growth profile was recorded for 28 days after the first intravenous injection of different formulations (Figure 7A). Rapid tumor growth was obtained in the control group, and blank micelle M showed no inhibitory effects on the tumor growth. Though free DOX and MDP micelles could reduce the tumor volume, MDPAS micelles exhibited more potent inhibition of tumor growth, indicating that the co-delivery of DOX and miR-519c could realize a synergistic anti-cancer response. The increased therapeutic efficacy mediated by MDPAS micelles was mainly caused by the high delivery efficiency as well as the efficient suppression of MDR effect by miR-519c. Moreover, the tumor size after the MDPAS micelles’ treatment was smaller than that of MDP group at the end of therapy (Figure 7B). These results suggested that the combinational therapy mediated by MDPAS micelles could efficiently inhibit the tumor growth, achieving an enhanced treatment efficacy through the synergistic effect of therapeutic drug and gene.

Figure 7 In vivo anti-cancer efficacy and biocompatibility of MDPAS micelles. (A) The tumor volume profile of HepG2-xenografted nude mice after the treatment with different formulations (n=6 per group, *p < 0.05 and **p < 0.01, vs control group). (B) Representative images of excised tumor tissues from tumor-bearing mice received different treatments. Scale bar: 1 cm. (C) Representative images of H&E and immunohistochemical staining of tumor tissues. Scale bar: 100 nm. (D) Representative images of H&E staining of heart, liver, spleen, lung and kidney at 28 days post-administration. Scale bar: 100 nm.

To further explore the anti-cancer effect of micelles, the paraffin-embedded tumor tissues of different treatment groups were sectioned into slices and analyzed by H&E and immunohistochemical staining (Figure 7C). As shown in H&E staining images, an intact cellular structure could be observed in the control group, whereas the tumor tissues of mice treated with free DOX, MDP and MDPAS micelles exhibited obvious cell apoptosis evidenced by the pyknotic nuclei and incompact cytoplasm in the cells. Meanwhile, the apoptosis of tumor tissues was evaluated by TUNEL staining. The results demonstrated that the apoptosis of tumor cells could be triggered by the treatment with free DOX, MDP and MDPAS micelles, while the micelles containing DOX and miR-519c could induce more apoptotic cells than other two groups. Consistently, the Ki67 staining assay confirmed that merely few apoptotic cells were detected in tumor tissues obtained from control and blank micelle groups, and a reduced density of Ki67-staining cells could be clearly observed in tumor tissues after the treatment with DOX. Notably, lower Ki67 expression could be detected in tumor tissues treated with MDP and MDPAS micelles, suggesting that the micelles could significantly inhibit the cell proliferation and further lead to the tumor growth inhibition. The expression level of ABCG2 in tumor tissues was evaluated by immunohistochemical staining and qPCR (Figure 7C and S10 ). Compared with control and blank micelle M groups, the ABCG2 expression was dramatically improved after the treatment with free DOX. This phenomenon was probably caused by the fact that the sustained administration of DOX could induce the MDR effect to resist the therapeutic efficacy via the induction of ABCG2 over-expression. Nevertheless, the micelles could decrease the expression level of ABCG2 owing to the controlled release of DOX in the cytosol. Meanwhile, MDPAS micelles could down-regulate the ABCG2 expression more significantly, which would be beneficial to enhance the sensitivity of cancer cells to DOX and improve the anti-cancer response of nanomedicine. Our findings confirmed that the micelles-mediated co-delivery of DOX and miR-519c could improve the therapeutic efficacy by the reversion of MDR effect.

Biocompatibility Analysis of MDPAS Micelles

The biocompatibility of MDPAS micelles was analyzed by monitoring the body weight and the morphology of histological sections obtained from major organs. As shown in Figure S11 , no significant change of body weight was achieved in the period of micelles’ treatment in comparison to the control group, indicating that MDPAS micelles did not induce obvious systemic toxicity. Previous studies have confirmed that DOX is a cytotoxic drug which suffered from severe side effects such as cardiotoxicity.58–60 Thus, the H&E staining analysis was performed for the major organs to evaluate whether the micelles containing DOX could cause the pathological changes of these organs (Figure 7D). Due to the favorable biocompatibility and biodegradability of PEG-PLA and DC-Chol, blank micelle exhibited good biocompatibility in mice with no toxicity to the organs. Moreover, there were no obvious pathological lesions of major organs observed in MDP and MDPAS groups, suggesting that the encapsulation of DOX by micelles could reduce its systemic toxicity especially the cardiotoxicity. Overall, the MDPAS micelles provided a favorably biocompatible delivery system for chemotherapeutics and oligonucleotides, and thus exhibited great potential in the future biomedical applications.

Conclusion

In summary, an AS1411 aptamer-modified micelle system was successfully developed based on PEG-PLA to realize the tumor-targeting co-delivery of DOX and miR-519c and the anti-cancer treatment in a synergistic pattern of two components. The MDPAS micelle has been demonstrated to possess prominent tumor-targeting ability via the specific recognition of nucleolin over-expressed on cancer cells and the efficient internalization in an AS1411 aptamer-dependent pathway. Meanwhile, the co-delivery of DOX and miR-519c by MDPAS micelle could reverse the MDR effect by inhibiting the ABCG2-dependent drug efflux and increasing the intracellular DOX concentration, which could facilitate the suppression of tumor growth and obtain a desirable therapeutic efficacy in cancer treatment. Thus, the MDPAS micelle held a promise for the combination of chemotherapy and gene therapy, and provided a potential approach in cancer treatment especially for the tumors with strong drug resistance.","{'neg': 0.054, 'neu': 0.872, 'pos': 0.074, 'compound': 0.9991}"
24,Central nervous system manifestations in COVID‐19 patients: A ...,7 months ago,"... in COVID-19 patients: A systematic review and meta-analysis ... first author, year and month of publication, type of study, country,...",https://onlinelibrary.wiley.com/doi/full/10.1002/brb3.2025,"The growing number of studies has reported COVID-19, CNS presentations as remarkable manifestations that happen. Hence, understanding the CNS characteristics of COVID-19 can help us for better diagnosis and ultimately prevention of worse outcomes.

Of 2,353 retrieved studies, we selected 64 studies with 11,687 patients after screening. Most of the studies were conducted in China (58 studies). The most common CNS symptom of COVID-19 was headache (8.69%, 95%CI: 6.76%–10.82%), dizziness (5.94%, 95%CI: 3.66%–8.22%), and impaired consciousness (1.90%, 95%CI: 1.0%–2.79%).

In this systematic review and meta-analysis, we searched PubMed, Web of Science, Ovid, EMBASE, Scopus, and Google Scholar. Included studies were publications that reported the CNS features between 1 January 2020 and 20 April 2020. The data of selected studies were screened and extracted independently by four reviewers. Extracted data analyzed by using STATA statistical software. The study protocol registered with PROSPERO (CRD42020184456).

At the end of December 2019, a novel respiratory infection, initially reported in China, known as COVID-19 initially reported in China, and later known as COVID-19, led to a global pandemic. Despite many studies reporting respiratory infections as the primary manifestations of this illness, an increasing number of investigations have focused on the central nervous system (CNS) manifestations in COVID-19. In this study, we aimed to evaluate the CNS presentations in COVID-19 patients in an attempt to identify the common CNS features and provide a better overview to tackle this new pandemic.

1 INTRODUCTION At the end of December 2019, a novel respiratory syndrome, known as COVID-19, was reported in Wuhan city, Hubei province, China. The first sign of this infection (2019-nCoV, COVID-19) was pneumonia (Adhikari et al., 2020; WHO, 2020; Shi, Qin, et al., 2020; Velavan & Meyer, 2020; Wang, Hu, et al., 2020; Wang, Wang, et al., 2020; Wu, Chen, et al., 2020). This new pandemic rapidly spread worldwide, and an increasing number of infected cases and deaths have been reported globally (Jiang et al., 2020; Sohrabi et al., 2020). Hence, the COVID-19 outbreak was officially considered as a Public Health Emergency of International Concern (PHEIC) by the World Health Organization (WHO) Emergency Committee (Mackenzie & Smith, 2020; WHO, 2020). Severe acute respiratory syndrome coronavirus 2 (SARS-CoV-2) is a zoonotic pathogen and can transmit from infected animals (such as bats and snakes) to humans eventually leading to epidemics and pandemics through human-to-human transmission (Hassan et al., 2020; Mackenzie & Smith, 2020). Most cases of COVID-19 have shown respiratory symptoms ranging from cough to dyspnea and respiratory failure as well as the typical signs and symptoms of infection such as fever and fatigue (Cascella et al., 2020; Chen, Zhou, et al., 2020; Wang, Hu, et al., 2020; Young et al., 2020). However, a growing number of COVID-19 patients are presenting with different combinations of the central nervous system (CNS) manifestations (Asadi-Pooya & Simani, 2020; Mao et al., 2020; Montalvan et al., 2020). Several case reports have indicated the presence of various CNS complications, including encephalitis, stroke, meningitis, and encephalopathy in COVID-19 patients (Co et al., 2020; Filatov et al., 2020; Moriguchi et al., 2020; Zhou, Zhang, et al., 2020). Furthermore, a large observational study carried out by Mao et al. shows the prevalence of the CNS presentations such as dizziness, headache, impaired consciousness, acute cerebrovascular disease, ataxia, and seizure (Mao et al., 2020). Therefore, awareness of the different aspects of the short- and long-term effects of this virus on the central nervous system could decently guide scientists. In this systematic review and meta-analysis, we assessed the CNS manifestations in COVID-19 cases.

2 METHOD 2.1 Search strategy and selection criteria We performed this systematic review and meta-analysis based on Preferred Reporting Items for Systematic Reviews and Meta-Analyses (PRISMA) guidelines (Moher et al., 2009), and our study protocol is submitted to PROSPERO (ID: CRD42020184456). We systematically searched six databases including Google Scholar, Scopus, PubMed, Web of science, Ovid, and EMBASE for all published articles from 1 January 2020 until 20 April 2020 using the following Medical Subject Heading terms (MESH terms): (“Wuhan coronavirus” OR “Wuhan seafood market pneumonia virus” OR “COVID19 virus” OR “COVID-19 virus” OR “coronavirus disease 2019 virus” OR “SARS-CoV-2” OR “SARS2” OR “2019-nCoV” OR “2019 novel coronavirus” OR “2019-nCoV infection” OR “2019 novel coronavirus disease” OR “2019-nCoV disease” OR “coronavirus disease-19” OR “coronavirus disease 2019” OR “2019 novel coronavirus infection” OR “COVID19” OR “COVID-19” OR “severe acute respiratory syndrome coronavirus 2” OR “coronavirus*”) AND (“Manifestation, Neurologic” OR “Neurological Manifestations” OR “Neurologic Manifestation” OR “Neurological Manifestation” OR “Neurologic Symptom” OR “CNS” OR “brain” OR “neuro*” OR “headache” OR “dizziness” OR “ataxia” OR “epilepsy” OR “seizure” OR “migraine*” OR “CSF” OR “Cerebrospinal Fluids” OR “Fluid, Cerebrospinal” OR “Fluids, Cerebrospinal” OR “Cerebro Spinal Fluid” OR “Cerebro Spinal Fluids” OR “Fluid, Cerebro Spinal” OR “Fluids, Cerebro Spinal” OR “Spinal Fluid, Cerebro” OR “Spinal Fluids, Cerebro” OR “stroke” OR “vertigo” OR “consciousness” OR “Impaired consciousness” OR “coma” OR “cerebrovascular disease” OR “acute cerebrovascular disease” OR “encephalitis”) alone or in combination with OR and AND operators. After removing the duplicated records, articles were screened based on their titles and abstracts by two authors (S.S and M.H) independently. The full texts of eligible publications were examined for inclusion and exclusion criteria (A.AJ, S.M, S.S, and M.H). Observational studies reported at least one of the related CNS symptoms in COVID-19 patients without any language, race, country, and gender limitations included for quantitative synthesis. The preprint studies, interventional studies, systematic reviews, case reports, conferences, commentaries, letters, editorial, author responses, correspondence articles, in vitro, animal studies, children population, articles without full text, or unreliable data were excluded. In addition, the reference list of the eligible studies was searched to prevent missing publication and include all related literature. The data were independently extracted (A.AJ. S.M, S.S, S.S, and M.H), and discrepancies were resolved with discussion and consensus by three independent researchers (SH.N, S.D, and F.A). 2.2 Data analysis and quality assessment The desired data were recorded using an excel spreadsheet form that included the title, first author, year and month of publication, type of study, country, total sample size, the sample size of male and female, study design, demographic characteristics, exposure history, clinical manifestation, CNS symptoms, and any reported comorbidity. We assessed the quality of included studies (A.AJ. S.M, S.S, S.S, and M.H), based on the NIH quality assessment tool for observational cohort and case series studies (NIH). This instrument assessed the quality of included studies based on the research question, study population, the participation rate of eligible persons, inclusion and exclusion criteria, sample size justification, analyses, reasonable timeframe, exposure, outcome measures, outcome assessors, and loss to follow-up. 2.3 Meta-analysis Data from included studies were extracted for the number of events and total patients to perform a meta-analysis (S.D). Cochrane's Q test and the I2 index were used to assess heterogeneity among selected studies. Heterogeneity was categorized as low (below 25%), moderate (25%–75%), and high (above 75%) (Higgins & Thompson, 2002). Also, data adjusted by Freeman–Tukey double arcsine transformation and their 95% CIs were calculated by the Clopper–Pearson method (Clopper & Pearson, 1934). We calculate mean and standard deviations from median and quartiles by using Wan method (Wan et al., 2014). For continuous data, we estimate pooled results of means and their respective 95% CI by the inverse variance method. All analyses were performed using STATA statistical software, version 13 (StataCorp).

3 RESULTS As illustrated in (Figure 1), a total of 2,353 studies were retrieved after a systematic search in the aforementioned databases. After removing duplicates, 1,760 studies remained. Then, we narrowed the studies to 203 articles by screening with titles and abstracts. In full-text screening, 45 studies with no reliable or useful data, 24 review articles, 41 preprints, 6 case reports, 1 case controls, 4 reports, 4 papers with specific children population, one study with specific pregnant population, and 13 publications such as Commentary, editorial or Correspondence letters were excluded. Finally, 64 studies (Barrasa et al., 2020; Chen, Chen, et al., 2020; Chen, Qi, et al., 2020; Chen, Wu, et al., 2020; Chen, Yan, et al., 2020; Chen, Yang, et al., 2020; Chen, Zhou, et al., 2020; Cheng et al., 2020; Ding et al., 2020; Du, Liu, et al., 2020; Du, Tu, et al., 2020; Feng et al., 2020; Guan et al., 2020; Guo et al., 2020; Gupta et al., 2020; Han et al., 2020; Hsih et al., 2020; Huang et al., 2020; Jia et al., 2020; Jin et al., 2020; Kim et al., 2020; Kong et al., 2020; Lei, Huang, et al., 2020; Lei, Jiang, et al., 2020b; Li, Wang, et al., 2020; Liang et al., 2020; Ling et al., 2020; Liu, Yang, et al., 2020; Liu, Yang, et al., 2020; Liu, Yang, et al., 2020; Lo et al., 2020; Mao et al., 2020; Mi et al., 2020; Mo et al., 2020; Moein et al., 2020; Peng, Liu, et al., 2020; Peng, Meng, et al., 2020; Qian et al., 2020; Qin et al., 2020; Shao et al., 2020; Shi, Han, et al., 2020; Shi, Qin, et al., 2020; Song et al., 2020; Sun et al., 2020; Tan et al., 2020; Tian et al., 2020; Wan, Xiang, et al., 2020; Wan, Yi, et al., 2020; Wang, Hu, et al., 2020; Wang, He, et al., 2020; Wang, Fang, et al., 2020; Wu, Chen, et al., 2020; Wu, Wu, et al., 2020; Xu et al., 2020; Yang, Cao, et al., 2020; Yang, Yu, et al., 2020; Yu et al., 2020; Zhang, Cai, et al., 2020; Zhang, Wang, et al., 2020; Zhao et al., 2020; Zheng, Tang, et al., 2020; Zheng, Xu, et al., 2020; Zhong et al., 2020; Zhu et al., 2020) including 11,282 COVID-19 patients, met our inclusion criteria, and were entered in meta-analysis. The main characteristics of our included studies are presented in Table 1. FIGURE 1 Open in figure viewer PowerPoint The process of surveying, screening, and selecting the articles for this systematic review and meta-analysis based on PRISMA guideline TABLE 1. Demographics and baseline characteristics of included studies with COVID-19-infected patients presenting CNS symptoms Author Month of publication Type of studies Country, City/Province Sample size No of positive cases (female/male) Quality assessment Yang, Yu, et al. ( 2020 February 2020 Cohort China, Wuhan 52 17/35 Good Yang, Cao, et al. ( 2020 February 2020 Cohort China, Wenzhou 149 68/81 Fair Wang, Hu, et al. ( 2020 March 2020 Case series China, Wuhan 138 63/75 Good Song et al. ( 2020 February 2020 Retrospective China, – 51 26/25 Good Shi, Han, et al. ( 2020 March 2020 Cohort China, Wuhan 81 39/42 Good Qian et al. ( 2020 March 2020 Case series China, Zhejiang province 91 54/37 Good Mao et al. ( 2020 April 2020 Case series China, Wuhan 214 127/87 Good Liu, Yang, et al. ( 2020 February 2020 Case series China, – 12 4/8 Fair Liu, Yang, et al. ( 2020 February 2020 Retrospective China, Wuhan 137 76/61 Fair Li, Fang, et al. ( 2020 March 2020 Cross-Sectional China, - 54 32/22 Fair Du, Tu, et al. ( 2020 April 2020 Cohort China, Wuhan 85 23/62 Fair Cheng et al. ( 2020 March 2020 Cross-Sectional China, 1,079 505/573 Fair Chen, Zhou, et al. ( 2020 January 2020 Retrospective China, Wuhan 99 32/67 Good Zhu et al. ( 2020 March 2020 Retrospective China, Anhui province 32 17/15 Good Wu, Chen, et al. ( 2020 March 2020 Cohort China, Wuhan 191 72/119 Good Zhong et al. ( 2020 March 2020 Cohort China, Wuhan 49 42/7 Fair Zheng, Xu, et al. ( 2020 April 2020 Case series China, Changsha 99 48/51 Fair Zheng, Tang, et al. ( 2020 March 2020 Retrospective China, Changsha 161 81/80 Good Zhao et al. ( 2020 March 2020 Retrospective Cohort China, Changsha 118 58/60 Good Zhang, Cai, et al. ( 2020 March 2020 Retrospective China, – 573 278/295 Good Zhang, Wang, et al. ( 2020 April 2020 Retrospective Cohort China, Wuhan 663 342/321 Good Yu et al. ( 2020 March 2020 Prospective Cohort China, Beijing 76 38/38 Fair Xu et al. ( 2020 February 2020 Retrospective China, Beijing 50 21/29 Fair Wu, Wu, et al. ( 2020 February 2020 Cross-Sectional China, Chongqing 80 38/42 Fair Wang, Hu, et al. ( 2020 March 2020 Retrospective China, Wuhan 1,012 488/524 Good Wang, He, et al. ( 2020 March 2020 Retrospective study China, Wuhan 339 173/166 Good Wan, Yi, et al. ( 2020 March 2020 Cross sectional China, Chongqing 123 57/66 Good Wan, Xiang, et al. ( 2020 2020 Case series China, Chongqing 135 63/72 Good Tian et al. ( 2020 February 2020 Retrospective observational China, Beijing 262 135/127 Fair Tan et al. ( 2020 April 2020 Retrospective observational China, Changsha 27 16/11 Fair Sun et al. ( 2020 April 2020 Retrospective observational China, Nanyang 150 83/67 Good Shi, Qin, et al. ( 2020 March 2020 Retrospective observational China, Wuhan 416 211/205 Fair Shao et al. ( 2020 April 2020 Retrospective observational China, Wuhan 136 46/90 Good Qin et al. ( 2020 March 2020 Retrospective observational China, Wuhan 452 217/235 Good Peng, Meng, et al. ( 2020 March 2020 Retrospective observational China, Wuhan 112 59/53 Fair Peng, Liu, et al. ( 2020 April 2020 Cross-sectional China, Shanghai 86 47/39 Fair Moein et al. ( 2020 2020 Retrospective observational Iran, Tehran 60 20/40 Fair Mo et al. ( 2020 2020 Retrospective China, Wuhan 155 69/86 Good Mi et al. ( 2020 2020 Retrospective China, Wuhan 10 8/2 Fair Lo et al. ( 2020 March 2020 Retrospective China, Macau 10 7/3 Fair Liu, He, et al. ( 2020 February 2020 Retrospective China, Wuhan 30 20/10 Fair Ling et al. ( 2020 2020 Retrospective China, Wuhan 8 4/4 Poor Liang et al. ( 2020 March 2020 Retrospective China, Wuhan 88 37/51 Good Lei, Jiang, et al. ( 2020 2020 Retrospective China, Wuhan 34 20/14 Good Lei, Huang, et al. ( 2020 2020 Retrospective China, Guiyang 14 6/8 Good Kong et al. ( 2020 February 2020 Case series South Korea, National survey 28 13/15 Poor Kim et al. ( 2020 2020 Retrospective Korea, National survey 28 13/15 Good Jin et al. ( 2020 March 2020 Retrospective China, Zhejiang 651 320/331 Good Jia et al. ( 2020 2020 Retrospective China, Qingdao 44 29/15 Fair Huang et al. ( 2020 January 2020 Retrospective China, Wuhan 41 11/30 Good Hsih et al. ( 2020 2020 Retrospective Taiwan, Taichung 43 26/13 Fair Han et al. ( 2020 2020 Retrospective China, Wuhan 108 70/38 Fair Gupta et al. ( 2020 April 2020 Case series India, New Delhi 21 7/14 Fair Guo et al. ( 2020 2020 Retrospective China, Wuhan 174 98/76 Good Guan et al. ( 2020 February 2020 cross China, National 1,099 459/640 Good Feng et al. ( 2020 April 2020 Retrospective China, Wuhan, Shanghai and Anhui 476 205/271 Good Du, Liu, et al. ( 2020 April 2020 Retrospective China, Wuhan 109 35/74 Good Ding et al. ( 2020 March 2020 Case series China, Wuhan 5 3/2 Good Chen, Chen, et al. ( 2020 April 2020 Retrospective China, Wuhan 42 27/15 Fair Chen, Yang, et al. ( 2020 April 2020 Retrospective China, - 104 52/52 Good Chen, Wu, et al. ( 2020 March 2020 Case series China, Wuhan 274 103/171 Good Chen, Qi, et al. ( 2020 March 2020 Retrospective China, Shanghai 249 123/126 Good Chen, Yan, et al. ( 2020 March 2020 Retrospective China, Wuhan 150 66/84 Good Barrasa et al. ( 2020 2020 Case series Spain, Vitoria 48 21/27 Fair The total sample size of eligible studies was 11,687, including 5,568 females and 6,114 males. The mean age for noncritical patients was 48.557 (95% CI: 44.816%–52.299%) and for critical patients was 58.965 (95% CI: 55.792%–62.139%). As shown in Table 2, the proportion of patients with travel history to Wuhan, Wuhan-related exposure, and Living in Wuhan was 51.15%, 78.52%, and 47.46%, respectively. In addition, the proportion of patients with travel history to other infected areas and contact with patients was 52.21% and 34.65%, respectively. Mortality was assessed in 25 studies with a pooled incidence rate of 10.47%. The incidence rate of positive females and males was 46.42% (95% CI: 43.01%–49.83%) and 49.50% (95% CI: 45.70%–53.31%), respectively. 36.17% (95% CI: 27.91%–44.84%) of infected patients were in the severe, critical, or intensive care unit condition. In addition, the incidence rate of mortality and survival was 10.47% (95% CI: 5.08%–17.33%) and 81.43% (95% CI: 65.75%–93.29%), respectively. TABLE 2. Positive PCR, severity, mortality, and exposure history of COVID-19-infected patients having CNS symptoms Variables No of studies Total sample size No positive case Incidence rate (95% CI) Heterogeneity I2 (%) Q p-Value Positive female 60 11,425 5,363 0.4642 (0.4301–0.4983) 92.2 752.6 <.0001 Positive male 60 11,425 5,919 0.4950 (0.4570–0.5331) 93.8 957.8 <.0001 Severe or critical or ICU 40 9,821 2,611 0.3617 (0.2791–0.4484) 98.6 2,827.4 <.0001 Nonsevere or Noncritical or Non-ICU 37 8,095 5,694 0.7061 (0.6229–0.7832) 98.3 2,154.0 <.0001 Mortality 25 7,087 556 0.1047 (0.0508–0.1733) 98.4 1,497.6 <.0001 Survival 18 3,174 2,585 0.8143 (0.6575–0.9329) 98.9 1,600.9 <.0001 Exposure history Travel history to Wuhan 27 6,476 3,434 0.5115 (0.3295–0.6920) 99.5 5,434.9 <.0001 Wuhan-related exposure 2 567 433 0.7852 (0.7501–0.8183) – – – Living in Wuhan 2 1,151 535 0.4746 (0.4455–0.5037) – – – Travel history to other infected areas 3 255 133 0.5221 (0.4609–0.5832) 0.0 1.1 .5664 Contact with patients 19 4,422 1504 0.3465 (0.2976–0.3953) 90.1 181.2 <.0001 Family clustering 6 1,182 254 0.2044 (0.1376–0.2712) 84.9 33.1 <.0001 Unknown exposure history 6 472 63 0.1244 (0.0446–0.2042) 91.3 57.7 <.0001 Based on the results shown in Table 3 and Figure 2, the most common manifestations were fever 79.39% (95% CI: 73.94%–84.37%), cough 54.77% (95%CI: 49.10%–60.38%), fatigue 32.39% (95% CI: 26.78%–38.0%), dyspnea 28.47% (95% CI: 21.49%–35.99%), chest tightness 23.83% (95% CI: 17.84%–29.82%), and shortness of breath 20.42% (95% CI: 13.28%–28.85%). The highest incidence rate among CNS symptoms of COVID-19 patients was for headache (8.69% with 95% CI: 6.76%–10.82%), followed by dizziness (5.94%, 95%CI: 3.66%–8.22%), and impaired consciousness (1.90% with 95% CI: 1.0%–2.79%). TABLE 3. Clinical Manifestations in COVID-19-infected patients presenting CNS symptoms Variables No of studies Total sample size No of positive case Incidence rate (95% CI) Heterogeneity I2 (%) Q p-Value General symptoms Fever 63 11,537 8,723 0.7939 (0.7394–0.8437) 97.7 2,689.5 <.0001 Fatigue 43 8,638 2,454 0.3239 (0.2678–0.3800) 97.8 1936.5 <.0001 Myalgia (muscle pain or muscle injury) 41 7,479 246 0.1395 (0.1169–0.1621) 88.2 338.4 <.0001 Nasal congestion 3 2,684 151 0.0554 (0.0428–0.0680) 51.2 4.1 .1290 Rhinorrhea 15 3,881 163 0.0447 (0.0258–0.0676) 83.9 87.2 <.0001 Dry cough or cough 62 11,507 6,047 0.5477 (0.4910–0.6038) 97.0 2054.7 <.0001 Arthralgia 3 204 8 0.0243 (0.000–0.0785) 63.6 5.5 .0642 Chill 11 3,878 512 0.1802 (0.0834–0.3021) 98.4 637.1 <.0001 GI symptoms 6 1,795 83 0.0501 (0.0148–0.0854) 87.7 40.8 <.0001 Nausea 11 1,934 115 0.0595 (0.0387–0.0803) 69.0 32.3 .0004 Vomiting 11 2,703 97 0.0322 (0.0255–0.0397) 23.6 13.1 .2183 Nausea and/or vomiting 13 3,160 181 0.0518 (0.0337–0.0700) 79.7 59.2 <.0001 Anorexia or inappetence 17 2,638 588 0.2052 (0.1393–0.2711) 96.8 508.7 <.0001 Diarrhea 45 8,270 909 0.1030 (0.0832–0.1227) 91.0 489.8 <.0001 Abdominal pain 14 3,132 112 0.0345 (0.0205–0.0485) 74.7 51.5 <.0001 Chest tightness 9 1,857 468 0.2383 (0.1784–0.2982) 88.3 68.6 <.0001 Shortness of breath 26 6,538 1,177 0.2042 (0.1328–0.2858) 98.1 1,329.0 <.0001 Dyspnea 32 4,793 1,255 0.2847 (0.2149–0.3599) 96.4 859.7 <.0001 Chest pain 13 2,490 68 0.0249 (0.0075–0.0490) 81.4 64.4 <.0001 Hemoptysis 13 3,518 71 0.0169 (0.0074–0.0289) 65.2 34.5 .0006 Heart palpitations 2 191 13 0.0671 (0.0316–0.1026) – – – Pharyngodynia or Throat pain or Pharyngalgia or throat sore 41 9,021 888 0.0983 (0.0767–0.1219) 89.9 399.9 <.0001 Coryza or sputum production or expectoration 30 7,239 1,909 0.2517 (0.1852–0.3182) 98.4 1791.4 <.0001 CNS symptoms Headache 48 9,782 897 0.0869 (0.0676–0.1082) 89.5 449.5 <.0001 Dizziness 10 2,296 139 0.0594 (0.0366–0.0822) 81.3 48.1 <.0001 Headache and/or Dizziness 5 558 58 0.0978 (0.0733–0.1224) 6.2 4.3 .3711 Impaired consciousness 2 877 26 0.0190 (0.0100–0.0279) – – – FIGURE 2 Open in figure viewer PowerPoint The incidence rate of CNS manifestations in COVID-19 patients (this figure is Created with BioRender.com) Table 4 shows comorbidities that were reported in 60 studies. The highest incidence rate in comorbidities was hypertension with 23.54% (95% CI: 19.14%–27.94%), diabetes mellitus (11.68% with 95% CI, 9.80%–13.57%), cardiovascular disease (11.66% with 95% CI: 8.97%–14.35%), and cerebrovascular diseases (3.47% with 95% CI: 2.29%–4.85%). TABLE 4. Comorbidities in COVID-19-infected patients with CNS symptoms Variables No of studies Total sample size NO positive case Incidence rate (95% CI) Heterogeneity I2 (%) Q p-Value Any comorbidities 27 6,729 1,932 0.3247 (0.2729–0.3766) 95.8 617.9 <.0001 Cerebrovascular diseases 19 4,502 152 0.0347 (0.0229–0.0485) 76.3 76.1 <.0001 Cardiovascular diseases 35 8,394 743 0.1166 (0.0897–0.1435) 97.8 1577.8 <.0001 Cardiovascular disease and Cerebrovascular diseases 8 1,041 200 0.2028 (0.1194–0.2863) 93.5 108.6 <.0001 Malignancy/Cancer 32 6,986 197 0.0278 (0.0187–0.0383) 75.5 126.7 <.0001 Digestive system disease/GI disease 7 1,661 82 0.0504 (0.0267–0.0740) 82.2 33.7 <.0001 Immunity system-related diseases Immunosuppression 3 604 13 0.0172 (0.0069–0.0276) 28.5 2.8 .2467 Immunodeficiency 3 1,612 11 0.0101 (0.000–0.0227) 71.5 7.0 .0297 Autoimmune diseases 3 425 4 0.0083 (0.0000–0.0169) 0.0 0.5 .7860 Infectious diseases Hepatitis B 5 1,801 40 0.0183 (0.0064–0.0303) 62.5 10.7 .0306 HIV 3 567 4 0.0058 (0.0000–0.0237) 64.6 5.6 .0590 Bacterial co-infections/Bacteremia 2 675 8 0.0092 (0.0020–0.0164) – – – Chronic renal disease 21 5,659 119 0.0204 (0.0143–0.0266) 60.1 50.1 .0002 Chronic liver disease 16 3,254 92 0.0218 (0.0136–0.0314) 49.1 29.5 .0140 Chronic Respiratory disease/Pulmonary disease 15 3,215 150 0.0428 (0.0270–0.0586) 82.7 80.7 <.0001 Endocrinology disorder 8 1,338 130 0.0897 (0.0744–0.1049) 43.3 12.3 .0896 Hyperlipidemia 2 70 3 0.0197 (0.0000–0.0519) – – – Urinary system disease 2 781 23 0.0280 (0.0165–0.0396) – – – Hypertension 40 8,106 1,697 0.2354 (0.1914–0.2794) 96.5 1,127.2 <.0001 Diabetes 40 8,045 840 0.1168 (0.0980–0.1357) 87.0 300.4 <.0001 COPDa 23 5,610 148 0.0262 (0.0185–0.0339) 82.9 129.1 <.0001 Smoking 19 4,407 371 0.0827 (0.0586–0.1069) 87.9 149.4 <.0001

4 DISCUSSION Recently, the world has encountered an emergent outbreak posed by the novel coronavirus 2019, officially known as COVID-19. This infection has become a global threat, endangering millions of lives worldwide. Hence, many experts, researchers, scientists, and clinicians are attempting to investigate various aspects of this new infection to find useful solutions for coping with COVID-19. One of the various aspects of COVID-19 is its impact on the CNS, as reported in a growing number of studies (Baig, 2020). In addition to the common symptoms in COVID-19, several CNS symptoms such as headache and impaired consciousness have been observed in infected patients (Mao et al., 2020). While most investigated the respiratory symptoms of COVID-19, Mao et al. specifically examined the prevalence of neurological manifestations ranging from CNS to peripheral nervous system (PNS) and neuromuscular symptoms in an observational study on COVID-19 patients. They demonstrated CNS presentations ranging from dizziness and headache to impaired consciousness, acute cerebrovascular disease, ataxia, and seizure (Mao et al., 2020). Based on the possible neuroinvasive potential of COVID-19, in this systematic review and meta-analysis, we analyzed those evidence indicating the involvement of CNS. We assessed 11,687 COVID-19 adult patients from six countries. We reported that COVID-19 patients commonly showed CNS symptoms, including headache, dizziness, and impaired consciousness. Headache (8.69%) was the most common CNS symptoms, followed by dizziness (5.94%) and impaired consciousness (1.9%). Exact reasons for headache, commonly seen in patients, remained unexplained. However, it can be due to COVID-19-related stress and anxiety (Garg, 2020). It is reported that the headache may also be related to the elevated level of inflammatory mediators and reduced cerebral blood flow in response to hypoxia (Jasti et al., 2020), but further studies are needed. There are two main routes of CNS entry of COVID-19 (hematogenous and peripheral nerves route) leading to CNS infection. In the hematogenous route, the virus infecting respiratory tracts can reach the CNS through the bloodstream via overcoming a strict obstacle known as the blood–brain barrier (BBB) (Desforges et al., 2014, 2020; Román et al., 2020; Sepehrinezhad et al., 2020; Swanson and McGavern, 2015). They also may enter the CNS through circumventricular organs, those CNS organs lacking the BBB (Chigr et al., 2020). The second route, a peripheral nerve, can provide the virus with a retrograde route in to access the CNS via an axonal transport machinery (Baig et al., 2020; Desforges et al., 2014, 2020; Román et al., 2020; Sepehrinezhad et al., 2020; Swanson and McGavern, 2015). In accordance with this finding, some previous studies on other types of coronaviruses indicate that coronaviruses can reach the brain via cranial nerves (e.g., olfactory, trigeminal nerve terminals in the nasal cavity) (Desforges et al., 2020; Li et al., 2016; Natoli et al., 2020; Netland et al., 2008). Furthermore, SARS-CoV-2 can have indirect effects on the CNS (Zhou, Kang, et al., 2020). Cytokine storm as an immune system response during COVID-19 infection could lead to the breakdown of the blood–brain barrier (BBB) (Liguori et al., 2020; Poyiadji et al., 2020). Infection of airway tissues by COVID-19 in severe cases leads to impaired gas exchange, subsequently causing CNS hypoxia resulting in neural dysfunction (Abboud et al., 2020). More precisely, both cytokine storm and hypoxia which are frequently present in the severe condition of infection can contribute to making the BBB more permeable to the virus (Kaur & Ling, 2008; Zhou, Kang, et al., 2020). There exists a wealth of evidence that supports the expression and distribution of the ACE2, the receptor for SARS-CoV-2, in the CNS (Jiang et al., 2013; Kawajiri et al., 2009; Li, Li, et al., 2020; Xia & Lazartigues, 2008; Xia et al., 2011; Xu et al., 2011; Zubair et al., 2020). Hence, ACE2 may be a potential target of COVID-19 upon the entrance into the CNS, triggering its effects on CNS tissue (Baig et al., 2020). The presence of the virus in the central nervous system is also supported by some evidence reporting COVID-19 in the CSF of the infected cases (Moriguchi et al., 2020; Zhou, Zhang, et al., 2020). In our meta-analysis, the mortality rate of COVID-19 cases with at least one CNS symptom was 10.47%, which is much higher than the mortality rate of the general infected population (Borges do Nascimento et al., 2020). Such a mortality rate can indicate the importance of careful monitoring of CNS manifestations in COVID-19 patients. This may be due to the effect of COVID-19 on the brain stem and suppression of the cardiorespiratory control centers causing respiratory failure and death (Li, Bai, et al., 2020). Moreover, recent studies have shown that COVID-19 can accelerate the formation of the blood clot in the blood vessels, increasing the risk of cerebrovascular diseases in COVID-19 patients (Choi et al., 2020; Hess et al., 2020). Hence, because the brain is nourished by a network of blood vessels, this could be indicative of the importance of cerebral vasculature investigations on the CNS symptoms in the COVID-19 infection. In a nutshell, attention to the CNS aspects of COVID-19 infection has outstanding benefits for clinician's understanding of a very serious complication of this infection. At this point in time, researchers have mainly focused on finding medicinal treatments for respiratory symptoms of COVID-19. However, it is necessary to investigate the various CNS manifestations of COVID-19 since they are associated with increased severity and mortality (Mao et al., 2020). Not only respiratory system dysfunction, but also impairment of respiratory control centers in the CNS (brain stem) can induce acute respiratory failure (Carvalho et al., 2011; Li, Bai, et al., 2020). Therefore, considering all effective factors, it can provide clinicians to choose the best way in an attempt to manage this pandemic more efficiently.

5 LIMITATIONS There are several limitations in our systematic review and meta-analysis. Since in this ongoing pandemic, most of the investigations have conducted on typical signs and symptoms of COVID-19. Thus, the number of studies on the atypical complications of COVID-19, such as CNS presentations, is partially low. Moreover, there exist many COVID-19 preprint papers that have not yet undergone peer review. Additionally, five studies included in our meta-analysis reported headache and/or dizziness as one symptom in COVID-19 cases. Because we were not sure that headache and/or dizziness is resulted from headache or is a consequence of the dizziness, it would be challenging to categorize headache and/or dizziness in the subgroup of dizziness or headache. Hence, in our meta-analysis, it was not reported as a CNS manifestation and is implied as a separate symptom (Table 3).

6 CONCLUSION COVID-19 is a global problem that currently affects millions of people. This highly pathogenic virus can affect various parts of the human body. Although the respiratory tract has been mainly targeted by COVID-19, the central nervous system can be affected significantly. In addition, patients with more severe illness showed more CNS symptoms, which may bring on worsen clinical conditions. This study achieved an important estimation for the incidence of neurological manifestations in patients with COVID-19. The results of our survey may be helpful for clinicians for better diagnosis and management of CNS signs and symptoms in patients with COVID-19.

7 AUTHOR CONTRIBUTORS SH.N. and S.D. conceptualized and designed the study; A.A.J., S.M., S.S., S.S., and M.H. involved in acquisition of data; S.D. analyzed and interpreted the data; S.H.N., S.D., A.A.J. S.M., S.S., and S.M.P. drafted the manuscript; SH.N., S.D., A.A.J., F.A., H.E., and D.F. critically revised the article.

ACKNOWLEDGMENTS Dr. Katayoun Alikhani for her supports and comments.

CONFLICT OF INTEREST None.

Open Research Peer Review The peer review history for this article is available at https://publons.com/publon/10.1002/brb3.2025. DATA AVAILABILITY STATEMENT The data that support the findings of this study are openly available.","{'neg': 0.036, 'neu': 0.911, 'pos': 0.054, 'compound': 0.9947}"
25,COVID-19 pandemic (2019-21),10 months ago,"June 29, 2021 Nuri Lee, Seri Jeong, Min-Jeong Park, Wonkeun Song ... Background: After one year of the pandemic and hints of seasonal patterns,...",https://collections.plos.org/collection/covid-19/,"Biology & Life Sciences

This Collection of articles highlights all content published across the PLOS journals relating to the COVID-19 pandemic in 2019-21. PLOS is committed to disseminating research as quickly as possible, particularly in public health emergencies. All articles published in any PLOS journal are Open Access free of charge to all readers.



Image Credit: US NIH/Public domain (CC-0) and Senado Federal/Flickr (CC-BY)","{'neg': 0.0, 'neu': 0.882, 'pos': 0.118, 'compound': 0.7906}"
26,High school box scores for April 26,4 months ago,"Avery Romano-Villani 6-1, 6-2; Edward Shanoyan, Pascack Hills, def. ... Eugene Lee and Benzi Villaruel 6-0, 6-0; George Totonjic and Keisang...",https://www.northjersey.com/story/sports/high-school/box-scores/2021/04/26/high-school-scores-north-jersey-box-scores-april-26/7381813002/,"Your subscription supports:

Investigative reports that give you the scoop on New Jersey schools, politics, environment and the mob.","{'neg': 0.0, 'neu': 0.806, 'pos': 0.194, 'compound': 0.4767}"
27,The 31 Most Underrated Movies of 2020,8 months ago,"But in a year where those movies have been few and far between, ... girl gang team-up movie full of glitter and exploding sandbags, is the...",https://www.thrillist.com/entertainment/nation/most-underrated-movies-2020,"'Swallow' | IFC Films 'Swallow' | IFC Films

Every year there are movies everyone hears about. Those are your Marvel films and your Oscar players. But in a year where those movies have been few and far between, more great films than usual have flown under the radar—the foreign favorites that never crack the mainstream, the studio releases that get written off, the straight-to-VOD indies—that deserve your attention just as much as the more heavily marketed releases. Before you decry 2020 a year where ""no movies have come out,"" read this list and think again. Want even more movies? Read our list of the Best Movies of 2020.

Samuel Goldwyn Films

Another Round Release date: December 4

Cast: Mads Mikkelsen, Thomas Bo Larsen, Lars Ranthe, Magnus Millang

Director: Thomas Vinterberg

Why it's worth seeing: Thomas Vinterberg's drama Another Round stars Mads Mikkelsen as Martin, a history teacher who is reserved and sober, quite literally. When out for a birthday celebration with his fellow instructors, he initially refuses to drink, but eventually gives in and an experiment starts. He and his buddies start to test a theory of psychiatrist Finn Skårderud that humans' blood alcohol content is, on average, too low. The idea is research, but as with anything involving alcohol, lines become blurred. Martin, at first, sees only the positive effects: He's a more exuberant presence in his classroom, and is reconnecting with his wife. Eventually, as it always does, the buzz wears off. Vinterberg crafts a tale of male ennui in a country where drinking is rampant, and captures an incredible performance from Mikkelsen. (Watch the trailer) —Esther Zuckerman

Bleecker Street

The Assistant Release date: January 31

Cast: Julia Garner, Matthew Macfadyen, Kristine Froseeth

Director: Kitty Green

Why it's worth seeing: Nothing much happens in The Assistant. A young woman (played by Ozark's Julia Garner)—whose name is apparently Jane, although it's never said in the movie—goes to work at the office of a high-powered Hollywood executive before the crack of dawn. She performs menial tasks. She takes calls. When the day is over, long after the sun is set, she heads home. But Green has made a silent scream of a film, which is so quietly unsettling it becomes hard to shake. Of course, you're probably aware of some version of this story. Jane's unseen boss is quite evidently a stand-in for Harvey Weinstein, and over the course of her otherwise monotonous day, Jane starts to realize something is amiss. There's an earring on the carpet. A new, very pretty woman arrives from Idaho with no experience and is put up in a fancy hotel. A meeting with an actress extends late into the night. But this is not a story about triumph over the evil that men like Weinstein perpetrate. Instead, it is about the systems in place that have allowed his behavior to go on for so long. When Jane reaches out to a smarmy HR person played by Succession's Matthew Macfadyen, she quickly realizes that speaking out is futile. The Assistant is a tale of disillusionment, and Garner wears the exhaustion, stress, and pain of that on her face. Her performance is agonizing as is the movie that surrounds it. But that's the point. (Watch the trailer) — EZ

IFC Films

Babyteeth Release date: June 19

Cast: Eliza Scanlen, Toby Wallace, Essie Davis, Ben Mendelsohn

Director: Shannon Murphy

Why it's worth seeing: There's a kind of movie you presume you're getting when you hear ""teen cancer drama,"" but Babyteeth, an Australian production, is not that. The film stars Eliza Scanlen, best known from Little Women and Sharp Objects, as Milla, a young woman who is dying. Waiting on a train platform on the way to school, she meets Moses (Toby Wallace), a drug addict with whom she falls into hopeless obsession. Her parents (Ben Mendelsohn and Essie Davis) are initially wary of Moses' increased presence in their daughter's life, but come to rely on him more and more as they realize how happy he's making her. Babyteeth is a film about the lengths people will go to in order to appease their loved ones in times of crisis, painting a portrait of a family in the throes of impending grief, trying to mask that in any way possible. (Watch the trailer) — EZ

Kino Lorber

Bacurau Release date: March 6

Cast: Sônia Braga, Udo Keir, Bárbara Colen, Thomas Aquino

Directors: Juliano Dornelles and Kleber Mendonça Filho

Why it's worth seeing: ""What's going on in Bacurau?"" holds dual meaning when discussing the new film by Brazilian directors Juliano Dornelles and Kleber Mendonça Filho. The mystery as to just who or what is besieging the tiny isolated town is the driving force behind the movie's narrative, but the question posed above also applies to the experience of watching Bacurau. You sit, hypnotized by the film while at the same time you wonder: What the hell is even happening? Is something supernatural or alien occurring? What about the hallucinogens that characters keep taking? Or is this just reality spun on its head? The quasi-western seems to exist in a world that is not quite our own, even as it offers an allegory for messy present-day Brazilian politics. To say too much about what is actually going on in Bacurau would ruin the experience of watching it. Dornelles and Mendonça Filho give the film a fuzzy B-movie feel that's only enhanced by the presence of B-movie hero Udo Kier as a threatening military figure. Bacurau holds its cards close to its chest, all building to an exuberantly bloody finale that's angry and hysterical. (Watch the trailer) — EZ

HBO

Bad Education Release date: April 25

Cast: Hugh Jackman, Allison Janney, Geraldine Viswanathan

Director: Cory Finley

Why it's worth seeing: Based on what has been called the largest public school embezzlement scandal in history, HBO's Bad Education is a lean, mean indictment of those in the school system who stole taxpayer money to fund their jetsetting lives. Hugh Jackman is riveting as district superintendent Frank Tassone, obsessed with getting his Long Island high school to #1 in the rankings, coming up with fabulist, flashy schemes like a ""skywalk"" between buildings to get it there. When a student working for the school newspaper starts snooping around the archives, she uncovers more than a few discrepancies in the school's business expense logs, as if someone in the administration (or all of the people in the administration) has been systematically stealing money for nearly a decade. (Watch the trailer) — Emma Stefansky

Thrillist TV History of S1 E24 The History of Tailgating

Kino Lorber

Beanpole Release date: January 19

Cast: Viktoria Miroshnichenko, Vasilisa Perelygina

Director: Kantemir Balagov

Why it's great: Beanpole opens with a woman frozen in place, twitching slightly. It's a disturbing image, but one that sets the tone for what's to follow: An unrelenting story about two women and their trauma in post-WWII Leningrad. Directed by the 28-year-old Kantemir Balagov, Beanpole is about the lasting effects of war and does so without varnish even as the cinematography pops with painterly composition. That woman unable to move is Iya Sergueeva, who is working as a nurse and taking care of a young child when the film opens. But old pains are further reignited when her friend Masha returns from service. It's a film that requires patience and endurance, but it's worth every second. (Watch the trailer) — EZ

Warner Bros. Pictures

Birds of Prey Release date: February 7

Cast: Margot Robbie, Rosie Perez, Mary Elizabeth Winstead, Jurnee Smollett-Bell, Ella Jay Basco

Director: Cathy Yan

Why it's worth seeing: We've had a string of pretty great DC Comics movies in the past few years—Wonder Woman and Aquaman both breathed new life in what looked like a dead franchise—but Birds of Prey, the Harley Quinn-centric girl gang team-up movie full of glitter and exploding sandbags, is the first one that seems to remember its characters' poppy, colorful origins. Oh, right, this movie seems to say, this is a comic book! It's a neon-lit zap in the pants, exactly the kind of thing we need in the dead of February with summer blockbuster season only a whisper on the horizon. Margot Robbie plays her motormouthed Quinn with even more manic panache than in the awful Suicide Squad; the new additions to the universe, including Mary Elizabeth Winstead, Jurnee Smollett-Bell, Rosie Perez, and Ella Jay Basco, provide endless fun; and the villainous duo of Ewan McGregor and bleach-blond Chris Messina are appropriately, unexpectedly terrifying. Plus, it also does everything it can to erase Suicide Squad from memory, which is something that we all wish we could do. If only more people went to see it. (Watch the trailer) — ES

Amazon Studios

Blow the Man Down Release date: March 20

Cast: Sophie Lowe, Morgan Saylor, Margo Martindale, June Squibb

Directors: Bridget Savage Cole and and Danielle Krudy

Why it's great: This indie is a sharp, pleasantly nasty tale about women and murder in a tiny Maine town. The movie, by Bridget Savage Cole and Danielle Krudy, opens with a chorus of burly fishermen singing the sea shanty that gives the film its title, but it quickly grows disinterested in any of the dudes. Sophie Lowe and Morgan Saylor, the latter of whom is best known as Dana Brody on Homeland, play the Connelly sisters. The day of their mother's funeral, Saylor's Mary Beth acts out, absconds to a bar, and takes up with a shady character who she ends up accidentally killing. That incident leads the siblings to discover a whole new seedy facet of their community. Blow the Man Down is constantly tense, and features wonderfully prickly performances from the likes of Margo Martindale, who plays the brothel owner next door. (Watch the trailer) — EZ

RLJE Films

Color Out of Space Release date: January 24

Cast: Nicolas Cage, Joely Richardson, Tommy Chong

Director: Richard Stanley

Why it's worth seeing: It's hard to know what Nicolas Cage movies are worth seeking out these days. The eye-bulging, voice-modulating thespian has a tendency to select projects that are either surprisingly compelling (like 2018's brutal genre hybrid Mandy) or disappointingly lame (most of his other recent work). Luckily, Color Out of Space, a psychedelic adaptation of H.P. Lovecraft's short story from 1927, is one of the good recent Cage movies, mixing science-fiction intrigue and bursts horror movie excess to great effect. Cage's Nathan, a chatty farmer with a loving wife (Joely Richardson) and a pair of mildly rebellious kids, must contend with a meteoroid that crashes in his front yard, shooting purple light all over his property and infecting the local water supply. Inexplicably, alpacas are involved. Somehow, Cage makes it all work. (Watch the trailer) —Dan Jackson

Focus Features

EMMA. Release date: February 21

Cast: Anya Taylor-Joy, Johnny Flynn, Bill Nighy, Mia Goth

Director: Autumn De Wilde

Why it's worth seeing: Autumn De Wilde's Emma—styled EMMA., period included—is not a radical reinvention of its source material, Jane Austen's 1815 novel. (Leave that to Clueless.) This new version is a faithful interpretation that's nevertheless very funny, meticulously styled in hues that give it a marzipan-like aesthetic, and relies on music in a Peter and the Wolf-like way, each character getting their own sounds and theme, that feels appropriate to De Wilde's long career as the ""rock and roll Martha Stewart"" as a respected photographer for musicians like Jenny Lewis, Elliott Smith, and Beck. Anya Taylor-Joy, of The Witch fame, is de Wilde's ""handsome, clever, and rich"" heroine, the vain Miss Woodhouse who adores getting involved in other people's affairs, but refuses to deal with her own feelings. Her Mr. Knightley—the tale's foil-slash-love interest—is Johnny Flynn, a folk musician and actor familiar to Netflix viewers as the lead of the rom-com Lovesick. Together, they provide all the intense, longing glances you expect from a repressed Regency romance, making this Emma sexy as well. (Watch the trailer) — EZ

Netflix

The Half of It Release date: May 1

Cast: Leah Lewis, Daniel Diemer, Alexxis Lemire

Director: Alice Wu

Why it's worth seeing: There's more to this Netflix rom-com than meets the eye. What initially seems like a Cyrano de Bergerac riff that would yield a saccharine conclusion is actually a tender exploration of isolation and loneliness for a queer teen of color. In The Half of It, Leah Lewis plays Ellie Chu, the only person of Chinese descent in a tiny town called Squahamish. Ellie helps her single father run the local train station, and, for cash on the side, she ghostwrites her fellow high schoolers' papers for a fee. One day, Ellie is followed home by the dopey sweet guy Paul Munsky (Daniel Diemer) who wants to employ her for a different kind of writing assignment: He wants her to write a love letter to Aster Flores (Alexxis Lemire), the prettiest girl in school and daughter of the town pastor. Ellie, who is not out, secretly has a crush on Aster too. Wu weaves the setting's religious conservatism into the backdrop of the narrative, opting for a story that's not upsetting but is deeply melancholy. (Watch the trailer) — EZ

Netflix

His House Release date: October 30

Cast: Sope Dirisu, Wunmi Mosaku, Matt Smith

Director: Remi Weekes

Why it's worth seeing: Halfway through His House, the terrifying, sobering debut of director Remi Weekes, you realize that, on top of it being one of the scariest, most heartbreaking horror films of the year, it's also a mystery. The conflict, as it usually does in horror cinema, begins with a grave sin committed by one of the characters and is referenced over and over again before the film's conclusion. But in His House, you have no idea what the sin is until the dreamlike vision-quest ending, during which the movie's characters are forced to relive a trauma that is all too real for so many living in our world right now, in order to defeat a supernatural threat. (Watch the trailer) — ES

Netflix

Horse Girl Release date: February 7

Cast: Alison Brie, Molly Shannon, John Reynolds, Dylan Gelula

Director: Jeff Baena

Why it's worth seeing: The Netflix movie co-written by star Alison Brie defies the twee expectations set out by its title. Yes, Brie's protagonist is a woman who loves horses. No, she's not about to embark on some cutesy rom com and teach a man the meaning of life or whatever. Inspired by Brie's own family history of mental illness, Horse Girl is a surprising, surreal take on a woman's breakdown. Brie is excellent as Sarah, who works in a craft store and spends her nights watching a TV procedural and making lanyards. She's a lonely, solitary figure, who has a tenuous support system. But that all starts to slip away when her strange dreams intensify and she starts to believe she might have been abducted by aliens. There are certainly debates to be had as to just how well Horse Girl handles the balance between reality and fantasy with which it toys, but it's an engaging and disorienting ride nonetheless, anchored by some great acting. (Watch the trailer) — EZ

Amazon Studios

I'm Your Woman Release date: December 4

Cast: Rachel Brosnahan, Arinzé Kene, Marsha Stephanie Blake

Director: Julia Hart

Why it's worth watching: The latest from director Julia Hart, who made the underrated Fast Color last year, is a '70s gangster story that defies all of the tropes of what you expect when you read ""'70s gangster story."" The Marvelous Mrs. Maisel's Rachel Brosnahan plays Jean, a new mother and wife of a mobster. When she's told that her husband in in trouble and she needs to disappear in the middle of the night, Jean is forced into a life of isolation that forces her to reckon with her own ignorance. There's a deliberate slowness to the narrative—an almost carefulness, like someone tiptoeing around a room so as not to be heard—even as it is punctuated by bursts of action. (Watch the trailer) — EZ

Shudder

La Llorona Release date: August 6

Cast: María Mercedes Coroy, Julio Diaz, Sabrina De La Hoz

Director: Jayro Bustamante

Why it's worth seeing: It should be noted right off the bat that this film has nothing to do with last year's big studio frightfest The Curse of La Llorona, even though they both riff on the same myth. In Bustamante's much subtler film, there are no jump scares; it's the legacy of the Guatemalan genocide that's doing the haunting. The narrative centers on the wealthy family of a retired general who is on trial for his role in the massacre of the Maya people. After being declared guilty, he and his family remain essentially trapped in their mansion with protestors surrounding the walls. The sound of calls for justice are constant, except when another noise creeps through in the middle of the night: that of a crying woman, aka La Llorona. Bustamante creates images that damn the central characters in their desire to turn a blind eye to the pain they have caused, either directly or indirectly. The eeriness of the scenario grows with the arrival of a new young maid (María Mercedes Coroy), who seems to have lived longer than her appearance might imply. The scares in La Llorona come from waiting to see who will get his or her comeuppance, and when that finally does arrive, it's both thrilling and somehow doesn't cut as deep as one would have hoped. (Watch the trailer) — EZ

Vertical Entertainment

Miss Juneteenth Release date: June 19

Cast: Nichole Beharie, Alexis Chikaeze, Kendrick Sampson

Director: Channing Godfrey Peoples

Channing Godfrey Peoples' Miss Juneteenth is a different kind of pageant story than the ones Hollywood traditionally produces. The drama, which premiered at Sundance and was released on this year's Juneteenth, is named for a competition for young Black girls celebrating the holiday, which marks the date that enslaved people in Texas learned of the Emancipation Proclamation, more than two years after it was issued. It follows Turquoise Jones, played by the incredible and underrated performer Nicole Beharie, who was crowned Miss Juneteenth in her youth and now wants the same for her daughter Kai (Alexis Chikaeze). Winners are promised bright futures with scholarships to historically Black colleges and universities, but Turquoise's life didn't turn out as planned. She now works multiple jobs, and has placed all of her own ambitions onto Kai, who regards the pageant with skepticism. Beharie does remarkable work as Turquoise, whose strictness blends with exhaustion and love, and Peoples crafts a film which celebrates the bond between generations of Black women with a delicate, moving sweetness. In a year where Juneteenth is finally being recognized across the country, this is a must-watch. (Watch the trailer) — EZ

Focus Features

Never, Rarely, Sometimes, Always Release date: March 13

Cast: Sidney Flanagan, Talia Ryder, Théodore Pellerin, Sharon Van Etten

Director: Eliza Hittman

Why it's worth seeing: There's a scene in Eliza Hittman's drama Never, Rarely, Sometimes, Always that is near impossible to shake. Teen Autumn (Flanagan) has traveled to New York with her cousin Skylar (Ryder) in order to have an abortion, prohibited in her home state of Pennsylvania. She sits in an office in a Manhattan Planned Parenthood as a counselor cycles through a series of mandatory questions. The camera holds on Autumn's face as the questions grow more and more personal. The young woman doesn't reveal much in her answers, but you can read the pain in the cracking of her voice and the glistening in her eyes. A lot goes unsaid in Hittman's follow-up to her 2017 story of burgeoning sexuality, Beach Rats. We never hear Autumn and Skylar hatch a plan to go to the city. They just pack an unnecessarily large suitcase and leave. Autumn never talks about her feelings with regards to terminating her pregnancy and Skylar never asks. But nothing ever seems missing in this silence. Hittman has made a film about the grim pacts women make with each other in a world that is hostile to them set in an unromantic vision of New York. Much of the action takes place in and around Port Authority, where Autumn and Skylar would otherwise be faceless commuters in pallid surroundings. Never, Rarely, Sometimes, Always is an unforgiving movie, and it's nevertheless stunning. (Watch the trailer) — EZ

IFC Films

The Nest Release date: September 18

Cast: Jude Law, Carrie Coon, Charlie Shotwell, Oona Roche

Director: Sean Durkin

Why it's worth seeing: ""This was our fresh start,"" says Carrie Coon's Allison to her husband Rory (Jude Law) early on in The Nest, Sean Durkin's severe drama of marriage and money. The way Coon delivers the line hints at a shared history, a series of broken promises and a desire to salvage a relationship through drastic change. The couple moves to London from America with their children so that Rory can secure a financial windfall: It's the '80s and regulations in the English markets are loosening. But the plan doesn't work and soon Rory is spending money he doesn't have to maintain a lifestyle Allison doesn't even necessarily want. His reckless financial risk-taking feeds her natural cautiousness, which slowly turns into resentment and anger. Interrogating the way class anxieties forged in childhood can determine patterns of behavior, Durkin's movie is as perceptive as it is tense. (Watch the trailer) — DJ

IFC Films

The Other Lamb Release date: April 3

Cast: Raffey Cassidy, Denise Gough, Michiel Huisman

Director: Malgorzata Szumowska

Why it's worth seeing: Even on a smaller screen, which is frankly how you'll be watching most things in 2020, The Other Lamb is absolutely extraordinary to behold. Malgorzata Szumowska's cult film with notes of horror is as gorgeous as it is deeply creepy. Raffey Cassidy, known for her work in Vox Lux and The Killing of a Sacred Deer, plays a teen named Selah who has spent her entire life under the control of a man who goes by Shepherd (Huisman). Selah and her ""sisters"" are devoted followers of this man, unaware of the maliciousness that lurks in his belief system and the society he's created. But over the course of the film, Selah slowly wakes up, no thanks to any intervention from the outside world, but as a result of her own emerging power. Her dreams are plagued with violent visions, which she begins to embrace instead of shun. Szumowska and cinematographer Michal Englert encase her story in strikingly beautiful landscapes, and Cassidy makes the case that she's one of the most adventurous young actors out there. (Watch the trailer) — EZ

Universal Pictures

The Photograph Release date: February 14

Cast: Issa Rae, Lakeith Stanfield, Y'lan Noel, Rob Morgan, Chanté Adams

Director: Stella Meghie

Why it's worth seeing: The Photograph, writer and director Stella Meghie's time-shifting romance starring Issa Rae and Lakeith Stanfield, is the type of movie that smolders like an old Al Green song for its entire runtime. Whenever its plot, which follows the daughter of a famous photographer named Mae (Rae) falling in love with a commitment-phobic journalist (Stanfield), threatens to intensify or boil over, the movie finds a way to dial back the conflict. Occasionally, particularly in the flashback sections about Mae's mother, that skittishness towards melodrama can be frustrating. But in the scenes between Rae and Stanfield, who share a low-key chemistry, the film achieves a sweet balance between indie-movie naturalism and rom com sweetness that's all too rare on screen these days. (Watch the trailer) — DJ

GKIDS

Ride Your Wave Release date: February 19

Cast: Ryota Katayose, Rina Kawaei, Kentaro Ito, Honoka Matsumoto

Director: Masaaki Yuasa

Why it's great: Masaaki Yuasa has been a prolific force of trippy anime since the late '90s, but 2020 has the potential to be the director's breakout year in the United States with a huge slate of projects coming out, starting with the series Keep Your Hands Off Eizouken! in the winter anime season, followed by Ride Your Wave, a saccharine seaside love story that will break and rebuild your heart. Surfer Hinako Mukaimizu and firefighter Minato Hinageshi have a meet-cute on the roof of Hinako's burning apartment building, and after developing a deep, resonating affection for each other over the course of a year, Minato suddenly and tragically drowns. Hinako, left behind in shock, realizes that she can conjure Minato in water by singing a song (recorded by voice actor Ryota Katayose's band, Generations from Exile Tribe) they both loved. Of course, everyone thinks she's insane for talking to a water bottle and carrying around a water-filled blow-up finless porpoise, but Hinako holds firm until her hallucinations are validated in an explosive final act. Yuasa's dramatic perspective-shifting animation style is beautiful in this water world, and the narrative seeds planted at the beginning come shooting up for an emotionally devastating end. (Watch the trailer) — Leanne Butkovic

Netflix

A Shaun the Sheep Movie: Farmageddon Release date: February 14

Cast: Justin Fletcher, John Sparkes, Amalia Vitale, Kate Harbour

Directors: Will Becher and Richard Phelan

Why it's worth seeing: While it may not generate the same type of praise as the slightly droller Wallace and Gromit or a stop-motion blockbuster like Chicken Run, the kid-friendly Shaun the Sheep series, which chronicles the life of mischief-loving sheep named Shaun, is a reliable source of belly laughs. This sequel to 2015's equally charming Shaun the Sheep Movie has a science-fiction bent courtesy of an alien spacecraft that travels to the town of Mossingham, where Shaun and his animal friends live on a quiet farm with their buffoonish owner. (Obviously, Shaun is the real boss of the establishment.) The UFO plot allows the crack animation team at Aardman to deliver a number of referential sight-gags to genre classics like 2001: A Space Odyssey, Alien, Close Encounters of the Third Kind, E.T., and The X-Files. Still, the emphasis is rightfully on the type of playful slapstick comedy that all ages can enjoy, especially if you like cute clay farm animals. And, honestly, who doesn't? (Watch the trailer) — DJ

NEON

She Dies Tomorrow Release date: August 7

Cast: Kate Lyn Sheil, Jane Adams, Chris Messina, Katie Aselton

Director: Amy Seimetz

Why it's worth seeing: Read anything about She Dies Tomorrow and you'll find some mention of how it's eerily perfect for the current moment. It's a movie ostensibly about mortality, but more accurately about fear and how it's its own sort of virus. The plot is relatively simple: Amy, for reasons she never fully explains, is convinced she's going to die. She calls her friend Jane (Jane Adams) and describes her premonition. Jane attributes Amy's paranoia to an alcoholic relapse, and writes it off, but then, alone in her basement, huddled over a microscope, Jane starts to experience the same fear. It's contagious. Through flashbacks, we see where Amy contracted her horror, but it's never defined as any specific monster. It's just an airborne terror, seeping into willing minds. The world Seimetz creates is one that turns progressively more surreal. It's an echo of our own that slowly grows more foreign. It's also often absurdly funny, like a Tim & Eric sketch with an operatic bent. (Watch the trailer) — EZ

IFC Films

Swallow Release date: March 6

Cast: Haley Bennett, Austin Stowell, Elizabeth Marvel, Denis O'Hare

Director: Carlo Mirabella-Davis

Why it's worth seeing: Carlo Mirabella-Davis' directorial debut will easily go down as one of the queasiest films of the year, but it's far more than its most upsetting moments. Swallow stars Haley Bennett as Hunter, a housewife tasked with maintaining a perfectly manicured life for her businessman husband. But Hunter suffers from pica, a rare condition which means she consumes items that are not food. When she learns she's pregnant, her eating disorder intensifies, and she starts putting everything from marbles to push pins in her mouth. Mirabella-Davis never shies away from the the gruesome reality of the effect Hunter's actions have on her body, but he pairs it with gorgeous visuals that look like something out of a 1950s Vogue editorial. It's a deeply unsettling marriage, enhanced by Bennett's astounding performance, and just when you think that Swallow might veer into more horror chaos, it swerves to a realistic, tender zone. (Watch the trailer) — EZ

Well Go USA

Synchronic Release date: October 23

Cast: Anthony Mackie, Jamie Dornan

Directors: Justin Benson, Aaron Moorhead

Why it's worth seeing: Four features in, directing duo Justin Benson and Aaron Moorhead have a very distinct style: weird stuff in the sky, complicated brotherly relationships between men, new and fascinating conceptions of the nature of time. Synchronic is another dive into the depths of what the fabric of the universe is woven from, spinning a wild tale of death, drugs, and time travel amidst the dim, sinister backdrop of nighttime New Orleans. Jamie Dornan and Anthony Mackie play a pair of EMTs cruising the NOLA nights responding to emergency distress calls. On a few of these calls, they come across a number of people who have either mysteriously disappeared or somehow wound up dead, each incident having to do with a new drug called ""Synchronic."" When Dornan's daughter goes missing, his friend must figure out how to use the killer drug to find her. (Watch the trailer) — ES

Netflix

Tigertail Release date: April 10

Cast: Tzi Ma, Christine Ko, Hong-Chi Lee

Director: Alan Yang

Why it's worth watching:Master of None co-creator Alan Yang makes his directorial feature debut with Tigertail, in which he loosely adapts his own father's life. It's a tight film that's nonetheless epic in scale as it follows a man named Pin-Jui from his childhood as a young boy in Taiwan into his middle age in America. Yang jumps back and forth in time, as the present-day Pin-Jui (played in a wonderful, understated performance by Tzi Ma) reflects on his past. It's a tricky balancing act. The scenes of his life as a young adult as he bonds with his first love are flush with color, which fades as he settles into the rhythms of a passionless marriage in New York. At times Tigertail can feel like a condensed version of a much longer saga, and indeed that was sort of the case as Yang whittled down an over 200 page draft. Still, Yang has crafted a vivid tale about the immigrant experience, regret, and the bonds between generations. (Watch the trailer) — EZ

Netflix

Time to Hunt Release date: April 23

Cast: Lee Je-hoon, Ahn Jae-hong, Choi Woo-shik, Park Jung-min

Director: Yoon Sung-hyun

Why it’s worth watching: Unrelenting in its pursuit of scenarios where guys point big guns at each other in sparsely lit empty hallways and streets, the Netflix original Time to Hunt is a South Korean thriller that knows exactly what stylistic register it's playing in. A group of four friends (one of them is played by Parasite and Train to Busan break-out Choi Woo-shik) knock over a gambling house, stealing a hefty bag of money and a set of even more valuable hard-drives, which results in them being targeted by a ruthless contract killer (Park Hae-soo) who moves like the T-1000 and shoots like a henchmen in a Michael Mann movie. Dystopian flourishes—such as protests playing out in the streets and police waging a tech-savvy war on citizens while criminals operate largely unchecked—serve the simmering tension and elevate the pounding set-pieces instead of feeling like unnecessary allegorical padding. Time to Hunt uses its elongated runtime to build sequences in a meticulous, considerate way that should appeal to viewers who have seen Heat, Collateral, and Miami Vice too many times to count. (Watch the trailer) —DJ

20th Century Fox

Underwater Release date: January 10

Cast: Kristen Stewart, Vincent Cassel, Jessica Henwick

Director: William Eubank

Why it's worth seeing: One of the few action blockbusters to be lucky enough to actually come out in theaters this year, Underwater is a lean, mean, monster flick with shades of Alien, The Abyss, and Pacific Rim all rolled into one. When their deep-sea drilling complex spontaneously ruptures, killing most of the miners and engineers onboard, a small band of survivors crawl through the wreckage and don pressurized diving suits to survive in the deepest part of the ocean long enough to reach the surface. They soon find out, however, that they're not alone down in the dark, as bloodthirsty creatures pursue them through the murk. It's great fun, with some really sickening deaths, terrifying beasts, and outfits like something out of a mecha anime. (Watch the trailer) — ES

Amazon Studios

The Vast of Night Release date: May 29

Cast: Sierra McCormick, Jake Horowitz

Director: Andrew Patterson

Why it's worth seeing: Equal parts would-be Twilight Zone episode and old-fashioned sci-fi radio drama, Andrew Patterson's debut feature The Vast of Night takes us back in time to Cayuga, New Mexico in the late 1950s, when technology promised us a future Space Age and the rascally Soviets could be hiding around every corner. Two high school youngsters, switchboard operator Fay (Sierra McCormick) and late-night radio host Everett (Jake Horowitz), stumble upon a strange interference one night that doesn't seem to be coming from any known source. When Everett asks his listeners to call in if they recognize the sound, the two uncover a global conspiracy involving the military, disappearances, and what some might call alien abduction. The film is such fun to watch, the two leads constantly bickering back and forth in a choppy, mid-'50s cadence, and the mystery at the center of it all is a thrilling, playful return to a cozy, antique way of storytelling when the nighttime was full of endless possibilities. (Watch the trailer) — ES

GKIDS

Weathering With You Release date: January 17

Cast: Kotaro Daigo, Nana Mori, Chieko Baishô

Director: Makoto Shinkai

Why it's worth seeing: Shinkai's follow-up to his devastating body-switching, time-bending romance Your Name. is no less gorgeous to look at, with a beautiful story about love and sacrifice underneath its magical realist wrappings. Young runaway Hodaka (Kotaro Daigo), trying to find steady work in Tokyo, befriends a mysterious ""sunshine girl,"" Hina (Nana Mori), who can change the weather just by praying. But the forces that give Hina her abilities are bound by an ancient power, and she learns she must make a decision if she wants to save the world and everyone she loves who lives in it. Full of glittering cityscapes and lovingly animated raindrops, Weathering With You is a beautiful, mesmerizing fantasy of young love. (Watch the trailer) — ES

Ad Vitam

Zombi Child Release date: January 24

Cast: Louise Labeque, Wislanda Louimat, Adile David, Mathilde Ru

Director: Bertrand Bonello

Why it's worth seeing: If The Craft was set in a prestigious French school for girls and had an anti-colonialism subtext practically oozing from its pores, you'd have something like Zombi Child. Bouncing between 1960s Haiti and a clique of present-day schoolgirls who form their own sorority, the French film connects the two timelines via Mélissa, a new student and one of few Black girls in the school for children whose parents received the Legion of Honour, a national award created by Napoleon. A survivor of the devastating 2010 earthquake in Haiti, she moved to France to live with her aunt, a practitioner of voodoo, called a mambo. When one of her new friends gets dumped, she, in a very selfishly teenaged fashion, seeks out Mélissa's aunt and begs her to exorcise her heartbreak. From then on, Zombi Child goes from somewhat controversial—a reaction Bertrand Bonello tends to elicit from his other movies (The Pornographer featured unsimulated sex, and Nocturama was accused of glamorizing terrorism, for example)—and incisive social commentary to politically charged horror. (Watch the trailer) — LB","{'neg': 0.143, 'neu': 0.723, 'pos': 0.134, 'compound': -0.9996}"
28,The Effect of Parental Phubbing on Teenager's Mobile Phone ...,21 months ago,"Therefore, students' MP dependency can have a negative impact on students' ... The mean age of the participants was 15.09±2.89 years.",https://www.dovepress.com/the-effect-of-parental-phubbing-on-teenagers-mobile-phone-dependency-b-peer-reviewed-fulltext-article-PRBM,"With the rapid development of technology and science, mobile phone use has become an inseparable part of people’s daily lives all over the world. According to the 40th Statistical Report on Internet Development of China Internet Network Center,1 the number of China’s netizens in 2016 reached 724 million, of which 19.4% were from 10 to 19 years old and 24.8% were students ranged from elementary school to high school. In an investigation of mobile phone dependency among 3952 middle school students from 10 street blocks in Shenzhen, China, 50% of the students had middle-level dependency and 22% had high-level dependency.2

Mobile phone dependency refers to the overuse of mobile phones,3,4 which can lead to physical and mental problems such as anxiety and fear of no mobile phone access.5–9 It is also known as problematic or excessive mobile phone use in some studies.10–12 Although mobile phone dependency may result in addictive behaviors which might be similar to those associated with substance abuse,13,14 they are not identical terms, because the core symptoms of mobile phone dependency are different from addiction.11,12 According to previous studies, high-level MP dependency is associated with physical complaints such as insomnia, headache, and fatigue;15 mental disorders such as depression; and impaired social interactions and loneliness.9,16–18 Therefore, students’ MP dependency can have a negative impact on students’ behaviors, such as negative social relationships and low academic performance.19–21

Numerous studies have explored the topic of students’ MP dependency and the environmental and psychological factors contributing to such dependency. Some of these studies focused on the effects of individual traits or other self-related factors. For example, Hong et al (2012) found that social extraversion and anxiety increased problematic MP use and self-esteem decreased problematic MP use.22 Jin et al (2017) demonstrated that the variable of attachment style can predict students’ MP dependency with the mediation effect of self-esteem and dysfunctional attitudes.23 Likewise, Azam and Lubna (2013) proposed that subjective norm, which influences an individual’s MP dependency intention, is an important factor predicting problematic MP use.24 Other scholars tested the impact of social environment. Choi and Kim (2016) found that teenagers’ problematic behaviors resulting from MP dependency were closely related to their parents’ inconsistent attitudes.25 Walsh et al (2011) investigation among young Australians revealed that their MP behaviors were partially shaped by the in-group norms they were exposed to.26 Yang and Chuan-Lai (2017) concluded that college students who received the advice about limiting use of MP from parents and peers showed lower levels of MP dependency.27 In addition, several researchers attempted to integrate the effects of external and internal factors on MP dependency behaviors in a single study. Hall et al (2014) found that individuals’ internal norm, their partner’s norm, and their relationships with partners were all important factors in MP dependency.28 Kim and Shin (2016) reported that social needs and the influence of society had positive influences on the intention and behaviors of MP dependency.29

To identify additional related factors associated with teenagers’ MP dependency, this study aimed to explore parental phubbing, subjective norm, behavioral intention, and the relationships among these variables in order to provide a theoretical framework and implications for future research.

Parental Phubbing Behaviors and MP Dependency

Phubbing, a composite of “phone” and “snubbing” proposed in the Macquarie Dictionary of Australian English, refers to the social phenomenon of looking at a mobile device while interacting with others, which ultimately results in a disturbance of conversation and communication.30 This phubbing behavior has been observed in various demographic groups, including young adults31,32 and adults.33 Checking a mobile phone while engaged in other activities has become a common phenomenon in families and schools.34–36 Phubbing has caused increasing public concern and has promoted the implementation of projects such as UP2U (“Program for raising awareness of phubbing problem in public”) which is a program that encourages people to put down their mobile phones and build more constructive interpersonal communications.37

From the perspective of social learning theory,38 parental phubbing has an impact on teenagers’ MP dependency behaviors. Bandura’s (1977) social learning theory emphasized that all individuals experience the effects of social environments. Family, especially parents, are an irreplaceable part of a child’s life and exert a considerable influence on perceived social surroundings, inner cognition, and daily behaviors.38 Taylor (2010) highlighted that most students in middle school experience a vulnerable period in their lives during which they are prone to develop maladaptive habits due to lack of insight regarding the potential risks and consequences of those behaviors.39 They might model parents’ maladaptive behaviors, such as excessive smoking and drinking, especially if they view those behaviors as normal.

Although previous studies have not examined the relation between parental phubbing and MP dependency, some studies provided evidence for an association between the two variables. Researchers have demonstrated that parents’ behaviors play an important modeling role in the process of teenager’s habit formation, especially for some maladaptive behaviors such as excessive alcohol use, drug use,40–44 smoking,45–48 gambling,49,50 and so on. That is to say, exposure to family environments that include parents’ maladaptive behaviors may influence teenagers’ attitudes towards and perceived risks associated with these maladaptive behaviors. Thus, they may be more vulnerable and prone to develop these maladaptive behaviors as compared with other teenagers whose parents do not engage in these behaviors. Similarly, parents’ engagement in phubbing behavior may influence teenagers’ MP dependency behavior and may be a predictive variable of teenagers’ MP dependency levels. However, this proposition calls for further empirical investigation.

Subjective Norm, Intention, and MP Dependency

Even when people understand that MP dependency may lead to negative outcomes, it is difficult to stop engaging in them. The theory of planned behavior (TPB) proposed by Ajzen (1980) provides a plausible explanation.51 This theory has been widely used to explain a variety of maladaptive habits and related interventions.52–54 TPB states that an individual’s behaviors are closely associated with behavioral intention and three predictors (attitude, perceived behavioral control, and subjective norm). Behavioral intention is an antecedent of an actual behavior. Attitude is an individual’s positive or negative evaluation of a behavior. Perceived behavioral control is an individual’s perceived efficacy about performing the target behavior. Subjective norm is an individual’s behavior norm or belief shaped by his or her social surroundings such as friends, parents, or important others. In plain language, the concept of social norm means, “What do you think others would like you to do?” and acts as the motivation for conforming to this norm. Ajzen (1980) contended that attitude, perceived behavior control, and subjective norm have an impact on behavioral intention and can be used to predict subsequent behavior.51 By definition, among these three key predictors of behavior intention in TPB, subjective norm might have the strongest association with parental phubbing, because the parents are the most important others whose behaviors will influence their children’s subjective norms. Furthermore, some studies have found that subjective norm, among the TPB factors, has the strongest association with MP use (i.e., sending and reading text messages while walking; using mobile social networking apps).55,56 For these reasons, this study focused on subjective norm as one predictor of MP dependency and proposed that subjective norm and behavioral intention are linked with individuals’ MP dependency behaviors.

Some of the existing studies that applied TPB to problematic behavior demonstrated the predictive power of subjective norm and behavioral intention on problematic use of Internet. Pelling and White (2009) applied TPB to the use of social networking web sites (SNWs) and found that attitudes and norms were significant predictors of SNW intention and problematic use tendency of SNW.57 Researchers have examined problematic applications of Internet from the perspective of TPB, such as online trading,58,59 online learning,60,61 and gaming.62 This study proposed that subjective norm and behavioral intention would have similar effects on MP dependency. Thus, subjective norm might influence individuals’ MP dependency intention, which in turn might have an impact on their MP dependency behaviors.

Parental Phubbing, Subjective Norm, and Intention

The literature has shown the special role of important others in the growth of teenagers. For example, peer influences containing social modeling and perceived norms are positively related to adolescents’ alcohol use.63 Similarly, we may conceptualize students’ MP dependency behaviors from the perspective of a self-regulatory system. Parental phubbing behaviors function as an environmental context and set a standard norm for student’s MP usage, gradually changing the student’s subjective norm, which means that the individual student accepts a lower standard of MP use based on his self-judgment and stimulates more intense intention on MP dependency. If the parents do not realize the negative effects of phubbing, the phubbing environment might be reinforced consistently (suggesting that phubbing is common and acceptable behavior) for dependency intention, thus increasing the possibility of students’ MP dependency. Based on these findings, this study hypothesizes that parental phubbing will influence the teenager’s MP dependency with the mediation role of subjective norm and dependency intention.

Existing studies have demonstrated the effects of parental phubbing or other negative behaviors on an individual’s cognition and performance of MP dependency. Chotpitayasunondh and Douglas (2016) examined the relationship between phubbing and perceived phubbing norm and found that this norm was affected by the frequencies of both phubbing and being phubbed.64 Lee (2003) demonstrated that imitating others influenced MP use intention and behaviors through the mediation effect of perceived subjective norm.65 Conversely, Xu et al (2012) studied parents’ attitudes toward and supervision of teenagers’ MP use and found that teenagers’ MP dependency behaviors decreased when they perceived that their parents spent less time on their own MPs and exercised more restrictions on family MP use.66

The Current Study

The current study sought to demonstrate the predictive power of parental phubbing for teenagers’ MP dependency and explore the relationship between parental phubbing and teenagers’ MP dependency among Chinese middle school students. Even though some studies have partially demonstrated the application of TPB to MP dependency and the effect of phubbing on teenagers’ MP behaviors, few studies have integrated these variables into one structural model. We aimed to examine the role of parental phubbing and explain the interactive effects of important variables on the formation of teenagers’ MP dependency.

The following specific hypotheses were tested: H1: Parental phubbing behaviors will be positively related to the level of teenagers’ MP dependency. H2: Subjective norm will influence teenagers’ MP dependency intentions and then influence their MP dependency behaviors. H3: Teenagers’ dependency intention will play a mediation role between parental phubbing and teenagers’ MP dependency. H4: Parental dependency norm will play a mediation role between parental phubbing and teenager’s dependency intention, and then affect MP dependency with the chain effect of intention.

To sum up, we assumed a structural model integrating H1, H2, H3, and H4, and we expected that the proposed model (see Figure 1) would have a good model fit.

Figure 1 The hypothesized model.

Method

Participants and Procedures

In total, 605 (females=294, males=274, the rest did not report gender) students who attended a middle school in Beijing, China, volunteered to complete the questionnaires and provide feedback. This school was one of the ordinary middle school in Beijing and only enrolled students who had local household registration. The mean age of the participants was 15.09±2.89 years. One of them completed less than half of the questions, and thus was not included in further data analysis. Of the participants, 153 were in Grade 7, 105 in Grade 8, 163 in Grade 10, and 171 in Grade 11; the only student in Grade 12 (age 20) was removed from the data analysis. Most of their parent’s education level were high school (mother=19.8%, father=18.5%), undergraduate (junior/regular college) (mother=61.6%, father=54.4%), or postgraduate (graduate/Ph.D.) (mother=13.5%, father=22.2%)

Participants completed the questionnaires during class time without a time limit. The questionnaire contained 20 items in total, including one subjective norm item, three dependency intention items, nine parental phubbing items, and seven MP dependency behavior items. The average time for completion was 10–15 mins. There were minimal missing data and these were estimated with the maximum likelihood method. This study was approved by the Research Ethics Committee of Beijing Normal University and the principals of the participating schools. Written and Informed consent was obtained from all individual participants and from the parents/legal guardians of participants below the age of 16. Parental written informed consent for participants between 16 and 18 was waived by the Research Ethics Committee of Beijing Normal University and the principals of the participating schools.

Measures

Parental Phubbing Behaviors

The scale was adapted from Partner Phubbing Scale67 and was used to measure teenagers’ perceived parental phubbing. We changed the object of every statement into “my parents” and asked the participants to assess the frequency of each event on a 5-point Likert scale from never=1 to all the time=5 (i.e., When I had dinner with my parents, they checked their phones from time to time). The scale consisted of nine items, including one reverse wording item. The sum of the nine item scores represented the level of parental phubbing behaviors with higher scores represented more parental phubbing behaviors. Specifically, we conducted a CFA analysis with the nine-item construct. The CFA results showed that the nine items represented one dimension (χ2(36)=1583.042, CFI=0.919, TLI=0.892, RMSEA (90% CI)=0.087 [0.074, 0.101]) and had high reliability (alpha=0.85).

Subjective Norm

The scale of subjective norm measured the parent’s latent attitudes toward children’s MP dependency. The scale was adapted from Lu et al (2009).68 We translated the items under Subjective Norm dimension, noticeably, the original scale defined norm as users’ perception of whether other important people perceive they should do this. However, the present study only focused on the influence of parents’ negative behaviors on their children, so we changed the original words “people who are important to me” into “my parents” and measured teenagers’ subjective norm under the influence of their parents. The statement of the item was worded as, “My parents think I don’t have to control my time spent on the mobile phone.” It was measured by a 5-point Likert scale from strongly disagree=1 to strongly agree=5. Higher reported scores represented higher levels of MP dependency norm from parents.

Dependency Intention

The dependency intention scale was adapted from Lu et al (2009).68 We translated the three items under Behavior Intention dimension and changed the original objection “instant messaging” into “time I spend on mobile phone” (i.e., I will recommend others to control the time spent on mobile phone). The items were measured by a 5-point Likert scale to assess participants’ level of agreement with these statements, and one of them was a reversed item. A higher score represented the tendency to have a higher level of MP dependency intention. The alpha value (0.71) showed the stable reliability of the adapted scales.

MP Dependency Behavior

The measurement scale of teenager’s MP dependency behavior was developed based on Dong et al’s (2016) Mobile Dependency Scale (α=0.91).20 We used seven items in one dimension to measure MP dependency behavior. (i.e., the amount of time I spend using my cellular phone is increasing). Participants needed to make evaluations based on their personal experiences and then report the degree of agreement on a 4-point Likert scale from strongly no=1 to strongly yes=4. Higher scores represented higher levels of MP dependency behavior. The reliability of the scale (alpha=0.88) was relatively high.

Analytical Strategy

To calculate the correlation coefficients among variables and examine the effects of demographic variables (i.e., age and gender), we first used the SPSS 22.0 to conduct the correlation analysis. To prove the assumed relationship between parental phubbing behaviors and level of teenagers’ MP dependency in H1 and the intervention effect of subjective norm and dependency intention stated in H2 and H3, we used path analysis with Mplus 7.0 to estimate the model fitting. In the chi-square test, the index reflected the deviation between the theoretical model and the actual observed model. The model is considered as having a good fit when the comparative fit index (CFI) was 0.90 or above. The value of root mean square error of approximation (RMSEA) was 0.08 or below, which is evidence for good model fit.69 In addition, to test the indirect effects, we used bootstrapping with 1000 samples to estimate the confidence intervals (CI), which reflected the significance of effects by not including zero.

Results

Common Method Variance Test

Common method bias refers to the co-variation that is caused by identical data sources or raters, participants’ similar testing environments or the contextual commonality of items or participants’ similarity in characteristics, all of which can be categorized into system errors. This kind of bias causes confusion and serious misunderstanding of the analytical results. The current study could not exclude possible common method bias; therefore, we examined the latent constructs underlying all items using Harman’s (1976) single factor test.70 The confirmatory factor analysis (CFA) extracted four common factors. The most contributory factor accounted for 29.7% of the co-variation for the entirety. The value was lower than the threshold value of 40%. Therefore, we were assured that the participants in the present study completed the questionnaires independently. The analytical results did not have serious bias.

Descriptive Statistics

Descriptive statistics and correlations among variables are presented in Table 1, providing the basic data information. According to the descriptive statistics, gender had no effect on any of the other variables. Age showed a positive relation with dependency intention and MP dependency behaviors, which means that older teenagers are likely to show higher levels of mobile phone dependency intention at the present and in the future and engage in more MP dependency behaviors. In addition, four variables were significantly correlated. Specifically, parental phubbing was positively related to subjective norm, intention, and MP dependency behaviors, while MP dependency behaviors were positively related to the above three constructs.

Table 1 Descriptive Statistics and Inter-Correlations of Variables in the Current Study (N=602)

Model Fitting Test

We used Mplus 7.0 to conduct path analysis to test the hypothesized relationships among the four variables in Figure 1. Firstly, maximum likelihood (ML) estimation was conducted in terms of individual item factor loadings, the reliability of measures, convergent validity, and discriminant validity. Given that the variable of age had a potential influence on teenager’s dependency intention and MP dependency (see Table 1), we controlled the deviation of age on these two variables. The results of the latent SEM showed that the data fitted the model well (χ2(184)=2.968, CFI=0.915, TLI=0.903, RMSEA (90% CI)=0.058 [0.053, 0.064]) (see Figure 2).

Figure 2 Mediation model of subjective norm and dependency intention between parental phubbing and teenager’s mobile phone dependency. **P<0.01; ***P<0.001.

To illustrate, the model included one direct path and two indirect paths. The direct path – from parental phubbing behaviors to teenagers’ MP dependency behaviors – showed that parental phubbing increased the level of MP dependency (β=0.171, p<0.01, 95% CI [0.038, 0.167]), which supported H1 that parental phubbing was positively related to teenagers’ MP dependency behaviors.

There were also two indirect paths from parental phubbing to MP dependency: (a) through dependency intention and (b) mediated by subjective norm, via dependency intention, then to teenagers’ MP dependency behaviors. The results also demonstrated that parental phubbing functioned via path (a) and path (b). Specifically, in path (a), parental phubbing increased teenagers’ MP dependency intention (β=0.242, p<0.001, 95% CI [0.101, 0.345]) and then positively affected teenagers’ MP dependency behaviors (β=0.448, p<0.001, 95% CI [0.220, 0.417]). We also implemented Bootstrap (=1000) test to examine the mediation effect, and the results showed the indirect effect of path (a) (β=0.109, p<0.05, 95% CI [0.043, 0.174]), which demonstrated the mediation role of teenager’s mobile phone intention between parental phubbing and teenagers’ MP dependency (H3). In path (b), parental phubbing positively affected teenagers’ subjective norm perceived from parents (β=0.169, p<0.001, 95% CI [0.099, 0.334]), which in turn increased teenagers’ MP dependency intention (β=0.393, p<0.001, 95% CI [0.205, 0.350]) and ultimately resulted in teenagers’ higher-level MP dependency behaviors (β=0.448, p<0.001, 95% CI [0.220, 0.417]). According to the result of Bootstrap (=1000) test, the indirect effect of path (b) (β=0.030, p<0.05, 95% CI [0.010, 0.050]) testified the mediation role of subjective norm between parental phubbing and teenager’s dependency intention, and the joint influence on MP dependency with the chain effect of intention was supported (H2, H4).

Meanwhile, the results also illustrated that the direct path – parental phubbing to teenagers’ MP dependency (β=0.171, p<0.001, 95% CI [0.071, 0.271]) – accounted for 55.3% of the whole variation, and took up a greater proportion of than path (a) 35.3% (β=0.109, p<0.05, 95% CI [0.043, 0.174]) and path (b) 9.7% (β=0.030, p<0.05, 95% CI [0.010, 0.050])

Discussion

The results of this study supported the four hypotheses. As proposed in H1, phubbing positively affected the level of MP dependency. More frequently, parental phubbing behaviors resulted in a higher level of MP dependency. Although no previous study on the same topic has been reported, the results of this study are consistent with some related studies. Ying (2012) showed that teenagers’ perceived parental MP use could predict their own MP dependency,71 concurring with the findings of the present study. Other scholars focused on the influence of parental monitoring on MP dependency and proposed that parental attitudes toward and monitoring of middle school students’ internet or MP use decreased the likelihood of excessive use.72–74 This result can be explained by Bandura’s social learning theory.75 Phubbing behaviors of parents serve as a model for MP use by middle school students. They will be likely to develop the phubbing behavior through the process of intending, performing, duplicating, and ultimately integrating the behavior into their daily activities through frequent interaction with their parents. Of note is that the influential role of peer relationships was not considered in the present study,35,76,77 because in most of the middle schools in China, students are not permitted to take MPs to school, which limits the opportunities to learn MP behavior in the context of peer experiences.

As proposed in H2, subjective norm and dependency intention could be influential factors in explaining the variation in teenagers’ MP dependency. The finding is consistent with previous findings that applied TPB to online shopping,58 education,60 gaming,62 excessive social network use,57 and MP use in different scenarios (i.e., mobile phone use while crossing the road, cycling and driving).78–80 Liao et al (2007) studied continued use of e-services and found that subjective norm affected behavioral intention, which in turn affected actual behaviors.81 Piazza et al (2019) found that subjective norm significantly predicted the intention to use mobile phone while crossing the street.79 Jiang et al (2019) and Holland and Rathod (2013) reported the significant effect of subjective norm on MP use while cycling and driving, respectively.78,82 However, other scholars have reported different results. Fang and Shao (2007) explained individual’s intention to participate in web-based surveys by using an extended TPB model and found that subjective norm did not significantly predict potential respondents’ intention.83 In the current study, we focused on the effects of perceived subjective norm from parents because the concept had a close relationship with parental phubbing. Based on the definition of subjective norm, the construct is more closely associated with individuals’ external guidance than it is with attitudes. Parental phubbing, as an important external factor, might have an immediate impact on an individual teenager. Finally, the results showed that perceived subjective norm from parents influenced teenagers’ MP dependency intention and ultimately influenced their MP dependency behaviors. The present study focused on explaining the effects of subjective norm and intention and partially proved the practical application of TPB to an examination of MP dependency.

Moreover, the mediation role of MP dependency intention between parental phubbing behaviors and students’ MP dependency behaviors (H3) was also supported by the indirective effect test of path (a). This result showed that parental phubbing could not only increase the likelihood of students’ MP behaviors directly but could also increase the student’s MP dependency intention and then impacted on higher-level MP behaviors. Although the previous studies could not fully support the present results, some studies did partially support that parents’ maladaptive behavior such as excessive phubbing leads to higher-level MP use intention and behaviors. For example, Roberts and David (2016) demonstrated that phubbing was distractive for romantic partners’ communication and that the ever-increasing use of cell phones provided an environment of drawing teenager’s attention to imitate.67 Lee (2003) demonstrated that imitation of others influenced MP use intention.65

Additionally, the indirective effect test of path (b) supported the mediation effect of subjective norm and dependency intention in the relationship of parental phubbing and students’ MP dependency behaviors. This is consistent with Bandura’s self-efficacy theory (1977).38 On the one hand, people tend to look for vicarious experiences from important individuals when they lack related experiences or knowledge (Bandura, 1977).38 Therefore, when adolescents want to know a typical way to use MPs, parents’ phubbing behaviors may be a vicarious experience for their children and may shape a biased cognition of MP use in adolescents’ minds, which is equal to the subjective norm- the criterion for judging the usage of MPs. Thus, with the increase of parental phubbing behaviors, subjective norm becomes inclined to MP dependency. On the other hand, people might receive vicarious reinforcement from others (Bandura, 1977).38 Therefore, some other impacts caused by parental phubbing such as reducing communication anxiety will work out as a kind of reinforcement for adolescents. Then, they develop phubbing as an effective way to solve similar problems and receive more self-reinforcement in the process of phubbing replication, which increases dependency intention and induces more MP dependency behaviors. This chain effect showed similar results to some previous studies. For example, Chotpitayasunondh and Douglas (2016) demonstrated that an individual’s phubbing is related to his or her frequency of phubbing behaviors, which represents the degree of self-reinforcement, and being phubbed, which represents the degree of vicarious reinforcement from others.64 Therefore, parents’ phubbing behaviors not only contribute to a negative subjective norm for children but also serve as a reinforcement condition for teenagers’ dependency intention which leads to teenagers’ more MP dependency behaviors.

Innovations and Limitations

We believe our study was the first study of its kind to show that parents’ phubbing behaviors can set a negative example in MP use for middle school students. This finding offered new insight for intervention strategies that control or limit parents’ phubbing behaviors in the family environment, especially when parents are communicating with teenagers. Thus, parents can intervene in teenagers’ phubbing intention and reduce teenagers’ MP dependency behaviors. The effectiveness of this method should be tested in future experiments. In addition, the present study partially supported the validation and practicability of TPB when applying it to MP dependency. Previous studies have used this theory as a framework to investigate the formation of different behaviors, but few studies have validated the theory for MP dependency. Finally, our study contributed to the literature by providing an integrated model of MP dependency. We proposed a model to explain the process from parents’ behaviors, via the influence of teenagers’ perceptions and cognition, toward the final consequence of behaviors, showing more convincing and detailed evidence for the complicated relationships among the variables.

Although we tried to standardize all of the procedures and control for the influence of uncertain variables in this study as carefully as possible, some limitations were unavoidable. First, this study explored the mediating role of subjective norm, as one of the three determinants of behavior intention in TPB, between parental phubbing and MP dependency. However, TPB proposed that there are three determinants (attitude, perceived behavioral control, and subjective norm) that have association with an individual’s behavior intention.51 It would be interesting for future researchers to investigate the effects of all of these three predictors of TPB on the relations of parental phubbing and MP dependency. Second, although the sample size of this study was 605 and was large enough to conduct structural equation modeling, our participants were from only one city in China, which limits the generalizability of the study. The findings might not be generalizable to all middle school students in other cities of China. Large regional disparities caused by socioeconomic status differences still exist among different areas of China. In addition, different schools have different guidelines for students’ MP use. Future studies need to use a random sampling method with a larger sample size from more widespread areas to improve the generalizability of the results.","{'neg': 0.029, 'neu': 0.929, 'pos': 0.042, 'compound': 0.9913}"
29,Gut microbiota-involved mechanisms in enhancing systemic ...,66 months ago,"As a case study, ginseng polysaccharides and ginsenosides in ... Yao Shen Shu” (Book on Ten Magic Herbs) in the year 1348 of Yuan Dynasty,...",https://www.nature.com/articles/srep22474,"Till now, dozens of polysaccharides in different structural types have been isolated and purified from the boiling water extracts (decoction) of ginseng, and their biological activities were preliminarily demonstrated32. These purified polysaccharides always possessed a low molecular weight less than 100 kDa. Interestingly, however, a recent study declared that high molecular weight polysaccharides (more than 100 kDa) played a biologically pivotal role in total ginseng polysaccharides33. These findings imply that bioactive polysaccharides in DST may cover a wide molecular weight distribution. Moreover, dietary prebiotics, from long-chain inulin to oligofructose, bear a very broad molecular weight range as well. Given these, and also in light of TCM wholism, this study focused total polysaccharides in DST with a very wide molecular weight distribution (1.00~1308.98 kDa). In agreement with previous studies32, multiple monosaccharides, i.e. Man, Rha, GalA, Glc, Gal, Ara and Fuc, constituted the total ginseng polysaccharides.

Ginsenosides can be categorized by either structural or metabolic properties30. According to structural properties, ginsenosides are normally classified into four types, namely protopanaxadiol, protopanaxatriol, ocotillol and oleanolic acid types. Among them, protopanaxadiol and protopanaxatriol types dominate; from the aspect of metabolic pathways, primary ginsenosides and secondary ginsenosides (metabolized from primary ginsenosides) are included. Taken together into consideration, the eleven ginsenosides aforementioned, including seven protopanaxadiol types (Rb 1 , Rc, Rb 2 , Rd, F 2 , 20(S)-Rg 3 , CK) and four protopanaxatriol types (Rg 1 , Re, 20(S)-Rg 2 , Rf) or, alternatively, seven primary ginsenosides (Re, Rf, Rb 1 , Rc, Rb 2 , Rg 1 , Rd) and four secondary ginsenosides (20(S)-Rg 2 , F 2 , 20(S)-Rg 3 , CK) were chosen as the representatives for investigation in this study. HPLC-TQ-MS with multiple reaction monitoring (MRM) scan was adopted for quantitative determination of the ginsenosides in the biological samples (plasma and feces) to provide the greatest selectivity and sensitivity. By five channels with different mass transitions, cone and collision voltages (Supplementary Table 6), the eleven analytes were detected with baseline separation (Fig. 3). The quantitative method for the biological samples was fully validated in terms of linearity, sensitivity, precision, accuracy, and stability tests (Supplementary Tables 7–9). Besides, UPLC-QTOF-MS was auxiliary for qualitative analysis by comparing the mass spectra and retention times with those of reference compounds and tentatively assigned by matching the empirical molecular formula with the published known ginsenosides, and/or further confirmed by elucidating the quasi-molecular ions and fragment ions in each group34.

According to the theory of traditional Chinese medicine, DST is clinically used for reinforcing Qi (vital energy). Forced swimming is a well-established model to imitate the Qi-deficiency status35. Moreover, it was previously defined that over-fatigue caused by forced swimming and acute cold stress may trigger a rapid loss of homeostasis of endogenous metabolism on rat models36. On the other side, functional interactions between gut microbiota and host endogenous metabolism has been well demonstrated22. Associating them, we presumed that OACS could elicit gut microbiota dysbiosis. Indeed, not only disorder of endogenous metabolism but also dysbiosis of gut microbiota caused by OACS were experimentally verified in this study. And their potential relations can be reasonably elucidated on the basis of previous studies. For examples, mammalian gut microbiota manages choline metabolism by transforming it into dimethylamines, trimethylamines and finally TMAO37. And the gut symbiotic bacterial metabolism has been defined as the exclusive pathway to produce TMAO from choline38. Likewise, gut microbiota regulates bile acid metabolism as well. CA and chenodeoxycholic acid, which are primary bile acids synthesized in the liver from cholesterol, can be metabolized by the gut microbiota into secondary bile acids39. Therefore the changed gut microorganism altered the urinary level of TMAO and the plasmatic level of CA in this study. The other gut microbiota derived metabolites, such as hippurate, 4-HPPA and 4-MP, also significantly varied in the model group40. Actually, besides microbial metabolism, it is worthy of attention that both choline and bile acids are strongly correlated with catabolism and/or anabolism. Specifically, bile acids serve as molecular modulators for glucose metabolism by binding to related cellular receptors41, while choline is implicated in lipid metabolism and synthesis of very-low-density lipoprotein42. It signifies that gut microbiota and host metabolism could functionally interact, which may result in gut microbiome and intermediary metabolites, such as citrate and isocitrate, are indirectly relevant. Dominant changes on the phylum Firmicutes and Bacteroidetes of gut microbiota have been found in metabolic syndromes with disordered endogenous metabolisms, such as obesity and type-2 diabetes, but the variations were inconsistent. A decrease of Firmicutes and an increase of Bacteroidetes were observed in some studies43, whereas the inverse was also reported44. Consistent with the latter, here Bacteroidetes was reduced and Firmicutes was enhanced in the model group by OACS.

In this study, ginseng polysaccharides imparted a well prebiotic-like effect to OACS rats by simultaneously stimulating the growth of two most important probiotics: Lactobacillus spp. and Bacteroides spp. More interestingly, beyond that, ginseng polysaccharides holistically restored the gut microflora perturbed by OACS. The mechanisms involved might be intricate. Because of very limited enzymes encoded in the human genome, most extraneous polysaccharides are indigestible until they reach the intestinal tract, where they can be fermented by gut microbe into short-chain fatty acids and lactate45. Gut microbial species vary in their polysaccharide preferences, and their strategies for competing polysaccharides are also different. Among them, the best elaborated mechanism is for members of phylum Bacteroidetes. They always possess various PULs (polysaccharide utilization loci)-encoded products, which are collectively termed Sus (starch utilization system)-like systems. These systems harbor several to decades of enzymes to degrade different polysaccharides by targeting specific glycosidic linkages or chemical substituents in the polysaccharides46. The mechanism for harvesting exogenous polysaccharides is common in Bacteroidetes members and is unique to this phylum17. Multiple natural polysaccharides such as pectin (homogalacturonan, rhamnogalacturonan I and II, etc.) and starch have been well demonstrated to be digested by Bacteroidetes with Sus-like systems47. Similar situation is very likely to occur on ginseng polysaccharides. Previously water-soluble polysaccharides from ginseng were systematically studied48. The results demonstrated the neutral portion of ginseng polysaccharides was a mixture of starch-like glucan and arabinogalactan while the acidic polysaccharides were identified as rhamnogalacturonan I-rich pectins and homogalacturonan-rich pectins. In agreement with it, an earlier report described that most fractions of ginseng polysaccharides were believed to be acidic pectic polysaccharides due to the dominant content of galacturonic acid49. Another two ginseng polysaccharides were elucidated as acidic arabinogalactans, and their backbones mainly consisted of (1 → 5)-α- L -Araf and (1 → 3)-β- D -Galp, occasionally branched at O-3 of Araf or O-4 and O-6 of Galp50. This structural feature is highly similar with several side chains of rhamnogalacturonan I containing individual, linear, or branched α- L -Araf and β- D -Galp residues47. Given all these facts, we extrapolate that Sus-like system driven degradation should be largely responsible for how ginseng polysaccharides affect phylum Bacteroidetes in the treated group. In addition, the polysaccharide acquisition strategies of other phylum are also preliminarily revealed, although they are still less well understood. For example, unlike Bacteroidetes, Firmicutes and Actinobacteria encode very few carbohydrate-degrading enzymes but possess abundant polysaccharide-specific ABC (ATP-binding cassette) transporters, by which degraded carbohydrates can be transported51. It provides a potential reason for variation of phylum Firmicutes and Actinobacteria shaped by ginseng polysaccharides. Except for the direct effects as prebiotics, it is worthy of special note that indirect effects of ginseng polysaccharides on gut microbiota of OACS rats potentially occurred as well. In this study, we clearly demonstrated that OACS significantly perturbed the composition of gut microbiota. On the other side, reportedly ginseng polysaccharides showed well bioactivities of anti-fatigue and anti-stress52,53, which were further confirmed on the OACS model in this study by the metabolomics analysis (Supplementary Figure 5), although the effective mechanisms are still unknown. Therefore modulation of systemic responses to the OACS by ginseng polysaccharides might suggest some other unclear mechanisms on its effects on gut microbiota that deserves further investigation.

Gut microbial metabolism of some primary ginsenosides investigated here has been well defined in previous reports, and also proven to be the main metabolic pathway in vivo. As summarized in Fig. 6, by selective deglycosylation, ginsenoside Re is metabolized by Bacteroides spp. to Rg 1 and secondary ginsenosides 20(S)-Rg 2 54, while Lactobacillus spp. and Bacteroides spp. transform ginsenoside Rc into ginsenosides 20(S)-Rg 3 and Rd, and then CK55,56, and that improved bioavailability and bioactivities of these secondary ginsenosides were also revealed therein. In this study, the relative abundances of Lactobacillus spp. and Bacteroides spp. in the model rats were decreased by OACS. Given their above-described roles, such variations would weaken intestinal metabolism and absorption of ginsenosides Re and Rc. As expected, the C max of ginsenoside 20(S)-Rg 3 and the AUC of ginsenosides 20(S)-Rg 2 , Rd, 20(S)-Rg 3 were significantly decreased by OACS. Actually, the C max of ginsenosides Rg 1 , Rd, 20(S)-Rg 2 as well as the AUC of ginsenosides Rg 1 and CK were also substantially reduced without significant differences. The results hinted that the intestinal metabolism of ginsenosides Re and Rc might be conspicuously weakened in the model group. The conclusion was further confirmed by the significant increase of ginsenosides Re and Rc in the feces by OACS. The excessive ginsenosides Re and Rc in the feces should be largely from the untransformed and/or unabsorbed prototypes in the intestinal tract. Meanwhile fecal contents of ginsenosides Rd and Rg 1 was correspondingly reduced in the model group. However, the excreted amount of ginsenosides 20(S)-Rg 2 in the feces was abnormally increased significantly, which might be attributed to permeability alternation of intestinal epithelial barrier caused by the disorder of gut microflora57.

Figure 6 Gut microbial metabolisms of ginsenosides Re (a) and Rc (b) by Bacteroides spp. and/or Lactobacillus spp. Full size image

Fecal chemical profiles were qualitatively consistent in the four groups, suggesting that metabolic pathways and mechanisms of ginsenosides in DST are not changed by either OACS or carbohydrate intervention. By the treatment of ginseng polysaccharides, the C max of ginsenosides Rg 1 , Rd and 20(S)-Rg 3 together with the AUC of ginsenosides 20(S)-Rg 2 , Rd and 20(S)-Rg 3 were significantly increased compared with the model group. Concurrently the fecal contents of ginsenosides Re, Rc, 20(S)-Rg 2 , Rd, 20(S)-Rg 3 and CK were significantly reduced in the ginseng polysaccharides group. These findings clearly demonstrated that intestinal biotransformation of ginsenosides Re and Rc was observably strengthened by ginseng polysaccharides. Further examinations showed ginseng polysaccharides stimulated the growth of Lactobacillus spp. and Bacteroides spp., and, more meaningfully, restored the entire gut microbiota perturbed by OACS. These correlated outcomes promote us to conclude that ginseng polysaccharides can enhance systemic exposure of certain ginsenosides in vivo in the OACS-induced rats via gut microbiota-mediated mechanisms. Similar results were also observed on oligofructose, but the variation degrees were not exactly alike with those by ginseng polysaccharides, which indicated that effects of different carbohydrates on gut microbiota and systemic exposure of ginsenosides may be selective. Actually, except for Lactobacillus spp. and Bacteroides spp., some other probiotics, such as Bifidobacteria spp., were also involved in intestinal biotransformation of ginsenosides58. However, they were determined with very limited abundances (Others in Fig. 2b) or even not found in this study. Thus they were not specifically investigated here. In addition to Re and Rc, metabolism of other primary ginsenosides by intestinal microflora are also well documented. For example, ginsenosides Rb 1 or Rb 2 can be transformed into ginsenosides F 1 or Rg 3 by gut microbiota59,60. However, in this study, no significant change was determined in plasmatic and fecal contents of ginsenosides Rb 1 and Rb 2 between the four groups. In our previous study on chemical characterization of DST, we found that multiple malonyl-ginsenosides and acetyl-ginsenosides, e.g. malonyl-Rb 1 and malonyl-Rb 2 , occurred in DST26. They could be degraded to their neutral ginsenosides by demalonylation or deacetylation, which would reach a dynamic equilibrium in vivo with the further degradation of the neutral ginsenosides. Such a dynamic equilibrium occurring on Rb 1 and Rb 2 (malonyl-Rb 1 → Rb 1 → Rg 3 /F 1 , etc.; malonyl-Rb 2 → Rb 2 → Rg 3 /F 1 , etc.) might be the reason of their seemingly invariable contents in the plasma and feces.

In summary, our findings provide a novel gut microbiota-involved mechanism by which polysaccharides synergistically work with small molecular chemicals co-existed in TCM decoction on certain pathological model. The facts inspire that TCM polysaccharides, even indigestible by host, could still indirectly contribute to therapeutic effects of TCM decoction. By conferring TCM polysaccharides a new role, this study is instrumental in scientization and rationalization of the classic TCM decoctions in human health care, and therefore is meaningful for inheritance and innovation of TCM decoctions.","{'neg': 0.032, 'neu': 0.886, 'pos': 0.082, 'compound': 0.9986}"
